Nebraska, session 109, LB317.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) On and after July 1, 2025, the Department of Natural
Resources shall be merged into the Department of Environment and Energy, which
shall be renamed as the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, and the
Director of Environment and Energy shall be renamed as the Director of Water,
Energy, and Environment. The Director of Natural Resources shall be renamed the
Chief Water Officer and retain authorities previously prescribed for the
administration of duties of the Department of Natural Resources, except as
otherwise provided by law.
(2) On and after July 1, 2025, positions of employment in the Department
of Natural Resources related to the powers, duties, and functions transferred
to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment pursuant to this
legislative bill are transferred to the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment. For purposes of the transition, employees of the Department of
Natural Resources shall be considered employees of the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment and shall retain their rights under the state personnel
system or pertinent bargaining agreement, and their service shall be deemed
continuous. This section does not grant employees any new rights or benefits
not otherwise provided by law or bargaining agreement or preclude the
department or the director from exercising any of the prerogatives of
management set forth in section 81-1311 or as otherwise provided by law. This
section is not an amendment to or substitute for the provisions of any existing
bargaining agreements.
Sec. 2. Any appropriation and salary limit provided in any legislative
bill enacted by the One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, to Agency No.
29, Department of Natural Resources, shall be null and void, and any such
amounts are hereby appropriated to Agency No. 84, Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment. Any financial obligations of the Department of Natural
Resources that remain unpaid as of June 30, 2025, and that are subsequently
certified as valid encumbrances to the accounting division of the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to sections 81-138.01 to 81-138.04, shall be
paid by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment from the unexpended
balance of appropriations existing in such program classifications on June 30,
2025.
Sec. 3. On and after July 1, 2025, whenever the Department of Natural
Resources or the Department of Environment and Energy is referred to or
designated by any contract or other document in connection with the duties and
functions of the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of
Environment and Energy as such departments existed prior to July 1, 2025, such
reference or designation shall apply to the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment or the Chief Water Officer, as determined by the duties and
functions assigned to each in statute. All contracts entered into by the
Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Environment and Energy
prior to July 1, 2025, in connection with the duties and functions of the
Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Environment and Energy as
such departments existed prior to July 1, 2025, are hereby recognized, with the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment or the Chief Water Officer, as
determined by the duties and functions assigned to each in statute, succeeding
to all rights and obligations under such contracts. Any cash funds, custodial
funds, gifts, trusts, grants, and appropriations of funds from prior fiscal
years available to satisfy obligations incurred under such contracts shall be
transferred and appropriated to such department or the Chief Water Officer for
the payment of such obligations. All documents and records transferred, or
copies of the same, may be authenticated or certified by such department or the
Chief Water Officer for all legal purposes.
Sec. 4. No suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative,
lawfully commenced prior to July 1, 2025, or which could have been commenced
prior to that date, by or against the Department of Natural Resources or the
Department of Environment and Energy, or any director or any employee thereof
in such director's or employee's official capacity or in relation to the
discharge of his or her official duties, shall abate by reason of the transfer
of duties and functions from the Department of Natural Resources to the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment or the Chief Water Officer or the
renaming of the Department of Environment and Energy as the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment.
Sec. 5. On and after July 1, 2025, unless otherwise specified, whenever
any provision of law refers to the Department of Natural Resources or the
Department of Environment and Energy in connection with duties and functions of
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, such law shall be construed
as referring to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment or the Chief
Water Officer, as determined by the duties and functions assigned to each in
-2-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
statute.
Sec. 6. On July 1, 2025, all items of property, real and personal,
including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the
Department of Natural Resources pertaining to the duties and functions
transferred to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment pursuant to
this legislative bill shall become the property of such department.
Sec. 7. Section 2-408, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended to
read:
2-408 For purposes of the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act:
(1) Demonstration and research farms means large-scale field and pasture
settings located across the state that provide a demonstration of healthy soil
practices in support of the educational and research programs of the producer
learning community;
(2) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources; and
(3) Producer learning community means an agricultural producer-led,
nonprofit, voluntary membership organization dedicated to fostering learning,
skills, and abilities and the gathering and sharing of knowledge for the
purpose of carrying out the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act.
Sec. 8. Section 2-414, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
2-414 (1) The nitrogen reduction incentive program is created and shall be
administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources. The department may collaborate with natural resources districts to
administer the program.
(2) The purposes of the program are to:
(a) Provide incentive payments to farmers; and
(b) Encourage farmers to (i) reduce the use of commercial fertilizer and
(ii) incorporate innovative technology into farming practices, including the
proper use of biological nitrogen products.
(3) The program shall provide an annual per-acre incentive for any farmer
who verifies through documentation that commercial fertilizer rates were
reduced by the lesser of forty pounds per acre for nitrogen or fifteen percent
by incorporating a qualifying product in the farmer's nutrient plans.
(4) A commercial fertilizer rate reduction from historic baseline use
shall be completed to qualify for the program.
(5) The department shall review the required commercial fertilizer rate of
reduction for the program on a biennial basis to determine if higher reduction
targets are necessary.
(6) The department shall:
(a) Collaborate with natural resources districts to add any new technology
to the program as it becomes available. Such technology shall replace nitrogen
fertilizer use and maintain farm productivity;
(b) Identify geographically beneficial target areas while keeping the
program open to all farmers in the state;
(c) Consult with farmers and commercial entities in the agriculture
industry to determine a per-acre payment rate tied to the commercial fertilizer
rate reduction but not less than ten dollars per acre; and
(d) Review the per-acre payment rate based on inflation or emerging
technology in subsequent years.
(7)(a) The department shall not award an amount of incentive payments in
total per year under the nitrogen reduction incentive program that is greater
than the lesser of:
(i) Five million dollars; or
(ii) The amount appropriated for such purpose by the Legislature.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any appropriation from the
General Fund to carry out the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act be used only for
operating expenses.
Sec. 9. Section 2-415, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
2-415 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that adopt a standard for
labeled commercial fertilizer products to qualify for the nitrogen reduction
incentive program and may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act.
Sec. 10. Section 2-416, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
2-416 (1) The Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund is created and shall
be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources for purposes of the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act. The Nitrogen
Reduction Incentive Cash Fund may consist of transfers as directed by the
Legislature and gifts, grants, bequests, and money from any public or private
source.
(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources may
apply for all grants from state, federal, and private sources that are
applicable to the purposes of the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act.
(3) Any such grant applied for by the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources that is awarded to the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources or the State of Nebraska shall be
credited to the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund.
(4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
-3-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Sec. 11. Section 2-969, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-969 The Riparian Vegetation Management Task Force is created. The
Governor shall appoint the members of the task force. The members shall include
one surface water project representative from each river basin that has ever
been determined to be fully appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 or 46-720
or is designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713 by the Chief
Water Officer Department of Natural Resources; one surface water project
representative from a river basin that has not been determined to be fully
appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 or 46-720 or is not designated as
overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713 by the Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources; one representative from the Department of
Agriculture, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy, the Department of Natural Resources, the office of the State Forester,
the Game and Parks Commission, and the University of Nebraska; three
representatives selected from a list of at least ten individuals nominated by
the Nebraska Association of Resources Districts; two representatives selected
from a list of at least five individuals nominated by the Nebraska Weed Control
Association; one riparian landowner from each of the state's congressional
districts; and one representative from the Nebraska Environmental Trust. In
addition to such members, any member of the Legislature may serve as a
nonvoting, ex officio member of the task force at his or her option. For
administrative and budgetary purposes only, the task force shall be housed
within the Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 12. Section 2-1501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1501 As used in sections 2-1501 to 2-15,123, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Commission means the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission;
(2) State means the State of Nebraska;
(3) Agency of this state means the government of this state and any
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the
government of this state;
(4) United States or agencies of the United States means the United States
of America, the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States
Department of Agriculture, and any other agency or instrumentality, corporate
or otherwise, of the United States of America;
(5) Government or governmental means the government of this state, the
government of the United States, and any subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them;
(6) Lands, easements, and rights-of-way means lands and rights or
interests in lands whereon channel improvements, channel rectifications, or
water-retarding or gully-stabilization structures are located, including those
areas for flooding and flowage purposes, spoil areas, borrow pits, access
roads, and similar purposes;
(7) Local organization means any natural resources district, drainage
district, irrigation district, or other public district, county, city, or state
agency;
(8) Subwatershed means a portion of a watershed project as divided by the
department on a complete hydrologic unit;
(9) Rechanneling means the channeling of water from one watercourse to
another watercourse by means of open ditches;
(10) Watercourse means any depression two feet or more below the
surrounding land serving to give direction to a current of water at least nine
months of the year, having a bed and well-defined banks and, upon order of the
commission, also includes any particular depression which would not otherwise
be within the definition of watercourse;
(11) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department
of Water, Energy, and Environment Director means the Director of Natural
Resources;
(12) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources; and
(13) Combined sewer overflow project means a municipal project to reduce
overflows from a combined sewer system pursuant to a long-term control plan
approved by the department Department of Environment and Energy.
Sec. 13. Section 2-1504, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1504 (1) The Nebraska Natural Resources Commission is established. The
commission shall advise the department as requested by the Chief Water Officer
director and shall perform such other functions as are specifically conferred
on the commission by law. The commission shall have no jurisdiction over
matters pertaining to water rights.
(2) Each member of the commission shall be a resident of the State of
Nebraska and shall have attained the age of majority. The voting members of the
commission shall be:
(a) One resident of each of the following river basins, with delineations
being those on the Nebraska river basin map officially adopted by the
commission and on file with the department: (i) The Niobrara River, White
River, and Hat Creek basin, (ii) the North Platte River basin, (iii) the South
Platte River basin, (iv) the middle Platte River basin, (v) the lower Platte
River basin, (vi) the Loup River basin, (vii) the Elkhorn River basin, (viii)
the Missouri tributaries basin, (ix) the Republican River basin, (x) the Little
Blue River basin, (xi) the Big Blue River basin, and (xii) the Nemaha River
-4-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
basin;
(b) One additional resident of each river basin which encompasses one or
more cities of the metropolitan class; and
(c) Fourteen members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by
the Legislature. Of the members appointed by the Governor, one shall represent
each of the following categories: Agribusiness interests; agricultural
interests; ground water irrigators; irrigation districts; manufacturing
interests; metropolitan utilities districts; municipal users of water from a
city of the primary class; municipal users of water from a city of the first or
second class or a village; outdoor recreation users; public power districts;
public power and irrigation districts; range livestock owners; surface water
irrigators; and wildlife conservation interests.
(3) Members of the commission described in subdivision (2)(a) of this
section shall be selected for four-year terms at individual caucuses of the
natural resources district directors residing in the river basin from which the
member is selected. Such caucuses shall be held for each basin within ten days
following the first Thursday after the first Tuesday of the year the term of
office of the member from that basin expires. The dates and locations for such
caucuses shall be established by the commission, and the commission shall
provide notice to the public by issuing press releases for publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in each county that comprises the river basin
for which a caucus election will be held. Terms of office of such members shall
follow the sequence originally determined by the river basin representatives to
the commission at their first meeting on the third Thursday after the first
Tuesday in January 1975. All river basin members shall take office on the third
Thursday after the first Tuesday in January following their selection and any
vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by a caucus held within thirty
days following the date such vacancy is created. Each member of the commission
representing a river basin shall qualify by filing with the other members of
the commission an acceptance in writing of his or her selection.
(4) Members of the commission described in subdivision (2)(b) of this
section shall be residents of natural resources districts which encompass one
or more cities of the metropolitan class and shall be selected in the same
manner, at the same time, and for a four-year term having the same term
sequence as provided for the other members from such basin under subsection (3)
of this section.
(5) For members of the commission described in subdivision (2)(c) of this
section:
(a) The Governor shall appoint the eleven additional members added by Laws
2014, LB1098, within thirty days after April 17, 2014. The eleven additional
appointments shall be for staggered four-year terms, as determined by the
Governor. The Governor shall also set the terms of the current members of the
commission appointed under such subdivision and serving on April 17, 2014, to
staggered four-year terms. Future appointments shall be for four-year terms.
Members whose terms have expired shall continue to serve until their successors
have been appointed. In the case of a vacancy, the Governor shall appoint a
successor for the unexpired term. Members may be removed for cause. Initial
appointees shall begin serving immediately following notice of appointment,
except that the member appointed representing municipal users of water from the
class of city or a village that is being represented by the current member
representing municipal users of water and the members representing surface
water irrigators and ground water irrigators shall not begin serving until the
term of the current member representative of the category expires or such
member resigns or is otherwise removed; and
(b) In appointing such members, the Governor shall:
(i) Create a broad-based commission which has knowledge of, has experience
with, and is representative of Nebraska's water use and economy;
(ii) Give recognition to the importance of both water quantity and water
quality; and
(iii) Appoint members who represent diverse geographic regions of the
state, including urban and rural areas, and represent, to the extent possible,
the racial and ethnic diversity of the state.
(6) After the members have been appointed as required under this section,
the commission shall revise or adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as
necessary to administer the Water Sustainability Fund pursuant to sections
2-1506 to 2-1513.
Sec. 14. Section 2-1507, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
2-1507 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Water
Sustainability Fund be equitably distributed statewide to the greatest extent
possible for the long term and give priority funding status to projects which
are the result of federal mandates.
(2) Distributions to assist municipalities with the cost of constructing,
upgrading, developing, and replacing sewer infrastructure facilities as part of
a combined sewer overflow project shall be based on a demonstration of need and
shall equal ten percent of the total annual appropriation to the Water
Sustainability Fund if (a) applicants have applied for such funding as required
under section 2-1509 and (b) any such application has been recommended for
further consideration by the Chief Water Officer director and is subsequently
approved for allocation by the commission pursuant to subsection (1) of section
2-1511. If more than one municipality demonstrates a need for funds pursuant to
this subsection, funds shall be distributed proportionally based on population.
(3) Any money in the Water Sustainability Fund may be allocated by the
-5-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
commission to applicants in accordance with sections 2-1506 to 2-1513. Such
money may be allocated in the form of grants or loans for water sustainability
programs, projects, or activities undertaken within the state. The allocation
of funds to a program, project, or activity in one form shall not of itself
preclude additional allocations in the same or any other form to the same
program, project, or activity. The commission shall, when ranking and scoring
applications for funding, prioritize projects for drinking water improvements
for any federally recognized Indian tribe whose drinking water is under a no-
drink order from the United States Environmental Protection Agency.
(4) When the commission has approved an allocation of funds to a program,
project, or activity, the department Department of Natural Resources shall
establish a subaccount in the Water Sustainability Fund and credit the entire
amount of the allocation to the subaccount. Individual subaccounts shall be
established for each program, project, or activity approved by the commission.
The commission may approve a partial allocation to a program, project, or
activity based upon available unallocated funds in the Water Sustainability
Fund, but the amount of unfunded allocations shall not exceed eleven million
dollars. Additional allocations to a program, project, or activity shall be
credited to the same subaccount as the original allocation. Subaccounts shall
not be subject to transfer out of the Water Sustainability Fund, except that
the commission may authorize the transfer of excess or unused funds from a
subaccount and into the unreserved balance of the fund.
(5) A natural resources district is eligible for funding from the Water
Sustainability Fund only if the district has adopted or is currently
participating in the development of an integrated management plan pursuant to
subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of section 46-715.
(6) The commission shall utilize the resources and expertise of and
collaborate with the department Department of Natural Resources, the University
of Nebraska, the Department of Environment and Energy, the Nebraska
Environmental Trust Board, and the Game and Parks Commission on funding and
planning for water programs, projects, or activities.
(7) A biennial report shall be made to the Clerk of the Legislature
describing the work accomplished by the use of funds towards the goals of the
Water Sustainability Fund beginning on December 31, 2015. The report submitted
to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 15. Section 2-1508, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1508 The commission shall rank and score applications for funding based
on criteria that demonstrate the extent to which a program, project, or
activity:
(1) Remediates or mitigates threats to drinking water;
(2) Meets the goals and objectives of an approved integrated management
plan or ground water management plan;
(3) Contributes to water sustainability goals by increasing aquifer
recharge, reducing aquifer depletion, or increasing streamflow;
(4) Contributes to multiple water supply management goals, including, but
not limited to, flood control, agricultural use, municipal and industrial uses,
recreational benefits, wildlife habitat, conservation of water resources, and
preservation of water resources;
(5) Maximizes the beneficial use of Nebraska's water resources for the
benefit of the state's residents;
(6) Is cost-effective;
(7) Helps the state meet its obligations under interstate compacts,
decrees, or other state contracts or agreements or federal law;
(8) Reduces threats to property damage or protects critical infrastructure
that consists of the physical assets, systems, and networks vital to the state
or the United States such that their incapacitation would have a debilitating
effect on public security or public health and safety;
(9) Improves water quality;
(10) Has utilized all available funding resources of the local
jurisdiction to support the program, project, or activity;
(11) Has a local jurisdiction with plans in place that support sustainable
water use;
(12) Addresses a statewide problem or issue;
(13) Contributes to the state's ability to leverage state dollars with
local or federal government partners or other partners to maximize the use of
its resources; and
(14) Contributes to watershed health and function. ; and
(15) Uses objectives described in the annual report and plan of work for
the state water planning and review process issued by the department.
Sec. 16. Section 2-1509, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1509 (1) Applicants for funds may file an application with the
department for a grant or loan from the Water Sustainability Fund. Applications
for grants to the department itself shall be filed by the department. Each
application shall be filed in such manner and form and be accompanied by such
information as may be prescribed by the Chief Water Officer director and the
commission.
(2) Any such application shall:
(a) Describe the nature and purpose of the proposed program, project, or
activity;
(b) Set forth or be accompanied by a plan for development of the proposed
program, project, or activity, together with engineering, economic, and
-6-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
financial feasibility data and information, and such estimated costs of
construction or implementation as may be required by the Chief Water Officer
director and the commission;
(c) State whether money other than that for which the application is made
will be used to help in meeting program, project, or activity costs and whether
such money is available or has been sought for this purpose;
(d) When appropriate, state that the applicant holds or can acquire title
to all lands or has the necessary easements and rights-of-way for the program,
project, or activity and related lands and has or may acquire all water rights
necessary for the proposed program, project, or activity;
(e) Show that the applicant possesses all necessary authority to undertake
or participate in the proposed program, project, or activity; and
(f) Demonstrate the probable environmental and ecological consequences
that may result from such proposed program, project, or activity.
(3) Upon receipt of an application, the Chief Water Officer director shall
evaluate and investigate all aspects of the proposed program, project, or
activity and the proposed schedule for development and completion of such
program, project, or activity, determine eligibility for funding, and make
appropriate recommendations to the commission pursuant to sections 2-1506 to
2-1513. As a part of his or her investigation, the Chief Water Officer director
shall consider whether the plan for development of the program, project, or
activity is satisfactory. If the Chief Water Officer director determines that
the plan is unsatisfactory or that the application does not contain adequate
information upon which to make determinations, the Chief Water Officer director
shall return the application to the applicant and may make such recommendations
to the applicant as are considered necessary to make the plan or the
application satisfactory.
(4) Requests for utilization of the Water Sustainability Fund for state
participation in any water and related land-water resources projects shall also
be filed with the department for the Chief Water Officer's director's
evaluation, investigation, and recommendations. Such requests shall be filed in
the manner and form and be accompanied by such information as shall be
prescribed by the department and the commission.
Sec. 17. Section 2-1510, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1510 (1) Each program, project, or activity for which funding is
requested, whether such request has as its origin an application or the action
of the department itself, shall be reviewed as provided in sections 2-1506 to
2-1513 by the Chief Water Officer director prior to the approval of any
allocation for such program, project, or activity by the commission.
(2) The Chief Water Officer director may recommend approval of and the
commission may approve grants or loans, including the appropriate repayment
period and the rate of interest, for program, project, or activity costs or
acquisition of interests in programs, projects, or activities if after
investigation and evaluation the Chief Water Officer director finds that:
(a) The plan does not conflict with any existing Nebraska state land plan;
(b) The proposed program, project, or activity is economically and
financially feasible based upon standards adopted by the commission pursuant to
sections 2-1506 to 2-1513;
(c) The plan for development of the proposed program, project, or activity
is satisfactory;
(d) The plan of development minimizes any adverse impacts on the natural
environment;
(e) The applicant is qualified, responsible, and legally capable of
carrying out the program, project, or activity;
(f) In the case of a loan, the borrower has demonstrated the ability to
repay the loan and there is assurance of adequate operation, maintenance, and
replacement during the repayment life of the program, project, or activity;
(g) The plan considers other plans and programs of the state and resources
development plans of the political subdivisions of the state; and
(h) The money required from the Water Sustainability Fund is available.
(3) The Chief Water Officer director and staff of the department shall
carry out their powers and duties under sections 2-1506 to 2-1513 independently
of and without prejudice to their powers and duties under other provisions of
law.
(4) No member of the commission shall be eligible to participate in the
action of the commission concerning an application for funding to any entity in
which such commission member has any interest. The Chief Water Officer director
may be delegated additional responsibilities consistent with the purposes of
sections 2-1506 to 2-1513. It shall be the sole responsibility of the
commission to determine the priority in which funds are allocated for eligible
programs, projects, or activities under section 2-1508.
Sec. 18. Section 2-1511, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1511 (1) The Chief Water Officer director shall make recommendations
based upon his or her review of the criteria set forth in section 2-1510 of
whether an application should be considered further or rejected and the form of
allocation he or she deems appropriate. The commission shall act in accordance
with such recommendations according to the application procedures adopted and
promulgated in rules and regulations.
(2) If, after review of the recommendation by the Chief Water Officer
director, the commission determines that an application for a grant, loan,
acquisition of an interest, or combination thereof pursuant to sections 2-1506
-7-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
to 2-1513 is satisfactory and qualified to be approved, before the final
approval of such application may be given and the funds allocated, the
department shall enter into an agreement in the name of the state with the
applicant agency or organization and with any other organizations it deems to
be involved in the program, project, or activity to which funds shall be
applied. The department shall also enter into such agreements as are
appropriate before allocation of any funds for the acquisition of an interest
in any qualified program, project, or activity when such acquisition is
initiated by the department itself pursuant to section 2-1512. All agreements
entered into pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to, a
specification of the amount of funds involved, whether the funds are considered
as a grant or loan or for the acquisition of an interest in the name of the
state, and, if a combination of these is involved, the amount of funds
allocated to each category, the specific purpose for which the allocation is
made, the terms of administration of the allocated funds, and any penalties to
be imposed upon the applicant organization should it fail to apply or repay the
funds in accordance with the agreement.
(3) If the allocation to be approved is a loan, the department and the
applicant or applicants shall include in the agreement provisions for repayment
to the Water Sustainability Fund of money loaned together with any interest at
reasonable rates as established by the commission. The agreement shall further
provide that repayment of the loan together with any interest thereon shall
commence no later than one full year after construction of the project or
implementation of the program or activity is completed and that repayment shall
be completed within the time period specified by the commission. The repayment
period shall not exceed fifty years, except that the commission may extend the
time for making repayment in the event of extreme emergency or hardship. Such
agreement shall also provide for such assurances of and security for repayment
of the loan as shall be considered necessary by the department.
(4) With the express approval of the commission, an applicant may convey
its interest in a program, project, or activity to a successor. The department
shall contract with the qualified successor in interest of the original obligor
for repayment of the loan together with any interest thereon and for succession
to its rights and obligations in any contract with the department.
(5) The state shall have a lien upon a program, project, or activity
constructed, improved, or renovated with money from the Water Sustainability
Fund for the amount of the loan together with any interest thereon. This lien
shall attach to all program, project, or activity facilities, equipment,
easements, real property, and property of any kind or nature in which the loan
recipient has an interest and which is associated with the program, project, or
activity. The department shall file a statement of the lien, its amount, terms,
and a description of the program, project, or activity with the register of
deeds of each county in which the program, project, or activity or any part
thereof is located. The register of deeds shall record the lien, and it shall
be indexed as other liens are required by law to be indexed. The lien shall be
valid until paid in full or otherwise discharged. The lien shall be foreclosed
in accordance with applicable state law governing foreclosure of mortgages and
liens. Any lien provided for by this section may be subordinate to that which
secures federal assistance or other secured assistance received on the same
program, project, or activity.
Sec. 19. Section 2-1588, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1588 (1) No money in the Nebraska Resources Development Fund may be
reallocated by the commission in accordance with sections 2-1586 to 2-1595 for
utilization by the department, by any state office, agency, board, or
commission, or by any political subdivision of the state which has the
authority to develop the state's water and related land resources after March
30, 2014. The commission may commit appropriated funds to projects approved as
of March 30, 2014, not to exceed amounts specifically allocated to such
projects prior to March 30, 2014, unless specific appropriations or transfers
to exceed the March 30, 2014, allocation amounts are approved by the
Legislature. If such specific appropriations or transfers are made, the
commission shall develop procedures to allocate the additional funding to
projects approved as of March 30, 2014. Allocations shall not exceed funds
appropriated for such purpose. Any of such funds remaining after all such
project costs have been completely funded shall be transferred to the Water
Sustainability Fund by the State Treasurer. Prior to March 30, 2014, the
Nebraska Resources Development Fund may be allocated in the form of grants or
loans or for acquiring state interests in water and related land resources
programs and projects undertaken within the state. The allocation of funds to a
program or project in one form shall not of itself preclude additional
allocations in the same or any other form to the same program or project. Funds
may also be allocated to assist natural resources districts in the preparation
of management plans as provided in section 46-709. Funds so allocated shall not
be subject to sections 2-1589 to 2-1595.
(2) No project, including all related phases, segments, parts, or
divisions, shall receive more than ten million dollars from the fund. On July 1
of each year after 1993, the Chief Water Officer director shall adjust the
project cost and payment limitation of this subsection by an amount equal to
the average percentage change in a readily available construction cost index
for the prior three years.
(3) Prior to September 1 of each even-numbered year, a biennial report
shall be made to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature describing the
-8-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
work accomplished by the use of such development fund during the immediately
preceding two-year period. The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically. The report shall include a complete
financial statement. Each member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic
copy of such report upon making a request to the Chief Water Officer director.
Sec. 20. Section 2-1592, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1592 (1) Any organization qualified to apply for and receive funds from
the Nebraska Resources Development Fund may file an application with the
department for a grant or loan from such fund. Applications for grants to the
department itself shall be filed by the department. Each application shall be
filed in such manner and form and be accompanied by such information as may be
prescribed by the Chief Water Officer director and the commission. No
applications may be made to receive funds by grant or loan from the Nebraska
Resources Development Fund after March 30, 2014.
(2) Any such application shall:
(a) Describe the nature and purpose of the proposed program or project;
(b) Set forth or be accompanied by a plan for development of the proposed
program or project, together with engineering, economic, and financial
feasibility data and information, and such estimated costs of construction or
implementation as may be required by the Chief Water Officer director and the
commission;
(c) State whether money other than that for which the application is made
will be used to help in meeting program or project costs and whether such money
is available or has been sought for this purpose;
(d) When appropriate, state that the applicant holds or can acquire title
to all lands or has the necessary easements and rights-of-way for the project
and related lands and has or may acquire all water rights necessary for the
proposed project;
(e) Show that the applicant possesses all necessary authority to undertake
or participate in the proposed program or project; and
(f) Demonstrate the probable environmental and ecological consequences
that may result from such proposed program or project.
(3) Upon receipt of an application, the Chief Water Officer director shall
evaluate and investigate all aspects of the proposed program or project and the
proposed schedule for development and completion of such program or project,
determine the eligibility of the program or project for funding, and make
appropriate recommendations to the commission pursuant to sections 2-1586 to
2-1595. As a part of his or her investigation, the Chief Water Officer director
shall consider whether the plan for development of the program or project is
satisfactory. If the Chief Water Officer director determines that the plan is
unsatisfactory or that the application does not contain adequate information
upon which to make determinations, the Chief Water Officer director shall
return the application to the applicant and may make such recommendations to
the applicant as are considered necessary to make the plan or the application
satisfactory.
(4) Requests for utilization of the Nebraska Resources Development Fund
for state participation in any water and related land-water resources projects
through acquisition of a state interest therein shall also be filed with the
department for the Chief Water Officer's director's evaluation, investigation,
and recommendations. Such requests shall be filed in the manner and form and be
accompanied by such information as shall be prescribed by the department and
the commission.
Sec. 21. Section 2-1593, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1593 Each program or project for which funding is requested, whether
such request has as its origin an application or the action of the department
itself, shall be reviewed as provided in sections 2-1586 to 2-1595 by the Chief
Water Officer director prior to the approval of any allocation for such program
or project by the commission. The Chief Water Officer director shall within a
reasonable time, not to exceed six months, after receipt of such request report
to the commission the results of his or her review and shall recommend approval
or rejection of funding for the program or project. The Chief Water Officer
director shall indicate what form of allocation he or she deems to be
appropriate. In the case of an approved application recommended for a loan, the
commission shall indicate the appropriate repayment period and the rate of
interest. The commission shall act in accordance with such recommendations
unless action to the contrary is approved by each commission member eligible to
vote on the specific recommendation under consideration. No member of the
commission shall be eligible to participate in the action of the commission
concerning an application for funding to any entity in which such commission
member has any interest. The Chief Water Officer director may be delegated
additional responsibilities consistent with the purposes of sections 2-1586 to
2-1595. It shall be the sole responsibility of the commission to determine the
priority in which funds are allocated for eligible programs and projects under
sections 2-1586 to 2-1595.
Sec. 22. Section 2-1594, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1594 The Chief Water Officer director may recommend approval of and the
commission may approve grants or loans for program or project costs or
acquisition of interests in projects if after investigation and evaluation the
Chief Water Officer director finds that:
(1) The plan does not conflict with any existing Nebraska state land plan;
-9-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(2) The proposed program or project is economically and financially
feasible based upon standards adopted by the commission pursuant to sections
2-1586 to 2-1595;
(3) The plan for development of the proposed program or project is
satisfactory;
(4) The plan of development minimizes any adverse impacts on the natural
environment;
(5) The applicant is qualified, responsible, and legally capable of
carrying out the program or project;
(6) In the case of a loan, the borrower has demonstrated the ability to
repay the loan and there is assurance of adequate operation, maintenance, and
replacement during the repayment life of the project;
(7) The plan considers other plans and programs of the state in accordance
with section 84-135 and resources development plans of the political
subdivisions of the state; and
(8) The money required from the Nebraska Resources Development Fund is
available.
The Chief Water Officer director and staff of the department shall carry
out their powers and duties under sections 2-1586 to 2-1595 independently of
and without prejudice to their powers and duties under other provisions of law.
Sec. 23. Section 2-1595, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1595 (1) If after review of the recommendation by the Chief Water
Officer director the commission determines that an application for a grant,
loan, acquisition of an interest, or combination thereof pursuant to sections
2-1586 to 2-1595 is satisfactory and qualified to be approved, before the final
approval of such application may be given and the funds allocated, the
department shall enter into an agreement in the name of the state with the
applicant agency or organization and with any other organizations it deems to
be involved in the program or project to which funds shall be applied. The
department shall also enter into such agreements as are appropriate before
allocation of any funds for the acquisition of interest in any qualified
project when such acquisition is initiated by the department itself pursuant to
section 2-1590. All agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall
include, but not be limited to, a specification of the amount of funds
involved, whether the funds are considered as a grant, loan, or for the
acquisition of an interest in the name of the state, and, if a combination of
these is involved, the amount of funds allocated to each category, the specific
purpose for which the allocation is made, the terms of administration of the
allocated funds, and any penalties to be imposed upon the applicant
organization should it fail to apply or repay the funds in accordance with the
agreement.
(2) If the allocation to be approved is a loan, the department and the
applicant or applicants shall include in the agreement provisions for repayment
to the Nebraska Resources Development Fund of money loaned together with any
interest at reasonable rates as established by the commission. The agreement
shall further provide that repayment of the loan together with any interest
thereon shall commence no later than one full year after construction of the
project is completed and that repayment shall be completed within the time
period specified by the commission. The repayment period shall not exceed fifty
years, except that the commission may extend the time for making repayment in
the event of extreme emergency or hardship. Such agreement shall also provide
for such assurances of and security for repayment of the loan as shall be
considered necessary by the department.
(3) With the express approval of the commission, an applicant may convey
its interest in a project to a successor. The department shall contract with
the qualified successor in interest of the original obligor for repayment of
the loan together with any interest thereon and for succession to its rights
and obligations in any contract with the department.
(4) The state shall have a lien upon a project constructed, improved, or
renovated with money from the fund for the amount of the loan together with any
interest thereon. This lien shall attach to all project facilities, equipment,
easements, real property, and property of any kind or nature in which the loan
recipient has an interest and which is associated with the project. The
department shall file a statement of the lien, its amount, terms, and a
description of the project with the county register of deeds of each county in
which the project or any part thereof is located. The county register of deeds
shall record the lien and it shall be indexed as other liens are required by
law to be indexed. The lien shall be valid until paid in full or otherwise
discharged. The lien shall be foreclosed in accordance with applicable state
law governing foreclosure of mortgages and liens. Any lien provided for by this
section may be subordinate to that which secures federal assistance or other
secured assistance received on the same project.
Sec. 24. Section 2-2626, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-2626 The department shall have the following powers, functions, and
duties:
(1) To administer, implement, and enforce the Pesticide Act and serve as
the lead state agency for the regulation of pesticides. The department shall
involve the natural resources districts and other state agencies, including the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy or the
Department of Natural Resources, in matters relating to water quality. Nothing
in the act shall be interpreted in any way to affect the powers of any other
-10-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
state agency or of any natural resources district to regulate for ground water
quality or surface water quality as otherwise provided by law;
(2) To be responsible for the development and implementation of a state
management plan and pesticide management plans. The Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy shall be responsible for the
adoption of standards for pesticides in surface water, ground water, and
drinking water. These standards shall be established as action levels in the
state management plan and pesticide management plans at which prevention and
mitigation measures are implemented. Such action levels may be set at or below
the maximum contaminant level set for any product as set by the federal agency
under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. 300f et seq., as the act
existed on January 1, 2021. The Department of Agriculture shall cooperate with
and use existing expertise in other state agencies when developing the state
management plan and pesticide management plans and shall not hire a hydrologist
within the department for such purpose;
(3) After notice and public hearing, to adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations providing lists of state-limited-use pesticides for the entire
state or for a designated area within the state, subject to the following:
(a) A pesticide shall be included on a list of state-limited-use
pesticides if:
(i) The Department of Agriculture determines that the pesticide, when used
in accordance with its directions for use, warnings, and cautions and for uses
for which it is registered, may without additional regulatory restrictions
cause unreasonable adverse effects on humans or the environment, including
injury to the applicator or other persons because of acute dermal or inhalation
toxicity of the pesticides;
(ii) The water quality standards set by the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Environment and Energy pursuant to this section are exceeded;
or
(iii) The Department of Agriculture determines that the pesticide requires
additional restrictions to meet the requirements of the Pesticide Act, the
federal act, or any plan adopted under the Pesticide Act or the federal act;
(b) The Department of Agriculture may regulate the specific time,
locations, and conditions restricting the use of a state-limited-use pesticide,
including allowable quantities or concentrations, and may require that it be
purchased or possessed only with permission or under the direct supervision of
the department or its designee;
(c) The Department of Agriculture may require a person authorized to
distribute or use a state-limited-use pesticide to maintain records of the
person's distribution or use and may require that the records be kept separate
from other business records;
(d) The state management plan and pesticide management plans shall be
coordinated with the Department of Agriculture and other state agency plans and
with other state agencies and with natural resources districts;
(e) The state management plan and pesticide management plans may impose
progressively more rigorous pesticide management practices as pesticides are
detected in ground water or surface water at increasing fractions of the
standards adopted by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy; and
(f) A pesticide management plan may impose progressively more rigorous
pesticide management practices to address any unreasonable adverse effect of
pesticides on humans or the environment. When appropriate, a pesticide
management plan may establish action levels for imposition of such
progressively more rigorous management practices based upon measurable
indicators of the adverse effect on humans or the environment;
(4) To adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary
for the enforcement and administration of the Pesticide Act. The regulations
may include, but not be limited to, regulations providing for:
(a) The collection of samples, examination of records, and reporting of
information by persons subject to the act;
(b) The safe handling, transportation, storage, display, distribution,
use, and disposal of pesticides and their containers;
(c) Labeling requirements of all pesticides required to be registered
under provisions of the act, except that such regulations shall not impose any
requirements for federally registered labels contrary to those required
pursuant to the federal act;
(d) Classes of devices which shall be subject to the Pesticide Act;
(e) Reporting and record-keeping requirements for persons distributing or
using pesticide products made available under 7 U.S.C. 136i-1 of the federal
act and for persons required to keep records under the Pesticide Act;
(f) Methods to be used in the application of pesticides when the
Department of Agriculture finds that such regulations are necessary to carry
out the purpose and intent of the Pesticide Act. Such regulations may include
methods to be used in the application of a restricted-use pesticide or state-
limited-use pesticide, may relate to the time, place, manner, methods,
materials, amounts, and concentrations in connection with the use of the
pesticide, may restrict or prohibit use of the pesticides in designated areas
during specified periods of time, and may provide specific examples and
technical interpretations of subdivision (4) of section 2-2646. The regulations
shall encompass all reasonable factors which the department deems necessary to
prevent damage or injury by drift or misapplication to (i) plants, including
forage plants, or adjacent or nearby property, (ii) wildlife in the adjoining
or nearby areas, (iii) fish and other aquatic life in waters in reasonable
-11-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
proximity to the area to be treated, (iv) surface water or ground water, and
(v) humans, animals, or beneficial insects. In adopting and promulgating such
regulations, the department shall give consideration to pertinent research
findings and recommendations of other agencies of the state, the federal
government, or other reliable sources. The department may, by regulation,
require that notice of a proposed use of a pesticide be given to landowners
whose property is adjacent to the property to be treated or in the immediate
vicinity thereof if the department finds that such notice is necessary to carry
out the purpose of the act;
(g) State-limited-use pesticides for the state or for designated areas in
the state;
(h) Establishment of the amount of any fee or fine as directed by the act;
(i) Establishment of the components of any state management plan or
pesticide management plan;
(j) Establishment of categories for licensed pesticide applicators in
addition to those established in 40 C.F.R. part 171, as such regulations
existed on January 1, 2019; and
(k) Establishment of a process for the issuance of permits for emergency-
use pesticides made available under 7 U.S.C. 136p of the federal act;
(5) To enter any public or private premises at any reasonable time to:
(a) Inspect and sample any equipment authorized or required to be
inspected under the Pesticide Act or to inspect the premises on which the
equipment is kept or stored;
(b) Inspect or sample any area exposed or reported to be exposed to a
pesticide or where a pesticide use has occurred;
(c) Inspect and sample any area where a pesticide is disposed of or
stored;
(d) Observe the use and application of and sample any pesticide;
(e) Inspect and copy any records relating to the distribution or use of
any pesticide or the issuance of any license, permit, or registration under the
act; or
(f) Inspect, examine, or take samples from any application equipment,
building, or place owned, controlled, or operated by any person engaging in an
activity regulated by the act if, from probable cause, it appears that the
application equipment, building, or place contains a pesticide;
(6) To sample, inspect, make analysis of, and test any pesticide found
within this state;
(7) To issue and enforce a written or printed order to stop the sale,
removal, or use of a pesticide if the Department of Agriculture has reason to
believe that the pesticide or use of the pesticide is in violation of any
provision of the act. The department shall present the order to the owner or
custodian of the pesticide. The person who receives the order shall not
distribute, remove, or use the pesticide until the department determines that
the pesticide or its use is in compliance with the act. This subdivision shall
not limit the right of the department to proceed as authorized by any other
provision of the act;
(8)(a) To sue in the name of the director to enjoin any violation of the
act. Venue for such action shall be in the county in which the alleged
violation occurred, is occurring, or is threatening to occur; and
(b) To request the county attorney or the Attorney General to bring suit
to enjoin a violation or threatened violation of the act;
(9) To impose or levy an administrative fine of not more than five
thousand dollars for each violation on any person who has violated any
provision, requirement, condition, limitation, or duty imposed by the act or
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act. A violation
means each action which violates any separate or distinct provision,
requirement, condition, limitation, or duty imposed by the act or rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(10) To cause a violation warning letter to be served upon the alleged
violator or violators pursuant to the act;
(11) To take reasonable measures to assess and collect all fees and fines
prescribed by the act and the rules or regulations adopted under the act;
(12) To access, inspect, and copy all books, papers, records, bills of
lading, invoices, and other information relating to the use, manufacture,
repackaging, and distribution of pesticides necessary for the enforcement of
the act;
(13) To seize, for use as evidence, without formal warrant if probable
cause exists, any pesticide which is in violation of the act or is not approved
by the Department of Agriculture or which is found to be used or distributed in
the violation of the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
under it;
(14) To adopt classifications of restricted-use pesticides as determined
by the federal agency under the federal act. In addition to the restricted-use
pesticides classified by the administrator, the Department of Agriculture may
also determine state-limited-use pesticides for the state or for designated
areas within the state as provided in subdivision (3) of this section;
(15) To receive grants-in-aid from any federal entity, and to enter into
cooperative agreements with any federal entity, any agency of this state, any
subdivision of this state, any agency of another state, any Indian tribe, or
any private person for the purpose of obtaining consistency with or assistance
in the implementation of the Pesticide Act. The Department of Agriculture may
reimburse any such entity from the Pesticide Administrative Cash Fund for the
work performed under the cooperative agreement. The department may delegate its
-12-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
administrative responsibilities under the act to cities of the metropolitan and
primary classes if it reasonably believes that such cities can perform the
responsibilities in a manner consistent with the act and the rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated under it;
(16) To prepare and adopt such plans as are necessary to implement any
requirements of the federal agency under the federal act;
(17) To request the assistance of the Attorney General or the county
attorney in the county in which a violation of the Pesticide Act has occurred
with the prosecution or enforcement of any violation of the act;
(18) To enter into a settlement agreement with any person regarding the
disposition of any license, permit, registration, or administrative fine;
(19) To issue a cease and desist order pursuant to section 2-2649;
(20) To deny an application or cancel, suspend, or modify the registration
of a pesticide pursuant to section 2-2632;
(21) To issue, cancel, suspend, modify, or place on probation any license
or permit issued pursuant to the act; and
(22) To make such reports to the federal agency as are required under the
federal act.
Sec. 25. Section 2-3202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-3202 For purposes of Chapter 2, article 32, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) Commission means the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission;
(2) Natural resources district or district means a natural resources
district operating pursuant to Chapter 2, article 32;
(3) Board means the board of directors of a district;
(4) Director means a member of the board;
(5) Other special-purpose districts means rural water districts, drainage
districts, reclamation districts, and irrigation districts;
(6) Manager means the chief executive hired by a majority vote of the
board to be the supervising officer of the district; and
(7) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources.
Sec. 26. Section 2-3225, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-3225 (1)(a) Each district shall have the power and authority to levy a
tax of not to exceed four and one-half cents on each one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation annually on all of the taxable property within such district
unless a higher levy is authorized pursuant to section 77-3444.
(b) Each district shall also have the power and authority to levy a tax
equal to the dollar amount by which its restricted funds budgeted to administer
and implement ground water management activities and integrated management
activities under the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act exceed
its restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities for FY2003-04, not
to exceed one cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation annually on
all of the taxable property within the district.
(c) In addition to the power and authority granted in subdivisions (1)(a)
and (b) of this section, each district located in a river basin, subbasin, or
reach that has been determined to be fully appropriated pursuant to section
46-714 or designated overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713 by the Chief
Water Officer Department of Natural Resources shall also have the power and
authority to levy a tax equal to the dollar amount by which its restricted
funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water management activities
and integrated management activities under the Nebraska Ground Water Management
and Protection Act exceed its restricted funds budgeted to administer and
implement ground water management activities and integrated management
activities for FY2005-06, not to exceed three cents on each one hundred dollars
of taxable valuation on all of the taxable property within the district for
fiscal year 2006-07 and each fiscal year thereafter through fiscal year
2017-18.
(d) In addition to the power and authority granted in subdivisions (a)
through (c) of this subsection, a district with jurisdiction that includes a
river subject to an interstate compact among three or more states and that also
includes one or more irrigation districts within the compact river basin may
annually levy a tax not to exceed ten cents per one hundred dollars of taxable
valuation of all taxable property in the district. The proceeds of such tax may
be used for the payment of principal and interest on bonds and refunding bonds
issued pursuant to section 2-3226.01. Such levy is not includable in the
computation of other limitations upon the district's tax levy.
(2) The proceeds of the tax levies authorized in subdivisions (1)(a)
through (c) of this section shall be used, together with any other funds which
the district may receive from any source, for the operation of the district.
When adopted by the board, the tax levies authorized in subdivisions (1)(a)
through (d) of this section shall be certified by the secretary to the county
clerk of each county which in whole or in part is included within the district.
Such levy shall be handled by the counties in the same manner as other levies,
and proceeds shall be remitted to the district treasurer. Such levy shall not
be considered a part of the general county levy and shall not be considered in
connection with any limitation on levies of such counties.
Sec. 27. Section 2-3241, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-3241 Each district shall have the power and authority to provide
-13-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
technical and other assistance as may be necessary or desirable in rural areas
to abate the lowering of water quality in the state caused by sedimentation,
effluent from feedlots, and runoff from cropland areas containing agricultural
chemicals. Such assistance shall be coordinated with the programs and the
stream quality standards as established by the department Department of
Environment and Energy.
Sec. 28. Section 2-3254, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-3254 (1) The board shall hold a hearing upon the question of the
desirability and necessity, in the interest of the public health, safety, and
welfare, of the establishment of or altering the boundaries of an existing
improvement project area and the undertaking of such a project, upon the
question of the appropriate boundaries describing affected land, upon the
propriety of the petition, and upon all relevant questions regarding such
inquiries. When a hearing has been initiated by petition, such hearing shall be
held within one hundred twenty days of the filing of such petition. Notice of
such hearing shall be published prior thereto once each week for three
consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published or of general circulation in
the district. Landowners within the limits of the territory described in the
petition and all other interested parties, including any appropriate agencies
of state or federal government, shall have the right to be heard. If the board
finds, after consultation with such appropriate agencies of state and federal
government and after the hearing, that the project conforms with all applicable
law and with the district's goals, criteria, and policies, it shall enter its
findings in the board's official records and shall, with the aid of such
engineers, surveyors, and other assistants as it may have chosen, establish an
improvement project area or alter the boundaries of an existing improvement
project area, proceed to make detailed plans and cost estimates, determine the
total benefits, and carry out the project as provided in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section. If the board finds that the project does not so conform,
the findings shall be entered in the board's records and copies of such
findings shall be furnished to the petitioners and the commission.
(2) When any such special project would result in the provision of
revenue-producing continuing services, the board shall, prior to commencement
of construction of such project, determine, by circulation of petitions or by
some other appropriate method, if such project can be reasonably expected to
generate sufficient revenue to recover the reimbursable costs thereof. If it is
determined that the project cannot be reasonably expected to generate
sufficient revenue, the project and all work in connection therewith shall be
suspended. If it is determined that the project can be reasonably expected to
generate sufficient revenue, the board shall divide the total benefits of the
project as provided in sections 2-3252 to 2-3254. If the proposed project
involves the supply of water for any beneficial use, including a public water
system as defined in section 71-5301, all plans and specifications for the
project shall be filed with the secretary of the district and the Director of
Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources, except that if such project
involves a public water system as defined in section 71-5301, the filing of the
information shall be with the Department of Environment and Energy rather than
the Director of Natural Resources. No construction of any such special project
shall begin until the plans and specifications for such improvement have been
approved by the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment. When such a special project involves a public water system as
defined in section 71-5301, the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
shall Director of Natural Resources and the Department of Environment and
Energy, if applicable, except that if such special project involves a public
water system as defined in section 71-5301, only the Department of Environment
and Energy shall be required to review such plans and specifications and
approve the same if in compliance with the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act and
departmental rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act. All
prescribed conditions having been complied with, each landowner within the
improvement project area shall, within any limits otherwise prescribed by law,
subscribe to a number of benefit units in proportion to the extent he or she
desires to participate in the benefits of the special project. As long as the
capacity of the district's facilities permit, participating landowners may
subscribe to additional units, within any limits otherwise prescribed by law,
upon payment of a unit fee for each such unit. The unit fees made and charged
pursuant to this section shall be levied and fixed by rules and regulations of
the district. The service provided may be withheld during the time such charges
levied upon such parcel of land are delinquent and unpaid. Such charges shall
be cumulative, and the service provided by the project may be withheld until
all delinquent charges for the operation and maintenance of such works of
improvement are paid for past years as well as for the current year. All such
charges, due and delinquent according to the rules and regulations of such
district and unpaid on June 1 after becoming due and delinquent, may be
certified by the governing authority of such district to the county clerk of
such county in which are situated the lands against which such charges have
been levied, and when so certified such charges shall be entered upon the tax
list and spread upon the tax roll the same as other special assessment taxes
are levied and assessed upon real estate, shall become a lien upon such real
estate along with other real estate taxes, and shall be collectible at the same
time, in the same manner, and in the same proceeding as other real estate taxes
are levied.
(3) When the special project would not result in the provision of revenue-
-14-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
producing continuing services, the board shall apportion the benefits thereof
accruing to the several tracts of land within the district which will be
benefited thereby, on a system of units. The land least benefited shall be
apportioned one unit of assessment, and each tract receiving a greater benefit
shall be apportioned a greater number of units or fraction thereof, according
to the benefits received. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the
district from establishing separate areas within the improvement project area
so as to permit future allocation of costs for particular portions of the work
to specific subareas. This subarea method of allocation shall not be used in
any improvement project area which has heretofore made a final apportionment of
units of benefits and shall not thereafter be changed except by compliance with
the procedure prescribed in this section.
(4) A notice shall be inserted for at least one week in a newspaper
published or of general circulation in the improvement project area stating the
time when and the place where the directors shall meet for the purpose of
hearing all parties interested in the apportionment of benefits by reason of
the improvement, at which time and place such parties may appear in person or
by counsel or may file written objections thereto. The directors shall then
proceed to hear and consider the same and shall make the apportionments fair
and just according to benefits received from the improvement. The directors,
having completed the apportionment of benefits, shall make a detailed report of
the same and file such report with the county clerk. The board of directors
shall include in such report a statement of the actual expenses incurred by the
district to that time which relate to the proposed project and the actual cost
per benefit unit thereof. Thereupon the board of directors shall cause to be
published, once each week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper published
or of general circulation in the improvement project area, a notice that the
report required in this subsection has been filed and notice shall also be sent
to each party appearing to have a direct legal interest in such apportionment,
which notice shall include the description of the lands in which each party
notified appears to have such interest, the units of benefit assigned to such
lands, the amount of actual costs assessable to date to such lands, and the
estimated total costs of the project assessable to such lands upon completion
thereof, as provided by sections 25-520.01 to 25-520.03. If the owners of
record title representing more than fifty percent of the estimated total
assessments file with the board within thirty days of the final publication of
such notice written objections to the project proposed, such project and work
in connection therewith shall be suspended, such project shall not be done in
such project area, and all expenses relating to such project incurred by and
accrued to the district may, at the direction of the board of directors, be
assessed upon the lands which were to have been benefited by the completion of
such improvement project in accordance with the apportionment of benefits
determined and procedures established in this section. Upon completing the
establishment of an improvement project area or altering the boundaries of an
existing improvement project area as provided in this subsection and upon
determining the reimbursable cost of the project and the period of time over
which such cost shall be assessed, the board of directors shall determine the
amount of money necessary to raise each year by special assessment within such
improvement project area and apportion the same in dollars and cents to each
tract benefited according to the apportionment of benefits as determined by
this section. The board of directors shall also, from time to time as it deems
necessary, order an additional assessment upon the lands and property benefited
by the project, using the original apportionment of benefits as a basis to
ascertain the assessment to each tract of land benefited, to carry out a
reasonable program of operation and maintenance upon the construction or
capital improvements involved in such project. The chairperson and secretary
shall thereupon return lists of such tracts with the amounts chargeable to each
of the county clerks of each county in which assessed lands are located, who
shall place the same on duplicate tax lists against the lands and lots so
assessed. Such assessments shall be collected and accounted for by the county
treasurer at the same time as general real estate taxes, and such assessments
shall be and remain a perpetual lien against such real estate until paid. All
provisions of law for the sale, redemption, and foreclosure in ordinary tax
matters shall apply to such special assessments.
Sec. 29. Section 2-3279, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-3279 All plans submitted by a district under section sections 2-3276 to
2-3278, except those filed in compliance with state requirements or for the
purpose of state financial assistance, shall be accorded a thirty-day period
for review and comment. Failure to reply within thirty days shall be conclusive
that the plans have been endorsed by the reviewing agency. All comments on
plans shall be reviewed by the district and alterations of the plans may be
made as the district deems appropriate. If any state agency comments indicate a
lack of conformance with the goals, criteria, and policies of any outdoor
recreation plan, any fish and wildlife plan, or indicate a conflict with state
policies or plans approved by the Legislature, such plans shall be altered as
deemed necessary by the district prior to proceeding with implementation.
Sec. 30. Section 2-3280, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-3280 No state funds shall be allocated or disbursed to a district unless
that district has submitted its master plan in accordance with sections 2-3229
and 2-3276 to 2-3280 and until the disbursing agency has determined that such
funds are for plans, facilities, works, and programs which are in conformance
-15-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
with the plans of the agency.
Sec. 31. Section 2-4602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-4602 The Legislature recognizes that erosion and sedimentation are
serious problems throughout the state. Changes in farm and ranch enterprises,
operations, and ownership, demands made upon farm and ranch enterprises which
do not encourage sound resource utilization, rapid shifts in land use from
agricultural and rural to nonagricultural and urban uses, construction of
streets, highways, pipelines, recreation areas, schools and universities,
public utilities and facilities, conversion of grasslands to croplands, and
other land-disturbing activities have caused excessive wind erosion and water
runoff and accelerated the process of soil erosion and sediment deposition.
This has resulted in the pollution of the waters of the state and damage to
domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational, fish and wildlife, and other
resources. It is declared to be the policy of the state to strengthen and
extend the present erosion and sediment control activities and programs of the
state for both rural and urban lands, to improve water quality, and to
establish and implement, through the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources and the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission, a statewide,
comprehensive, and coordinated erosion and sediment control program to reduce
damage from wind erosion and storm water runoff, to retard nonpoint pollution
from sediment and related pollutants, and to conserve and protect land, air,
and other resources of the state. This program shall be carried out by the
natural resources districts in cooperation with the counties, municipalities,
and other local governments and political subdivisions of the state and other
public and private entities.
Sec. 32. Section 2-4603, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-4603 For purposes of the Erosion and Sediment Control Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Commission means the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission;
(2) Conservation agreement means an agreement between the owner or
operator of a farm unit and the district in which the owner or operator agrees
to implement a farm unit conservation plan or, with the approval of the
district within which the farm unit is located, a portion of a farm unit
conservation plan. The agreement shall include a schedule for implementation
and may be conditioned on the district or other public entity furnishing
technical, planning, or financial assistance in the establishment of the soil
and water conservation practices necessary to implement the plan or a portion
of the plan;
(3) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources;
(4) District means a natural resources district;
(5) Erosion or sediment control practice means:
(a) The construction or installation and maintenance of permanent
structures or devices necessary to carry, to a suitable outlet away from any
building site, any commercial or industrial development, or any publicly or
privately owned recreational or service facility not served by a central storm
sewer system, any water which would otherwise cause erosion in excess of the
applicable soil-loss tolerance level and which does not carry or constitute
sewage or industrial or other waste;
(b) The employment of temporary devices or structures, temporary seeding,
fiber mats, plastic, straw, diversions, silt fences, sediment traps, or other
measures adequate either to prevent erosion in excess of the applicable soil-
loss tolerance level or to prevent excessive downstream sedimentation from land
which is the site of or is directly affected by any nonagricultural land-
disturbing activity; or
(c) The establishment and maintenance of vegetation upon the right-of-way
of any completed portion of any public street, road, or highway or the
construction or installation thereon of permanent structures or devices or
other measures adequate to prevent erosion of the right-of-way in excess of the
applicable soil-loss tolerance level;
(6) Excess erosion means the occurrence of erosion in excess of the
applicable soil-loss tolerance level which causes or contributes to an
accumulation of sediment upon the lands of any other person to the detriment or
damage of such other person;
(7) Farm unit conservation plan means a plan jointly developed by the
owner and, if appropriate, the operator of a farm unit and the district within
which the farm unit is located based upon the determined conservation needs for
the farm unit and identifying the soil and water conservation practices which
may be expected to prevent soil loss by erosion from that farm unit in excess
of the applicable soil-loss tolerance level. The plan may also, if practicable,
identify alternative practices by which such objective may be attained;
(8) Nonagricultural land-disturbing activity means a land change,
including, but not limited to, tilling, clearing, grading, excavating,
transporting, or filling land, which may result in soil erosion from wind or
water and the movement of sediment and sediment-related pollutants into the
waters of the state or onto lands in the state but does not include the
following:
(a) Activities related directly to the production of agricultural,
horticultural, or silvicultural crops, including, but not limited to, tilling,
planting, or harvesting of such crops;
(b) Installation of aboveground public utility lines and connections,
-16-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
fenceposts, sign posts, telephone poles, electric poles, and other kinds of
posts or poles;
(c) Emergency work to protect life or property;
(d) Activities related to the construction of housing, industrial, and
commercial developments on sites under two acres in size; and
(e) Activities related to the operation, construction, or maintenance of
industrial or commercial public power district or public power and irrigation
district facilities or sites when such activity is conducted pursuant to state
or federal law or is part of the operational plan for such facility or site;
(9) Person means any individual, partnership, limited liability company,
firm, association, joint venture, public or private corporation, trust, estate,
commission, board, institution, utility, cooperative, municipality or other
political subdivision of this state, interstate body, or other legal entity;
(10) Soil and water conservation practice means a practice which serves to
prevent erosion of soil by wind or water in excess of the applicable soil-loss
tolerance level from land used only for agricultural, horticultural, or
silvicultural purposes. Soil and water conservation practice includes, but is
not limited to:
(a) Permanent soil and water conservation practice, including the planting
of perennial grasses, legumes, shrubs, or trees, the establishment of grassed
waterways, the construction of terraces, and other permanent soil and water
practices approved by the district; and
(b) Temporary soil and water conservation practice, including the planting
of annual or biennial crops, use of strip-cropping, contour planting, minimum
or mulch tillage, and other cultural practices approved by the district; and
(11) Soil-loss tolerance level means the maximum amount of soil loss due
to erosion by wind or water, expressed in terms of tons per acre per year,
which is determined to be acceptable in accordance with the Erosion and
Sediment Control Act. Soil loss may be impacted by water erosion which may
include (a) sheet and rill erosion which includes relatively uniform soil loss
across the entire field slope which may leave small channels located at regular
intervals across the slope and (b) ephemeral gully erosion which occurs in
well-defined depressions or natural drainageways where concentrated overland
flow results in the convergence of rills forming deeper and wider channels.
Sec. 33. Section 2-4604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-4604 (1) The director shall, in cooperation with the commission, the
Department of Environment and Energy, the Natural Resources Conservation
Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, and other appropriate
state and federal agencies, develop and coordinate a comprehensive state
erosion and sediment control program designed to reduce soil erosion in this
state to tolerable levels. The program, which shall be reasonable and
attainable, shall include:
(a) The soil-loss tolerance level for the various types of soils in the
state;
(b) State goals and a state strategy for reducing soil losses on all lands
in the state to an amount no more than the applicable soil-loss tolerance
level;
(c) Guidelines for establishing priorities for implementation of the
program at the state and local levels;
(d) Types of assistance to be provided by the state to districts, cities,
and counties in the implementation of the state and local erosion and sediment
control programs; and
(e) Such other elements as the director deems appropriate in accordance
with the objectives of the Erosion and Sediment Control Act, including any
recommendations for further legislative or administrative action.
(2) The state erosion and sediment control program may be revised by the
director and the commission at any time. Before approving any such changes, the
director and the commission shall conduct at least four public hearings or
meetings to receive information from interested persons in different parts of
the state.
Sec. 34. Section 2-4901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-4901 (1) The Climate Assessment Response Committee is hereby created.
The office of the Governor shall be the lead agency and shall oversee the
committee and its activities. The committee shall be composed of
representatives appointed by the Governor with the approval of a majority of
the Legislature from livestock producers, crop producers, the Nebraska
Emergency Management Agency, and the Conservation and Survey Division and
Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Nebraska. The Director of
Agriculture or his or her designee, the chief executive officer of the
Department of Health and Human Services or his or her designee, and the
Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources or his or her
designee shall be ex officio members of the committee. Representatives from the
federal Consolidated Farm Service Agency and Federal Crop Insurance Corporation
may also serve on the committee at the invitation of the Governor. The
chairperson of the Committee on Agriculture of the Legislature and the
chairperson of the Committee on Natural Resources of the Legislature shall be
nonvoting, ex officio members of the committee. The Governor may appoint a
member of the Governor's Policy Research Office and any other state agency
representatives or invite any other federal agencies to name representatives as
he or she deems necessary. The Governor shall appoint one of the Climate
Assessment Response Committee members to serve as the chairperson of the
-17-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
committee. Committee members shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in
sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(2) The committee shall meet at least twice each year and shall meet more
frequently (a) at the call of the chairperson, (b) upon request of a majority
of the committee members, and (c) during periods of drought or other severe
climate situations.
(3) The chairperson may establish subcommittees and may invite
representatives of agencies other than those with members on the committee to
serve on such subcommittees.
(4) Any funds for the activities of the committee and for other climate-
related expenditures may be appropriated directly to the office of the Governor
for contracting with other agencies or persons for tasks approved by the
committee.
Sec. 35. Section 13-1701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
13-1701 For purposes of sections 13-1701 to 13-1714 and 76-2,119:
(1) Applicant shall mean any person as defined in section 81-1502 who is
required to obtain a permit from the department for a solid waste disposal area
or a solid waste processing facility but shall not include any person applying
for renewal of such a permit or any person as defined in such section who
proposes to dispose of waste which he or she generates on property which he or
she owns as of January 1, 1991;
(2) Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(3) Solid waste disposal area shall mean an area used for the disposal of
solid waste from more than one residential premises or from one or more
recreational, commercial, industrial, manufacturing, or governmental
operations; and
(4) Solid waste processing facility shall mean an incinerator or a compost
plant receiving material, other than yard waste, in quantities greater than one
thousand cubic yards annually.
Sec. 36. Section 13-2008, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
13-2008 Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy.
Sec. 37. Section 13-2009, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
13-2009 Director shall mean the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy.
Sec. 38. Section 13-2042.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2042.01 (1) The department Department of Environment and Energy shall
rebate to the municipality or county of origin ten cents of the disposal fee
required by section 13-2042 for solid waste disposed of at landfills regulated
by the department or transported for disposal out of state from a solid waste
processing facility holding a permit under the Integrated Solid Waste
Management Act and when such solid waste originated in a municipality or county
with a purchasing policy approved by the department. The fee shall be rebated
on a schedule agreed upon between the municipality or county and the
department. The schedule shall be no more often than quarterly and no less
often than annually.
(2) Any municipality or county may apply to the department for the rebate
authorized in subsection (1) of this section if the municipality or county has
a written purchasing policy in effect requiring a preference for purchasing
products, materials, or supplies which are manufactured or produced from
recycled material. The policy shall provide that the preference shall not
operate when it would result in the purchase of products, materials, or
supplies which are of inadequate quality as determined by the municipality or
county. Upon receipt of an application, the department Department of
Environment and Energy shall submit the application to the materiel division of
the Department of Administrative Services for review. The materiel division
shall review the application for compliance with this section and any rules and
regulations adopted pursuant to this section and to determine the probable
effectiveness in assuring that a preference is given to products, materials, or
supplies which are manufactured or produced from recycled material. The
materiel division shall provide a report of its findings to the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Department of Environment and Energy within
thirty days after receiving the review request. The department Department of
Environment and Energy shall approve the application or suggest modifications
to the application within sixty days after receiving the application based on
the materiel division's report, any analysis by the department Department of
Environment and Energy, and any factors affecting compliance with this section
or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section.
(3) A municipality or county shall file a report complying with the rules
and regulations adopted pursuant to this section with the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Department of Environment and Energy before April 1 of
each year documenting purchasing practices for the past calendar year in order
to continue receiving the rebate. The report shall include, but not be limited
to, quantities of products, materials, or supplies purchased which were
manufactured or produced from recycled material. The department shall provide
copies of each report to the materiel division in a timely manner. If the
department determines that a municipality or county is not following the
purchasing policy presented in the approved application or that the purchasing
-18-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
policy presented in the approved application is not effective in assuring that
a preference is given to products, materials, or supplies which are
manufactured or produced from recycled material, the department shall suspend
the rebate until it determines that the municipality or county is giving a
preference to products, materials, or supplies which are manufactured or
produced from recycled material pursuant to a written purchasing policy
approved by the department subsequent to the suspension. The materiel division
may make recommendations to the department regarding suspensions and
reinstatements of rebates. The Department of Administrative Services may adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations establishing procedures for reviewing
applications and for annual reports.
(4) Any suspension of the rebate or denial of an application made under
this section may be appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(5) The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
establishing criteria for application procedures, for accepting and denying
applications, for required reports, and for suspending and reinstating the
rebate. The materiel division shall recommend to the council criteria for
accepting and denying applications and for suspending and reinstating the
rebate. The materiel division may make other recommendations to the council
regarding rules and regulations authorized under this section.
Sec. 39. Section 16-6,106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
16-6,106 Cities of the first class are hereby authorized and empowered to
develop and implement and from time to time amend, change, and modify a general
plan or program of flood and storm water control, drainage, and disposal for
such city. If the plan or program requires works of improvement outside of the
city limits, it shall be submitted for review to the boards of the county or
counties affected and to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources. To accomplish such purposes, or any of them, the city may to
the extent deemed needful or useful in the judgment of the city council:
(1) Procure and contract for professional and technical assistance of all
kinds;
(2) Build, construct, alter, modify, and improve, using either its own
employees, equipment, and facilities or by contract with others, dams, dikes,
levees, drainways, channels, structures, devices, storm water sewers and
systems, and works of all kinds and appurtenances thereto all without any
limitation whatsoever, including extensions, additions, and improvements and
alterations of any such existing facilities, for the control, management,
drainage, and disposal of flood, storm, or surface waters, both within and
without the city as in the discretion of the city council may be required for
the protection, benefit, and welfare of the city and its inhabitants and their
property; and
(3) Acquire by purchase, lease, gift, and contract and through the
exercise of the right of eminent domain all lands, structures, easements,
rights-of-way, or other property real or personal both within and without the
city as may in the discretion of the city council be required or useful in
connection with any such plan or program and the implementation thereof.
Sec. 40. Section 19-1201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
19-1201 (1) There is hereby established the Revitalize Rural Nebraska
Grant Program. The governing body of a city of the first class, a city of the
second class, or a village may apply, on behalf of the city or village, to the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy for
approval of a dilapidated commercial property demolition grant. The Director of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy shall prescribe the form
and manner of application.
(2) The department shall award the grants annually on a competitive basis
beginning in fiscal year 2023-24 subject to available funds. The department
shall give priority to applications from cities of the second class and
villages. If there are funds remaining at the end of each grant period, the
department shall consider applications from cities of the first class. A city
or village may apply for more than one grant. The department shall give
preference to new applicants.
(3) There shall be no limit on the amount that can be awarded to each
applicant within the available funding. It is the intent of the Legislature
that if the department does not award all of the available appropriation for
grants under the program, the unobligated amount of the appropriation shall be
reappropriated for the next fiscal year to be awarded during the next grant
period.
Sec. 41. Section 19-1202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
19-1202 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy shall award a grant to a city or village under the Revitalize Rural
Nebraska Grant Program based on a completed application that demonstrates:
(1) A dilapidated commercial property within the corporate limits of the
city or village is in need of demolition;
(2) The city or village owns the property or is completing the process
prescribed in section 18-1722;
(3) The property has been abandoned or vacant for at least six months
prior to application;
(4) The property is not listed, or eligible to be listed, on the National
Register of Historic Places; and
-19-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(5) The city or village is able to contribute matching funds, whether in
cash or in-kind donations, in the amount of ten percent for a village, fifteen
percent for a city of the second class, and twenty percent for a city of the
first class.
Sec. 42. Section 19-1203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
19-1203 If a city or village fails to engage in the demolition of the
commercial property identified in the application for a grant under the
Revitalize Rural Nebraska Grant Program within twenty-four months after
receiving the grant, the city or village shall return the grant to the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy. The
department shall remit such grant money to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Revitalize Rural Nebraska Fund.
Sec. 43. Section 19-1204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
19-1204 The Revitalize Rural Nebraska Fund is created. The Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy shall use the fund for
the Revitalize Rural Nebraska Grant Program. The fund shall include transfers
as directed by the Legislature, money from grants returned under section
19-1203, and money from private contributions and other sources provided for
purposes of the program. Any money in the Revitalize Rural Nebraska Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Any interest earned on the fund shall be used for the program.
Sec. 44. Section 19-5706, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
19-5706 The Department of Economic Development may consult with statewide
associations representing municipal officials, economic developers, the
Department of Transportation, and the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy in order to carry out the Municipality
Infrastructure Aid Act.
Sec. 45. Section 25-1062.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-1062.01 (1) As The words Director of Natural Resources as used in this
section and in sections 25-1064, 25-2159, and 25-2160, Chief Water Officer
means mean the Chief Water Officer Director of the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Natural Resources, State of Nebraska, his or her successor in
office, or any agent, servant, employee, or officer of the State of Nebraska,
now or hereafter exercising any powers or duties with respect to the
administration of the irrigation water in the state, who may be a party in any
court of the state in an action when the relief demanded involves the delivery
of irrigation water.
(2) Whenever notice by either registered or certified letter to an
appropriator is required in such sections, the address of the appropriator
shall be that recorded in the office of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources under section 46-230.
Sec. 46. Section 25-1064, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
25-1064 (1) The injunction may be granted at the time of commencing the
action or at any time afterward before judgment by the Court of Appeals or the
Supreme Court or any judge thereof. No restraining order or temporary
injunction should be granted at the time of the commencement of the action if
the relief demanded involves the delivery of irrigation water and the Chief
Water Officer Director of Natural Resources, as defined in section 25-1062.01,
is a party except in accordance with the procedure prescribed in subsection (5)
of this section.
(2) No temporary injunction may be granted without notice to the adverse
party.
(3) Any judge of the district court, except when the relief demanded
involves the delivery of irrigation water and the Chief Water Officer director
is a party, may grant a temporary restraining order without notice to the
adverse party or his or her attorney only if (a) it clearly appears from
specific facts shown by affidavit that immediate and irreparable injury, loss,
or damage will result to the applicant before the adverse party or his or her
attorney can be heard in opposition and (b) the applicant or his or her
attorney certifies to the court in writing the efforts, if any, which have been
made to give such notice and the reasons supporting the applicant's claim that
such notice shall not be required.
Every temporary restraining order granted without notice shall: (i) Be
endorsed with the date and hour of issuance; (ii) be filed immediately in the
office of the clerk of the district court and entered of record; (iii) define
the injury and state why the injury is irreparable and why the order was
granted without notice; and (iv) expire by its terms within such time after
entry, not to exceed ten days, as the court fixes unless within such fixed time
period the order, for good cause shown, is extended for a like period or unless
the party against whom the order is directed consents to an extension for a
longer period. The reasons for the extension shall be entered of record. If a
temporary restraining order is granted without notice, the motion for a
temporary injunction shall be heard at the earliest possible time in the
district court and shall take precedence over all matters except older matters
of the same character. When the motion for a temporary injunction comes up for
hearing, the party who obtained the temporary restraining order shall proceed
with the application for a temporary injunction, and if he or she does not do
-20-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
so, the district court shall dissolve the temporary restraining order. On two
days' notice to the party who obtained the temporary restraining order without
notice or on such shorter notice to such party as the district court may
prescribe, the adverse party may appear and move for the dissolution or
modification of the order, and in that event, the court shall proceed to hear
and determine such motion as expeditiously as the ends of justice require.
(4) In the absence from the county of the district judges, any judge of
the county court, except when the relief demanded involves the delivery of
irrigation water and the Chief Water Officer director is a party, may grant a
temporary restraining order without notice to the adverse party or his or her
attorney only if (a) it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit
that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the
applicant before the adverse party or his or her attorney can be heard in
opposition and (b) the applicant or his or her attorney certifies to the court
in writing the efforts, if any, which have been made to give such notice and
the reasons supporting the applicant's claim that such notice shall not be
required. The judge of the county court shall direct that reasonable notice be
given to the party against whom the temporary restraining order is issued to
attend at a specified time or place before the district court or any judge
thereof to show cause why a temporary injunction should not be issued.
Every temporary restraining order granted without notice shall: (i) Be
endorsed with the date and hour of issuance; (ii) be filed immediately in the
office of the clerk of the district court and entered of record; (iii) define
the injury and state why the injury is irreparable and why the order was
granted without notice; and (iv) expire by its terms within such time after
entry, not to exceed ten days, as the judge of the county court fixes unless
within such fixed time period the order, for good cause shown, is extended by
the district court for a like period or unless the party against whom the order
is directed consents to an extension for a longer period. The reasons for the
extension shall be entered of record.
(5) The Supreme Court or any judge thereof, the Court of Appeals or any
judge thereof, the district court or any judge thereof, or a judge of the
county court, if and when he or she has jurisdiction, shall have no power, when
the relief demanded involves the delivery of irrigation water and the Chief
Water Officer director is a party, to grant a restraining order or temporary
injunction at the time of the commencement of the action, except when notice by
either registered or certified letter has been mailed seventy-two hours prior
to the time of hearing to the Chief Water Officer director and the division
supervisor in the water division created by section 61-212 in which the action
is brought and, in the manner provided in section 25-1062.01, to all
appropriators whose rights to the delivery of irrigation water might in any
manner be affected, of the time and place of the hearing. At the hearing on the
restraining order or temporary injunction, the Chief Water Officer director,
appropriators, or riparian owners shall be entitled to be heard, in person or
by their attorney or attorneys, on the question of whether the restraining
order should be granted and, if so, in what amount the bond or undertaking is
to be fixed.
(6) Any person, natural or artificial, injured or likely to be injured by
the granting of a restraining order may intervene in the action at any stage of
the proceedings and become a party to the litigation if it involves the
delivery of irrigation water and the Chief Water Officer director is a party.
Sec. 47. Section 25-1920, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
25-1920 In all actions in which a temporary injunction has been granted
and entered in the district court, which order allowing the temporary
injunction is or has been superseded for by law, and in which action the trial
court, on the merits, determined that the temporary injunction ought not to
have been granted and a permanent injunction was refused in such action, such
cause shall be advanced by the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court for hearing.
In all such actions, if the relief demanded involves the delivery of irrigation
water, and the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources, as defined in
section 25-1062.01, is a party, any appeal from the judgment or decree of the
district court shall be perfected within thirty days after the entry of such
judgment, decree, or final order by the district court, and the cause shall be
advanced for hearing before the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court.
Sec. 48. Section 25-2159, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
25-2159 When the right to require the performance of the act is clear and
it is apparent that no valid excuse can be given for not performing it, a
peremptory mandamus may be allowed in the first instance. In all other cases,
the alternative writ must be first issued, except that a peremptory mandamus in
the first instance shall not be given in any case involving the delivery of
irrigation water if the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources as
defined in section 25-1062.01 is a party.
Sec. 49. Section 25-2160, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
25-2160 The motion for the writ must be made upon affidavit. The court may
require a notice of the application to be given to the adverse party, may grant
an order to show cause why it should not be allowed, or may grant the writ
without notice. No peremptory writ of mandamus shall be allowed in any case
involving the delivery of irrigation water if the Chief Water Officer Director
of Natural Resources, as defined in section 25-1062.01, is a party unless
notice by either registered or certified mail has been given, as provided
-21-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
therein, seventy-two hours prior to the time of hearing to the Chief Water
Officer director and division supervisor in the water division created by
section 61-212 in which the action is brought and to all appropriators whose
rights to the delivery of water might in any manner be affected, of the time
and place of the hearing. In such case, any person, natural or artificial,
injured or likely to be injured by the granting of such writ, may intervene in
such action at any stage of the proceedings and become a party to such
litigation.
Sec. 50. Section 31-415, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
31-415 The drainage district shall have power to purchase such real estate
or easement therein as it may need, and if it cannot agree on the purchase
price of any needed real estate or easement therein, it shall have power to
condemn the same whether the property be within the limits of such district or
outside its boundaries. The exercise of the right of eminent domain on areas
outside the boundaries of the district shall be limited only to those projects
which have been approved by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources. This limitation shall not apply to any drainage district
subject to the supervision of the United States Army Corps of Engineers. The
procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in
sections 76-704 to 76-724. If such drainage district finds it expedient or
necessary for the maintenance of any part of its improvement already
constructed to add thereto further construction in the nature of a settling
basin into which waters will be permitted to flow for the purpose of dropping
silt before finding their outlet into any part of the main or lateral ditches
of such drainage district improvement, such drainage district, if not able to
agree with the landowner on the yearly cash rental of any premises taken and
used for such purpose, shall have the right to condemn for the purpose of
fixing the yearly rental for the land so taken. If such drainage district takes
or damages any real estate of any minor or protected person, the guardian or
conservator of such minor or protected person may agree and settle with the
drainage district for all damages or claims by reason of taking such real
estate or easement and may give valid releases and discharges therefor.
Sec. 51. Section 31-508, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
31-508 If a sanitary drainage district has constructed one or more
channels, drains, or ditches from a city of the primary class to or beyond the
boundaries of the district downstream and there remains from the lower terminus
of such improvement a portion or continuation of the watercourse unimproved,
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources shall
investigate the conditions of such watercourse, and if the department
determines that further improvement in such watercourse downstream is for the
interest of lands adjacent to such watercourse below the point of the
improvement, the department shall file a plan of such improvement in the office
of the county clerk of each of the counties in which any of the lands to be
benefited are situated and in which any portion of the watercourse to be
improved is located. Such plan shall describe the boundaries of the district to
be benefited and shall contain an estimate of the benefits that would accrue to
the sanitary district by reason of such improvement as well as the cost thereof
and an estimate of the special benefits that would accrue to lands adjacent to
the watercourse by reason of improved drainage, such estimate being detailed as
to the various tracts of land under separate ownership as shown by the records
of the county in which such lands are situated.
Sec. 52. Section 31-509, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
31-509 When the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources files a report and estimate, the county clerk of such county shall
publish a notice once each week for three weeks in a newspaper published in the
county seat of each of the counties having land within the sanitary drainage
district, which notice shall state the filing of the report and estimate, the
boundaries of the district to be benefited, that an election will be held at
the office of the county clerk between the hours of 8 a.m. and 6 p.m. on a day
named in the notice, and that at the election the question of the formation of
a sanitary drainage district to include the area described in the report will
be determined. The election shall be held in accordance with sections 31-406 to
31-408, except that no directors shall be elected. If a majority vote for the
creation of a district based on acreage represented, the sanitary drainage
district shall have jurisdiction to make the improvements recommended by the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources and to levy a
special assessment on the lands specially benefited. If a majority vote against
the creation of a district, the work shall not be done.
Sec. 53. Section 31-515, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
31-515 The proceedings for imposing of special assessment by the board of
trustees shall be, as nearly as may be, according to those for special
assessments by the mayor and council under the law governing cities of the
first class. If improvements are recommended by the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources and a sanitary drainage district is
formed adjacent to a watercourse previously improved above such district
pursuant to sections 31-508 and 31-509, the board of trustees shall advertise
for bids for the construction of such improvements as are recommended by the
department and in accordance with plans recommended by the department.
Sec. 54. Section 31-516, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
-22-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
to read:
31-516 Upon the completion of the improvement, notice shall be given that
the trustees will sit as a board of equalization, at a day and hour in such
notice stated, for the purpose of equalizing the assessments of such portion of
the cost of such improvement as the report of the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Natural Resources finds to represent the special benefits of
the land the drainage of which such improvements would improve. At such hearing
such board of equalization shall hear all complaints with reference to the
assessments proposed under the findings of the department. The trustees sitting
as a board of equalization shall have power to increase or decrease such
special assessments to the end that the property shall be assessed its
equitable portion of the cost of such improvement, but not exceeding in the
aggregate the percentage of the total cost recommended by the department to be
assessed against such property and not exceeding in any case the actual special
benefits accruing to such land. Notice of such meeting of the board of
equalization shall be given by publishing a notice thereof in a paper,
published in the county seat in each of the counties where any of the lands to
be assessed are situated, once each week for three consecutive weeks. Appeals
from the findings of such board of equalization may be taken in the manner
provided for appeals from assessments of drainage districts organized under
sections 31-401 to 31-450.
Sec. 55. Section 31-1003, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
31-1003 Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources.
Sec. 56. Section 31-1015, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
31-1015 Obstruction shall mean any wall, wharf, embankment, levee, dike,
pile, abutment, projection, excavation, channel rectification, bridge, conduit,
culvert, building, wire, fence, rock, gravel, refuse, fill, or other analogous
structure or matter which may impede, retard, or change the direction of the
flow of water, either in itself or by catching or collecting debris carried by
such water, or that is placed where the natural flow of the water would carry
such structure or matter downstream to the damage or detriment of either life
or property. Obstruction shall not include a dam designed to store or divert
water for which permission for construction has been obtained from the Chief
Water Officer Department of Natural Resources pursuant to the Safety of Dams
and Reservoirs Act.
Sec. 57. Section 37-707, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
37-707 (1) The commission is directed to place suitable signs showing the
boundaries of the refuges, as designated in section 37-706, using the map
adopted by the commission Department of Natural Resources pursuant to this
section, on all roads leading into such refuges.
(2)(a) The commission Department of Natural Resources shall adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations determining the boundaries of the state game
refuges. The commission's department's determination shall be based on the
definitions in sections 37-701 to 37-708 and shall include maps showing such
boundaries.
(b) The department shall make the initial boundary determinations for the
state game refuge in Garden County by March 1, 2005. The department shall make
the initial boundary determinations for the remaining state game refuges by
January 1, 2006.
(c) Until the initial determinations are made pursuant to subdivision (a)
of this subsection, the boundaries that have been determined and maintained by
the commission shall remain in effect.
(b) (d) The commission department shall update any boundary determination
required by subdivision (a) of this subsection whenever it determines that
there has been a substantial change in the location of the banks of said stream
used for locating such boundary.
(c) (e) To the extent necessary to fulfill their obligations under
sections 37-701 to 37-708 and pursuant to notice as provided in subdivision (d)
(f) of this subsection, the department and the commission shall have access at
all reasonable times to all properties to which access is needed to fulfill
such obligations. Entry upon such properties for the purposes set forth in such
sections shall not be considered trespass.
(d) (f) Notice of intent to enter upon property for the purposes of
subdivision (2)(c) (2)(e) of this section shall be satisfied by publishing such
notice at least once each week for three consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper
published or of general circulation in the county or counties in which such
property and such game refuge are located.
(e) All rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this
section by the Department of Natural Resources as it existed prior to July 1,
2025, shall remain in effect unless revised, amended, repealed, or nullified
pursuant to law.
Sec. 58. Section 37-708.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-708.01 (1) The validity of any rule or regulation adopted by the
commission Department of Natural Resources pursuant to sections 37-701 to
37-708 may be determined pursuant to section 84-911.
(2) Any person aggrieved by any other order or act of the department or
commission pursuant to its authority under sections 37-701 to 37-708 may,
within thirty days after notice thereof, file a petition in the district court
-23-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
of the county in which the aggrieved person resides or, if the aggrieved person
is not a resident of Nebraska, in the district court of Lancaster County, for
review. The court shall summarily hear the petition as a case in equity without
a jury and may order only declaratory or prospective injunctive relief with
regard to such order or act.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the appeal
procedures described in the Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to
actions taken pursuant to sections 37-701 to 37-708.
(4) The appeal procedures described in sections 61-206 and 61-207 do not
apply to actions taken pursuant to sections 37-701 to 37-708.
Sec. 59. Section 37-806, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
37-806 (1)(a) Any species of wildlife or wild plants determined to be an
endangered species pursuant to the Endangered Species Act shall be an
endangered species under the Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act,
and any species of wildlife or wild plants determined to be a threatened
species pursuant to the Endangered Species Act shall be a threatened species
under the Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act.
(b) Within a reasonable time after any federal listing, downlisting,
removal, or uplisting, the commission may determine that any species of
wildlife or wild plant should receive a different state-listed status
throughout all or any portion of the range of such species within this state by
completing the formal listing process as prescribed in this section or by
retaining its previous state-listed status.
(2) In addition to the species determined to be endangered or threatened
pursuant to the Endangered Species Act, the commission shall, by adopting and
promulgating rules and regulations, determine whether any species of wildlife
or wild plants normally occurring within this state is an endangered or
threatened species as a result of any of the following factors:
(a) The present or threatened destruction, modification, or curtailment of
its habitat or range;
(b) Overutilization for commercial, recreational, scientific, educational,
or other purposes;
(c) Disease or predation;
(d) The inadequacy of existing regulatory mechanisms; or
(e) Other natural or manmade factors affecting its continued existence
within this state.
(3)(a) The commission shall make determinations required by subsection (2)
of this section on the basis of the best scientific, commercial, and other data
available to the commission.
(b) Except with respect to species of wildlife or wild plants determined
to be endangered or threatened species under subsection (1) of this section,
the commission shall not add a species to nor remove a species from any list
published pursuant to subsection (5) of this section unless the commission has
first:
(i) Provided public notice of such proposed action by publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in each county in that portion of the subject
species' range in which it is endangered or threatened or, if the subject
species' range extends over more than five counties, in a newspaper of
statewide circulation distributed in the county;
(ii) Provided notice of such proposed action to and allowed comment from
the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy, the Department of Natural Resources, and any other
state agency that the commission determines might be impacted by the proposed
action;
(iii) Provided notice of such proposed action to and allowed comment from
each natural resources district and public power district located in that
portion of the subject species' range in which it is endangered or threatened;
(iv) Notified the Governor of any state sharing a common border with this
state, in which the subject species is known to occur, that such action is
being proposed;
(v) Allowed at least sixty days following publication for comment from the
public and other interested parties;
(vi) Held at least one public hearing on such proposed action in each game
and parks commissioner district of the subject species' range in which it is
endangered or threatened;
(vii) Submitted the scientific, commercial, and other data that is the
basis of the proposed action to scientists or experts outside and independent
of the commission for peer review of the data and conclusions. If the
commission submits the data to a state or federal fish and wildlife agency for
peer review, the commission shall also submit the data to scientists or experts
not affiliated with such an agency for review. For purposes of this section,
state fish and wildlife agency does not include a postsecondary educational
institution; and
(viii) For species proposed to be added under this subsection but not for
species proposed to be removed under this subsection, developed an outline of
the potential impacts, requirements, or rules and regulations that may be
placed on private landowners, or on other persons who hold state-recognized
property rights on behalf of themselves or others, as a result of the listing
of the species or the development of a proposed program for the conservation of
the species as required in subsection (1) of section 37-807.
(c) The inadvertent failure to provide notice as required by subdivision
(3)(b) of this section shall not prohibit the listing of a species and shall
-24-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
not be deemed to be a violation of the Administrative Procedure Act or the
Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act.
(d) When the commission proposes to add or remove a species under this
subsection, public notice under subdivision (3)(b)(i) of this section shall
include, but not be limited to, (i) the species proposed to be listed and a
description of that portion of its range in which the species is endangered or
threatened, (ii) a declaration that the commission submitted the data that is
the basis for the listing for peer review and developed an outline if required
under subdivision (b)(viii) of this subsection, and (iii) a declaration of the
availability of the peer review, including an explanation of any changes or
modifications the commission has made to its proposal as a result of the peer
review, and the outline required under subdivision (b)(viii) of this
subsection, if applicable, for public examination.
(e) In cases when the commission determines that an emergency situation
exists involving the continued existence of such species as a viable component
of the wild fauna or flora of the state, the commission may add species to such
lists after first publishing public notice that such an emergency situation
exists together with a summary of facts that support such determination.
(4) In determining whether any species of wildlife or wild plants is an
endangered or threatened species, the commission shall take into consideration
those actions being carried out by the federal government, by other states, by
other agencies of this state or its political subdivisions, or by any other
person which may affect the species under consideration.
(5) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
containing a list of all species of wildlife and wild plants normally occurring
within this state that it determines, in accordance with subsections (1)
through (4) of this section, to be endangered or threatened species and a list
of all such species. Each list shall refer to the species contained in such
list by scientific and common name or names, if any, and shall specify with
respect to each such species over what portion of its range it is endangered or
threatened.
(6) Except with respect to species of wildlife or wild plants determined
to be endangered or threatened pursuant to the Endangered Species Act, the
commission shall, upon the petition of an interested person, conduct a review
of any listed or unlisted species proposed to be removed from or added to the
lists published pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, but only if the
commission publishes a public notice that such person has presented substantial
evidence that warrants such a review.
(7) Whenever any species of wildlife or wild plants is listed as a
threatened species pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the commission
shall issue such rules and regulations as are necessary to provide for the
conservation of such species. The commission may prohibit, with respect to any
threatened species of wildlife or wild plants, any act prohibited under
subsection (8) or (9) of this section.
(8) With respect to any endangered species of wildlife, it shall be
unlawful, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section or section
37-807, for any person subject to the jurisdiction of this state to:
(a) Export any such species from this state;
(b) Take any such species within this state;
(c) Possess, process, sell or offer for sale, deliver, carry, transport,
or ship, by any means whatsoever except as a common or contract motor carrier
under the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission or the federal Surface
Transportation Board, any such species; or
(d) Violate any rule or regulation pertaining to the conservation of such
species or to any threatened species of wildlife listed pursuant to this
section and adopted and promulgated by the commission pursuant to the Nongame
and Endangered Species Conservation Act.
(9) With respect to any endangered species of wild plants, it shall be
unlawful, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, for any person
subject to the jurisdiction of this state to:
(a) Export any such species from this state;
(b) Possess, process, sell or offer for sale, deliver, carry, transport,
or ship, by any means whatsoever, any such species; or
(c) Violate any rule or regulation pertaining to such species or to any
threatened species of wild plants listed pursuant to this section and adopted
and promulgated by the commission pursuant to the act.
(10) Any endangered species of wildlife or wild plants that enters this
state from another state or from a point outside the territorial limits of the
United States and that is being transported to a point within or beyond this
state may be so entered and transported without restriction in accordance with
the terms of any federal permit or permit issued under the laws or regulations
of another state.
(11) The commission may permit any act otherwise prohibited by subsection
(8) of this section for scientific purposes or to enhance the propagation or
survival of the affected species.
(12) Any law, rule, regulation, or ordinance of any political subdivision
of this state that applies with respect to the taking, importation,
exportation, possession, sale or offer for sale, processing, delivery,
carrying, transportation other than under the jurisdiction of the Public
Service Commission, or shipment of species determined to be endangered or
threatened species pursuant to the Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation
Act shall be void to the extent that it may effectively (a) permit that which
is prohibited by the act or by any rule or regulation that implements the act
-25-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
or (b) prohibit that which is authorized pursuant to an exemption or permit
provided for in the act or in any rule or regulation that implements the act.
The Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act shall not otherwise be
construed to void any law, rule, regulation, or ordinance of any political
subdivision of this state which is intended to conserve wildlife or wild
plants.
Sec. 60. Section 37-814, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
37-814 (1) Any federally designated critical habitat under the Endangered
Species Act shall be critical habitat under the Nongame and Endangered Species
Conservation Act.
(2)(a) In addition to federally designated critical habitat under the
Endangered Species Act, the commission shall by rule and regulation determine
if any additional habitat of a species listed pursuant to subsection (2) of
section 37-806 is critical habitat as a result of any of the following factors:
(i) The present or threatened destruction, modification, or curtailment of
the habitat or range of such species;
(ii) Overutilization for commercial, recreational, scientific,
educational, or other purposes;
(iii) Disease or predation;
(iv) The inadequacy of existing regulatory mechanisms; or
(v) Other natural or manmade factors affecting the continued existence
within this state of such species.
(b) The commission shall not designate as critical habitat for any
endangered or threatened species the entire geographical area that can be
occupied by such endangered or threatened species unless the commission
determines that such designation is essential for the survival of the
endangered or threatened species.
(c) The commission may, concurrently with making a determination under
subsection (2) of section 37-806 that a species is an endangered or threatened
species, designate any habitat of such species that is also considered to be
critical habitat.
(d) The commission may designate critical habitat for any plant or animal
species that is listed under section 37-806 that does not have a designated
critical habitat.
(e) The commission may revise any previous designation of critical
habitat.
(3)(a) The commission shall make determinations required by subsection (2)
of this section on the basis of the best scientific, commercial, and other data
available to the commission.
(b) Except with respect to critical habitat designated under subsection
(1) of this section, the commission shall not designate or remove designation
of critical habitat for a species from any list published pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section unless the commission:
(i) Provides public notice of such proposed action by publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the critical habitat
is proposed to be designated, or if the proposed critical habitat designation
extends over more than five counties, in a newspaper of statewide circulation
distributed in each of the counties;
(ii) Provides notice of such proposed action to and allows comment from
the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy, the Department of Natural Resources, and any other
state agency that the commission determines might be impacted by the proposed
action;
(iii) Provides notice of such proposed action to and allows comment from
each natural resources district and public power district located within the
area proposed to be designated as critical habitat;
(iv) Notifies the Governor of any state sharing a common border with this
state, in which the species for which the critical habitat that is being
proposed to be designated is known to occur, that such action is being
proposed;
(v) Allows at least sixty days following publication for comment from the
public and other interested parties;
(vi) Holds at least one public hearing on such proposed action in each
game and parks commissioner district where the critical habitat is proposed to
be designated;
(vii) Submits the scientific, commercial, and other data that is the basis
of the proposed action to scientists or experts outside and independent of the
commission for peer review of the data and conclusions. If the commission
submits the data to a state or federal fish and wildlife agency for peer
review, the commission shall also submit the data to scientists or experts not
affiliated with such agency for review. For purposes of this section, state
fish and wildlife agency does not include a postsecondary educational
institution; and
(viii) For critical habitat proposed to be designated under this
subsection, but not for critical habitat proposed to be removed from
designation under this subsection, develops an outline of any potential impact,
requirement, or rule or regulation that might be placed on any private
landowner or other person who holds any state-recognized property right as a
result of the listing of the critical habitat designation.
(c) The inadvertent failure to provide notice as required by subdivision
(3)(b) of this section shall not prohibit the designation of critical habitat
and shall not be deemed to be a violation of the Administrative Procedure Act
-26-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
or the Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act.
(d) When the commission proposes to designate or remove designation of
critical habitat under this subsection, public notice under subdivision (3)(b)
(i) of this section shall include (i) the critical habitat proposed to be
listed as designated critical habitat and a description of the portion of the
range in which the species for which critical habitat is proposed to be
designated is endangered or threatened, (ii) a declaration that the commission
submitted the data that is the basis for the listing for peer review and
developed an outline if required under subdivision (b)(viii) of this
subsection, and (iii) a declaration of the availability of the peer review,
including an explanation of any changes or modifications the commission has
made to its proposal as a result of the peer review, and the outline required
under subdivision (b)(viii) of this subsection, if applicable, for public
examination.
(e) In cases when the commission determines that an emergency situation
exists that requires the designation of critical habitat to provide for the
continued existence of a species as a viable component of the wild fauna or
flora of the state, the commission may add the designated critical habitat to
such lists after first publishing public notice that such an emergency
situation exists together with a summary of facts that support such
determination.
(4) In determining whether any endangered or threatened species requires
the designation of critical habitat, the commission shall take into
consideration those actions being carried out by the federal government, by
other states, by other agencies of this state or its political subdivisions, or
by any other person which may affect the species under consideration.
(5) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
containing a list of all designated critical habitat in this state and the
endangered or threatened species for which such critical habitat was
designated. Each species on such list shall be referred to by both scientific
and common name or names, if any.
Sec. 61. Section 46-106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-106 The petition for the proposed district shall be published for at
least two weeks before the time at which the same is to be presented, in some
newspaper printed and published in the county where the petition is presented,
together with a notice stating the time of the meeting at which the petition
will be presented. A copy of such petition and all maps and other papers filed
with the petition shall be filed with in the Chief Water Officer office of the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources for at least
four weeks before the date set for such hearing. The Chief Water Officer
Director of Natural Resources shall examine such petition, maps, and other
papers and, if he or she deems it necessary, shall further examine the proposed
district, the works proposed to be purchased, or the location of the works to
be constructed. The Chief Water Officer director shall prepare a report upon
the matter in such form as he or she deems advisable and submit the report to
the county board at the meeting set for the hearing of the petition.
Sec. 62. Section 46-122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-122 (1) It is hereby expressly provided that all water distributed for
irrigation purposes shall attach to and follow the tract of land to which it is
applied unless a change of location has been approved by the board of directors
pursuant to sections 46-2,127 to 46-2,129 or by the Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources pursuant to section 46-294 or sections 46-2,122
to 46-2,126.
(2) The board of directors may by the adoption of appropriate bylaws
provide for the suspension of water delivery to any land in such district upon
which the irrigation taxes levied and assessed thereon shall remain due and
unpaid for two years. It shall be the duty of the directors to make all
necessary arrangements for right-of-way for laterals from the main canal to
each tract of land subject to assessment, and when necessary the board shall
exercise its right of eminent domain to procure right-of-way for the laterals
and shall make such rules in regard to the payment for such right-of-way as may
be just and equitable.
(3) In times of reduced water supply, when the volume of water is not
adequate to be beneficially used when equitably apportioned to all landowners
in the district, the board may, after providing notice to landowners in a
portion of the district and upon receiving no objections from the majority of
such landowners, elect not to deliver water to that portion of the district.
Such election shall not subject the district to liability under section 46-160
and shall not affect the rights of landowners in that portion of the district
to water deliveries in the future. Any election to not deliver water to a
portion of the district shall be made on a year-to-year basis, not to exceed
ten years, and such election shall not subject any landowner to adjudication of
his or her water right under section 46-229. The board may adjust the tolls or
charges made to landowners within the district to reflect the decrease in
supply to those landowners in the portion of the district not receiving water
pursuant to such election by the board.
Sec. 63. Section 46-190, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-190 After a sale of the property and franchises of the district, the
board of directors shall, with the amount realized from such sale, together
with such other funds as such district may have, make settlement, payment, and
-27-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
redemption, if possible, of all outstanding bonded and other indebtedness of
the district, but shall in no case pay more than the market value of such
outstanding bonds with interest up to the time of payment. In cases when bonds
not yet due cannot be redeemed by reason of the refusal of the owner thereof to
surrender them before due, the board may invest the surplus money of the
district, after paying all debts that can be paid, in state, county, or other
safe bonds, bearing the same or greater rate of interest, if possible, than the
district bonds thus outstanding, for the purpose of paying such outstanding
bonds of the district when due. In case the amount realized from the sale of
such district property, together with other money of the district, is
insufficient for the payment of all the indebtedness of the district,
assessments shall continue to be made against the lands included in the
district in the manner provided by law for assessments to pay bonds and other
indebtedness of irrigation districts until a sufficient amount is raised to
fully pay all obligations of such district.
Any balance of funds remaining after the sale or disposition of all
property belonging to the district and after all obligations and indebtedness
of the district have been paid or discharged shall be distributed by the county
treasurer to all assessment payers of the district of record as of the date of
the filing with in the Chief Water Officer office of the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources of the report referred to in section
46-192. Such distribution shall be made pro rata in accordance with the number
of acres of irrigable land owned within the district as of the date of the last
assessment against such land for the district prior to the date of the filing
of such report.
Sec. 64. Section 46-192, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-192 After all the property of the district is disposed of as provided
in sections 46-186 to 46-188, except for any balance of funds remaining after
all of the obligations of such district have been paid, the directors of such
district shall file in the office of the county clerk of each county in which
such district is located, and with in the Chief Water Officer office of the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources, a report
attested by the secretary of the board, stating that the district has disposed
of its property and franchises, except for any balance of funds remaining, and
has discontinued operation, which report shall be recorded in the miscellaneous
record of such counties. Each easement and right-of-way, whether owned by the
district in fee or otherwise, shall automatically be terminated and
extinguished and such interest together with any canal or other structure shall
become the property of the owner of the land upon which such easement, right-
of-way, canal, or other structure is located or, if owned in fee by the
district, shall become the property of the owner of the land adjacent thereto,
upon the filing of the report with the Chief Water Officer department. If any
person has any claim against such district which is not settled or disposed of
at the time of the filing of such report and such person fails or neglects to
bring suit upon such claim within one year after the time of the filing of such
report, such claim or claims shall be forever barred as against such district
as well as against all persons and property therein.
Sec. 65. Section 46-193, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-193 As soon as practicable after the organization of any such district,
the board of directors shall, by a resolution entered on its record, formulate
a general plan of its proposed operation in which it shall state (1) what
constructed works or other property it proposes to purchase and the cost of
purchasing the same and (2) what construction work it proposes to do and how it
proposes to raise the funds for carrying out such plan. For the purpose of
ascertaining the cost of any such construction work, the board shall cause such
surveys, examinations, and plans to be made as will demonstrate the
practicability of such plan and furnish the proper basis for an estimate of the
costs of carrying out the same. All such surveys, examinations, maps, plans,
and estimates shall be made under the direction of a competent irrigation
engineer and certified by the engineer. The board shall then submit a copy of
the same to the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Director of Natural Resources within ninety days thereafter, who
shall file a report upon the same with the board, which report shall contain
such matters as in the judgment of the Chief Water Officer director may be
desirable.
Sec. 66. Section 46-1,155, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1,155 Any two or more irrigation districts may merge into one district
if a petition for merger signed by a majority of the board of directors of each
district or signed by a majority of the electors of each district is filed with
the boards of directors of the districts to be merged. Such petition shall
include a plan for the merger, which plan shall contain:
(1) A description of the proposed boundaries of the merged district and a
list of lands;
(2) A summary of the reasons for the proposed merger;
(3) A summary of the terms on which the merger is to be made between the
merged districts and such terms shall include a provision for three divisions
as nearly equal in size as may be practicable, which shall be numbered first,
second, and third, and two directors shall be elected from each division;
(4) The amount of outstanding indebtedness of each district and proposed
disposition thereof;
-28-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(5) The equitable adjustment of all property, debts, and liabilities among
the districts involved;
(6) The name of the proposed district; and
(7) Such other matters as the petitioners determine proper to be included.
A certified copy of the petition for merger shall be filed with the Chief
Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources and the Chief Water Officer department shall either approve or
disapprove such petition within twenty days. The boards of directors of the
districts shall not take further action without such approval.
Sec. 67. Section 46-1,157, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1,157 When such plan has been approved by the Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources, it shall be designated as the final approved
plan and shall be submitted to a vote as provided in section 46-1,158.
Sec. 68. Section 46-1,164, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
46-1,164 There is hereby created the Surface Water Irrigation
Infrastructure Fund to be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources. The fund shall be used to provide grants in
accordance with section 46-1,165 to irrigation districts. There shall be a one-
time transfer of fifty million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the
Surface Water Irrigation Infrastructure Fund to carry out the purposes of
section 46-1,165. Any money in the Surface Water Irrigation Infrastructure Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall
be credited to the fund.
Sec. 69. Section 46-1,165, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
46-1,165 The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources shall
establish procedures and criteria for awarding grants to irrigation districts
from the Surface Water Irrigation Infrastructure Fund to be used for repair or
construction of any headgate, flume, diversion structure, check valve, or any
other physical structure used for irrigation projects. The Chief Water Officer
department may award grants, not to exceed five million dollars per applicant,
to an irrigation district that applies to the Chief Water Officer department
based on criteria and procedures established by the Chief Water Officer
department. In order to receive a grant under this section, a grant applicant
shall provide matching funds equal to ten percent of the grant amount awarded
for such project.
Sec. 70. Section 46-205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-205 The priority of an appropriation shall date from the filing of the
application with in the Chief Water Officer office of the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources.
Sec. 71. Section 46-226, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-226 (1) The Chief Water Officer department shall make proper
arrangements for the determination of priorities of right to use the public
waters of the state and determine the same. The method of determining the
priority and amount of appropriation shall be fixed by the Chief Water Officer
department.
(2)(a) The Chief Water Officer department is authorized to administer any
riparian water right that has been validated and recognized in a court order
from a court of lawful jurisdiction in the state.
(b) The only surface water appropriations that may be closed for a
riparian water right are appropriations held by persons who were parties to the
lawsuit validating the riparian water right or appropriations with a priority
date subsequent to the date of the court order.
Sec. 72. Section 46-226.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-226.01 Any person having an approved perfected appropriation may file
with the Chief Water Officer department an application for recognition of
incidental underground water storage associated with such appropriation on a
form prescribed and furnished by the Chief Water Officer department without
cost. Upon receipt of an application, the Chief Water Officer department shall
proceed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
Chief Water Officer department.
Sec. 73. Section 46-226.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-226.02 (1) The Chief Water Officer director may approve an application
filed pursuant to section 46-226.01 or 46-297 subject to the following
conditions:
(a) The rate, quantity, or time of surface water diversion shall not be
increased from that approved for the appropriation at the time the application
is filed;
(b) If the water stored or to be stored underground will be used for
irrigation purposes, the Chief Water Officer director may approve the service
of additional amounts of land or different lands not identified to be served
with facilities included under the original appropriation, if the Chief Water
Officer director determines that the change is in the public interest, and that
any interference with the rights of senior appropriators as a result of such
change is unavoidable and not material;
-29-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(c) The priority date shall remain the same as that of the original
appropriation; and
(d) When the application is for recognition of incidental underground
water storage, such stored water is being withdrawn or is otherwise being used
for beneficial purposes.
(2) For an application filed pursuant to section 46-226.01, the burden
shall be on the applicant to prove that underground water storage has occurred.
(3) The Chief Water Officer director may grant the application in a
modified or reduced form, if required by the public interest, and may impose
such other reasonable conditions as deemed appropriate to protect the public
interest.
(4) The Chief Water Officer's director's order of approval shall specify:
(a) The source of the water stored or to be stored underground;
(b) The underground water storage method; and
(c) A description of the area served or to be served by the water stored
underground.
Sec. 74. Section 46-226.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-226.03 For purposes of sections 46-226 to 46-243:
(1) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment;
(2) (1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources;
(2) Director means the Director of Natural Resources;
(3) Incidental underground water storage has the same meaning as in
section 46-296;
(4) Induced ground water recharge means the process by which ground water
withdrawn from wells near a natural stream is replaced by surface water flowing
in the stream;
(5) Intentional underground water storage has the same meaning as in
section 46-296;
(6) Public water supplier means a city, village, municipal corporation,
metropolitan utilities district, rural water district, natural resources
district, irrigation district, reclamation district, or sanitary and
improvement district which supplies or intends to supply water to inhabitants
of cities, villages, or rural areas for domestic or municipal purposes;
(7) Underground water storage has the same meaning as in section 46-296;
and
(8) Well means a well, subsurface collector, or other artificial opening
or excavation in the ground from which ground water flows under natural
pressure or is artificially withdrawn.
Sec. 75. Section 46-227, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-227 The Chief Water Officer department shall measure or cause to be
measured the quantity of water flowing in the several streams of the state,
shall make a record thereof in the office of the department, and shall from
time to time make such additional measurements as may be necessary, in
considering applications for water appropriations and such controversies as may
arise regarding the distribution of water.
Sec. 76. Section 46-229, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-229 All appropriations for water must be for a beneficial or useful
purpose and, except as provided in sections 46-290 to 46-294 and 46-2,122 to
46-2,125, when the owner of an appropriation or his or her successor in
interest ceases to use it for such purpose for more than five consecutive
years, the right may be terminated only by the Chief Water Officer director
pursuant to sections 46-229.02 to 46-229.05.
Sec. 77. Section 46-229.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-229.01 The Chief Water Officer department shall, as often as necessary,
examine into the condition of all ditches constructed or partially constructed
within the state and shall compile information concerning the condition of
every water appropriation and all ditches and canals and other works
constructed or partially constructed thereunder.
Sec. 78. Section 46-229.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-229.02 (1) If, based upon the results of a field investigation or upon
information, however obtained, the Chief Water Officer department makes
preliminary determinations (a) that an appropriation has not been used, in
whole or in part, for a beneficial or useful purpose or having been so used at
one time has ceased to be used, in whole or in part, for such purpose for more
than five consecutive years and (b) that the Chief Water Officer department
knows of no reason that constitutes sufficient cause, as provided in section
46-229.04, for such nonuse or that such nonuse has continued beyond the
additional time permitted because of the existence of any applicable sufficient
cause, the Chief Water Officer department shall serve notice of such
preliminary determinations upon the owner or owners of such appropriation and
upon any other person who is an owner of the land under such appropriation.
Such notice shall contain the information required by section 46-229.03, shall
be provided in the manner required by such section, and shall be posted on the
department's website. Each owner of the appropriation and any owner of the land
under such appropriation shall have thirty days after the mailing or last
publication, as applicable, of such notice to notify the Chief Water Officer
-30-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
department, on a form provided by the department, that such owner he or she
contests the Chief Water Officer's department's preliminary determination of
nonuse or the department's preliminary determination of the absence of
sufficient cause for such nonuse. Such notification shall indicate the reason
or reasons the owner is contesting the Chief Water Officer's department's
preliminary determination and include any information the owner believes is
relevant to the issues of nonuse or sufficient cause for such nonuse.
(2) If no owner of the appropriation or of the land under the
appropriation provides notification to the Chief Water Officer department in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the Chief Water Officer
director may issue an order canceling the appropriation in whole or in part.
The extent of such cancellation shall not exceed the extent described in the
Chief Water Officer's department's notice to the owner or owners in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section. A copy of the order canceling the
appropriation, or part thereof, shall be posted on the department's website and
shall be provided to the owner or owners of the appropriation and to any other
owner of the land under the appropriation in the same manner that notices are
to be given in accordance with subsection (2), (3), or (4) of section
46-229.03, as applicable. No cancellation under this subsection shall prohibit
an irrigation district, a reclamation district, a public power and irrigation
district, or a mutual irrigation company or canal company from asserting the
rights provided by subsections (5) and (6) of section 46-229.04.
(3) If an owner of the appropriation provides notification to the Chief
Water Officer department in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the
Chief Water Officer department shall review the owner's stated reasons for
contesting the Chief Water Officer's department's preliminary determination and
any other information provided with the owner's notice. If the Chief Water
Officer department determines that the owner has provided sufficient
information for the Chief Water Officer department to conclude that the
appropriation should not be canceled, in whole or in part, the Chief Water
Officer it shall inform the owners of the appropriation, and any other owners
of the land under the appropriation, of such determination.
(4) If the Chief Water Officer department determines that an owner has
provided sufficient information to support the conclusion that the
appropriation should be canceled only in part and if (a) the owner or owners
filing the notice of contest agree in writing to such cancellation in part and
(b) such owner or owners are the only known owners of the appropriation and of
the land under the appropriation, the Chief Water Officer director may issue an
order canceling the appropriation to the extent agreed to by the owner or
owners and shall provide a copy of such order to such owner or owners.
(5) If the Chief Water Officer department determines that subsections (2),
(3), and (4) of this section do not apply, the Chief Water Officer it shall
schedule and conduct a hearing on the cancellation of the appropriation in
whole or in part. Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the owner or
owners who filed notices with the Chief Water Officer department pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, to any other owner of the appropriation known
to the Chief Water Officer department, and to any other owner of the land under
the appropriation. The notice shall be posted on the department's website and
shall be served or published, as applicable, in the manner provided in
subsection (2), (3), or (4) of section 46-229.03, as applicable.
(6) Following a hearing conducted in accordance with subsection (5) of
this section and subsection (1) of section 46-229.04, the Chief Water Officer
director shall render a decision by order. A copy of the order shall be
provided to the owner or owners of the appropriation and to any other person
who is an owner of the land under the appropriation. The copy of the order
shall be posted on the department's website and shall be served or published,
as applicable, in the same manner that notices are to be given in accordance
with subsection (2), (3), or (4) of section 46-229.03, as applicable, except
that if publication is required, it shall be sufficient for the Chief Water
Officer department to publish notice that an order has been issued. Any such
published notice shall identify the land or lands involved and shall provide
the address and telephone number that may be used to obtain a copy of the
order.
(7) A water appropriation that has not been perfected pursuant to the
terms of the permit may be canceled by the Chief Water Officer department
without complying with sections 46-229.01 to 46-229.04 if the owner of such
appropriation fails to comply with any of the conditions of approval in the
permit, except that this subsection does not apply to appropriations to which
subsection (2) of section 46-237 applies.
Sec. 79. Section 46-229.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-229.03 (1) The notice provided by the Chief Water Officer department in
accordance with subsection (1) or (5) of section 46-229.02 shall contain: (a) A
description of the appropriation; (b) the number assigned to the appropriation
by the Department of Natural Resources as it existed prior to July 1, 2025, or
the Chief Water Officer department; (c) the date of priority; (d) the point of
diversion; (e) if the notice is published, the section or sections of land
which contain the lands located under such appropriation; (f) if the notice is
served by personal service or by registered or certified mail, a description of
the lands which are located under such appropriation, a description of the
information used by the Chief Water Officer department to reach the preliminary
determinations of nonuse, and a copy of section 46-229.04; (g) a description of
the owner's options in response to the notice; (h) a department telephone
-31-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
number which any person may use to call the Chief Water Officer or the
department during normal business hours for more information regarding the
owner's rights and options, including what constitutes sufficient cause for
nonuse; (i) a copy of the form that such owner may file to contest such
determination, if notice is provided in accordance with subsection (1) of
section 46-229.02 and is mailed; (j) the location where the owner may obtain a
form to file to contest such determination, if notice is provided in accordance
with subsection (1) of section 46-229.02 and is published; and (k) if the
notice is provided in accordance with subsection (5) of section 46-229.02, the
date, time, and location of the hearing.
(2) For any owner whose name and address are known to the Chief Water
Officer department or can be reasonably obtained by the Chief Water Officer
department, the notice shall be served by personal service or by registered
mail or certified mail. Any landowner's name or address shall be considered
reasonably obtainable if that person is listed as an owner of the land
involved, on the records of the county clerk or register of deeds for the
county in which the land is located.
(3) For any owner whose name and address are not known to the Chief Water
Officer department and cannot reasonably be obtained by the Chief Water Officer
department, such notice shall be served by publication in a legal newspaper
published or of general circulation in any county in which the place of
diversion is located and in a legal newspaper published or of general
circulation in each county containing land for which the right to use water
under the appropriation is subject to cancellation. Each such publication shall
be once each week for three consecutive weeks.
(4) Landowners whose property under such appropriation is located within
the corporate limits of a city or village shall be served by the publication of
such notice in a legal newspaper published or of general circulation in the
county in which the city or village is located. The notice shall be published
once each week for three consecutive weeks.
Sec. 80. Section 46-229.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-229.04 (1) At a hearing held pursuant to section 46-229.03, the
verified field investigation report of an employee of the department, or such
other report or information that is relied upon by the Chief Water Officer
department to reach the preliminary determination of nonuse, shall be prima
facie evidence for the forfeiture and annulment of such water appropriation. If
no person appears at the hearing, such water appropriation or unused part
thereof shall be declared forfeited and annulled. If an interested person
appears and contests the same, the Chief Water Officer department shall hear
evidence, and if it appears that such water has not been put to a beneficial
use or has ceased to be used for such purpose for more than five consecutive
years, the same shall be declared canceled and annulled unless the Chief Water
Officer department finds that (a) there has been sufficient cause for such
nonuse as provided for in subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this section or (b)
subsection (5) or (6) of this section applies.
(2) Sufficient cause for nonuse shall be deemed to exist for up to thirty
consecutive years if:
(a) Such nonuse was caused by the unavailability of water for that use.
For a river basin, subbasin, or reach that has been designated as
overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713 or determined by the Chief Water
Officer department to be fully appropriated pursuant to section 46-714, the
period of time within which sufficient cause for nonuse because of the
unavailability of water may be deemed to exist may be extended beyond thirty
years by the Chief Water Officer department upon petition therefor by the owner
of the appropriation if the Chief Water Officer department determines that an
integrated management plan being implemented in the river basin, subbasin, or
reach involved is likely to result in restoration of a usable water supply for
the appropriation; or
(b) The land subject to the appropriation is under an acreage reserve
program or production quota or is otherwise withdrawn from use as required for
participation in any federal, state, or natural resources district program, or
such land was previously under such a program but currently is not under such a
program and there have been not more than five consecutive years of nonuse on
such land subsequent to when that land was last under such program.
(3) Sufficient cause for nonuse shall be deemed to exist indefinitely if
such nonuse was the result of one or more of the following:
(a) For any tract of land under separate ownership, the available supply
was used but on only part of the land under the appropriation because of an
inadequate water supply;
(b) The appropriation is a storage appropriation and there was an
inadequate water supply to provide the water for the storage appropriation or
less than the full amount of the storage appropriation was needed to keep the
reservoir full; or
(c) The appropriation is a storage-use appropriation and there was an
inadequate water supply to provide the water for the appropriation or use of
the storage water was unnecessary because of climatic conditions.
(4) Sufficient cause for nonuse shall be deemed to exist for up to fifteen
consecutive years if such nonuse was a result of one or more of the following:
(a) Federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations temporarily
prevented or restricted such use;
(b) Use of the water was unnecessary because of climatic conditions;
(c) Circumstances were such that a prudent person, following the
-32-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
principles of good husbandry, would not have been expected to use the water;
(d) The works, diversions, or other facilities essential to use the water
were destroyed by a cause not within the control of the owner of the
appropriation and good faith efforts to repair or replace the works,
diversions, or facilities have been and are being made;
(e) The owner of the appropriation was in active involuntary service in
the armed forces of the United States or was in active voluntary service during
a time of crisis; or
(f) Legal proceedings prevented or restricted use of the water.
The Chief Water Officer department may specify by rule and regulation
other circumstances that shall be deemed to constitute sufficient cause for
nonuse for up to fifteen years.
(5) When an appropriation is held in the name of an irrigation district, a
reclamation district, a public power and irrigation district, a mutual
irrigation company or canal company, or the United States Bureau of Reclamation
and the Chief Water Officer director determines that water under that
appropriation has not been used on a specific parcel of land for more than five
years and that no sufficient cause for such nonuse exists, the right to use
water under that appropriation on that parcel shall be terminated and notice of
the termination shall be posted on the department's website and shall be given
in the manner provided in subsection (2), (3), or (4) of section 46-229.03. The
district or company holding such right shall have five years after the
determination, or five years after an order of cancellation issued by the Chief
Water Officer department following the filing of a voluntary relinquishment of
the water appropriation that has been signed by the landowner and the
appropriator of record, to assign the right to use that portion of the
appropriation to other land within the district or the area served by the
company, to file an application for a transfer in accordance with section
46-290, or to transfer the right in accordance with sections 46-2,127 to
46-2,129. The Chief Water Officer department shall issue the its order of
cancellation within sixty days after receipt of the voluntary relinquishment
unless the relinquishment is conditioned by the landowner upon an action of a
governmental agency. If the relinquishment contains such a provision, the Chief
Water Officer department shall issue the its order of cancellation within sixty
days after receipt of notification that such action has been completed. The
Chief Water Officer department shall be notified of any such assignment within
thirty days after such assignment. If the district or company does not assign
the right to use that portion of the appropriation to other land, does not file
an application for a transfer within the five-year period, or does not notify
the Chief Water Officer department within thirty days after any such
assignment, that portion of the appropriation shall be canceled without further
proceedings by the Chief Water Officer department and the district or company
involved shall be so notified by the Chief Water Officer department. During the
time within which assignment of a portion of an appropriation is pending, the
allowable diversion rate for the appropriation involved shall be reduced, as
necessary, to avoid inconsistency with the rate allowed by section 46-231 or
with any greater rate previously approved for such appropriation by the Chief
Water Officer director in accordance with section 46-229.06.
(6) When it is determined by the Chief Water Officer director that an
appropriation, for which the location of use has been temporarily transferred
in accordance with sections 46-290 to 46-294, has not been used at the new
location for more than five years and that no sufficient cause for such nonuse
exists, the right to use that appropriation at the temporary location of use
shall be terminated. Notice of that termination shall be posted on the
department's website and shall be given in the manner provided in subsection
(2), (3), or (4) of section 46-229.03. The right to reinitiate use of that
appropriation at the location of use prior to the temporary transfer shall
continue to exist for five years after the Chief Water Officer's director's
determination, but if such use is not reinitiated at that location within such
five-year period, the appropriation shall be subject to cancellation in
accordance with sections 46-229 to 46-229.04.
(7) If at the time of a hearing conducted in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section there is an application for incidental or intentional
underground water storage pending before the Chief Water Officer department and
filed by the owner of the appropriation, the proceedings shall be consolidated.
Sec. 81. Section 46-229.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-229.05 An appeal may be taken from the decision of the Chief Water
Officer department upon such hearing as provided by section 61-207.
Sec. 82. Section 46-229.06, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-229.06 When a departmental proceeding that is conducted pursuant to
sections 46-229 to 46-229.04 concerns the partial cancellation of an
appropriation, the Chief Water Officer department may receive evidence on the
question of whether, following such partial cancellation, a reduction in the
rate of diversion to the maximum rate prescribed in section 46-231 would result
in an authorized diversion rate less than the rate necessary, in the interests
of good husbandry, for the production of crops on the lands that remain subject
to the appropriation. If the Chief Water Officer director determines, based on
a preponderance of the evidence, that such rate would be less than the rate
necessary, in the interests of good husbandry, for the production of crops, he
or she may approve a diversion rate for the remaining portion of the
appropriation greater than the maximum rate authorized by section 46-231. Such
-33-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
increased rate can be no greater than the rate authorized for the appropriation
prior to the partial cancellation and no greater than the rate determined by
the Chief Water Officer director to be necessary, in the interests of good
husbandry, for the production of crops on the lands that remain subject to the
appropriation.
Sec. 83. Section 46-230, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-230 (1) As the adjudication of a stream progresses and as each claim is
finally adjudicated, the Chief Water Officer director shall make and cause to
be entered of record in his or her office an order determining and establishing
the priorities of right to use the water of such stream, the amount of the
appropriation of the persons claiming water from such stream and the character
of use for which each appropriation is found to have been made, and the address
of the owner of each water appropriation.
(2) Whenever requested by the Chief Water Officer department, the owner of
any appropriation not held by an irrigation district, reclamation district,
public power and irrigation district, or mutual irrigation or canal company
shall provide the Chief Water Officer department with the name, address, and
telephone number of each then-current owner of the appropriation and with the
name, address, and telephone number of any tenant or other person who is
authorized by the owner to receive opening and closing notices and other
departmental communications relating to the appropriation. Each appropriation
owner shall also notify the Chief Water Officer department any time there is a
change in any of such names, addresses, or telephone numbers. Notice of
ownership changes may be provided to the Chief Water Officer department in the
manner provided in section 76-2,124 or in any other manner authorized by the
Chief Water Officer department. If notice of an ownership change is provided
other than in accordance with such section, the notice shall include such
evidence of ownership as the Chief Water Officer director may require. Notice
of all other changes may be provided in any manner authorized by the Chief
Water Officer department. Upon receipt of any new information, the Chief Water
Officer department shall update the Chief Water Officer's its records. The
Chief Water Officer department shall not collect a fee for the filing of any
such information or for updating the Chief Water Officer's its records.
Sec. 84. Section 46-231, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-231 Each appropriation shall be determined in its priority and amount
by the time at which it is made and the amount of water which the works are
constructed to carry. An appropriator shall at no time be entitled to the use
of more than he or she can beneficially use for the purposes for which the
appropriation has been made, and the amount of any appropriation made by means
of enlargement of the distributing works shall be determined in like manner.
An allotment from the natural flow of streams for irrigation shall not
exceed one cubic foot per second of time for each seventy acres of land and
shall not exceed three acre-feet in the aggregate during one calendar year for
each acre of land for which such appropriation has been made, and an allotment
shall not exceed the least amount of water that experience may indicate is
necessary, in the exercise of good husbandry, for the production of crops. Such
limitations do not apply to storage waters or to water appropriations
transferred pursuant to sections 46-2,122 to 46-2,125 and 46-2,127 to 46-2,129.
When storage water is being used in addition to the natural flow, the
person in charge of the ditch or canal shall, upon his or her request and
within twenty-four hours thereof, be notified in writing by the user of such
storage waters of the time of withdrawal from natural streams to be distributed
according to law.
When an appropriation is for irrigation purposes and the amount is so
small that a proper distribution and application is impractical, as much water
as the applicant can use without waste may be allotted for a limited time so
fixed by the Chief Water Officer department as to give each appropriator his or
her just share without violating other rights, so long as (1) the volume of
water used in a twenty-four-hour period does not exceed the amount of water
that would otherwise have been allowed at the approved fixed continuous rate
for a twenty-four-hour period or (2) the volume of water used in a seven-day,
Monday-through-Sunday period does not exceed the amount of water that would
otherwise have been allowed at the approved fixed continuous rate for a seven-
day period. The Chief Water Officer department shall determine schedules among
appropriators to assure that other rights are not violated.
Sec. 85. Section 46-233, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-233 (1) The United States and every person intending to appropriate any
of the public waters of the State of Nebraska shall, before (a) commencing the
construction, enlargement, or extension of any works for such purpose, (b)
performing any work in connection with such construction, enlargement, or
extension, or (c) taking any water from any constructed works, make an
application to the Chief Water Officer department for a permit to make such
appropriation. A permit may be obtained to appropriate public waters for
intentional underground water storage and recovery of such water. A public
water supplier may make application to appropriate public waters for induced
ground water recharge.
(2) The application shall be upon a form prescribed and furnished by the
Chief Water Officer department without cost to an applicant. Such application
shall set forth (a) the name and post office address of the applicant, (b) the
source from which such appropriation shall be made, (c) the amount of the
-34-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
appropriation desired, as nearly as it may be estimated, (d) the location of
any proposed work in connection with the appropriation, (e) the estimated time
required for its completion, which estimated time shall include the period
required for the construction of ditches, pumps, and other features or devices,
(f) the time estimated at which the application of the water for the beneficial
purposes shall be made, which time shall be limited to a reasonable time
following the estimated time of completion of the work when prosecuted with
diligence, (g) the purpose for which water is to be applied and (i) if for
induced ground water recharge by a public water supplier, a statement of the
times of the year when and location along a stream where flows for induced
ground water recharge are proposed and (ii) if for irrigation, a description of
the land to be irrigated by the water and the amount, and (h) such facts and
supporting documentation as are required by the Chief Water Officer department
which shall include, but not be limited to, the depth of all wells, the extent
of the underlying aquifer, the expected rate of recharge, the minimum flow or
flows necessary to sustain the well field throughout the reach identified, and
the period of time that a well field would continue to meet minimal essential
needs of the public water supplier when there is no flow as those factors
relate to and are part of an evaluation of pertinent hydrologic relationships.
A public water supplier making application for induced ground water
recharge may submit with its application a statement of the amount of induced
ground water recharge water which the public water supplier presently uses as
well as the amount of induced ground water recharge water it anticipates using
in the next twenty-five-year period. Such statement shall also quantify the
total amount of water the public water supplier presently uses from the well
field as well as the total amount of water it anticipates using from the well
field in the next twenty-five-year period.
(3) Upon receipt of an application containing the information set forth in
this section, the Chief Water Officer department shall (a) make a record of the
receipt of the application, (b) cause the application to be recorded in its
office, and (c) make a careful examination of the application to ascertain
whether it sets forth all the facts necessary to enable the Chief Water Officer
department to determine the nature and amount of the proposed appropriation. If
such an examination shows the application in any way defective, it shall be
returned to the applicant for correction, with a statement of the correction
required, within ninety days after its receipt. Ninety days shall be allowed
for the refiling of the application, and in default of such refiling, the
application shall stand dismissed. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, if so filed and corrected as required within such time, the
application shall, upon being accepted and allowed, take priority as of the
date of the original filing, subject to compliance with the future provisions
of the law and the rules and regulations thereunder. During the pendency of any
application or upon its approval, the Chief Water Officer department, upon
proper authorization and request of the applicant, may assign the application a
later priority date.
(4) For public water supplier wells in existence on September 9, 1993, the
priority date assigned to an application for induced ground water recharge made
by a public water supplier shall be:
(a) June 27, 1963, for water supply wells and facilities constructed and
placed in service on or before June 27, 1963;
(b) January 1, 1970, for water supply wells and facilities constructed and
placed in service on or after June 28, 1963, and on or before December 31,
1969;
(c) January 1, 1980, for water supply wells and facilities constructed and
placed in service on or after January 1, 1970, and on or before December 31,
1979;
(d) January 1, 1990, for water supply wells and facilities constructed and
placed in service on or after January 1, 1980, and on or before December 31,
1989; and
(e) January 1, 1993, for water supply wells and facilities constructed and
placed in service on or after January 1, 1990, and on or before September 9,
1993.
(5) Prior to taking action on an application for induced ground water
recharge, the Chief Water Officer director shall publish notice of such
application at the applicant's expense at least once each week for three
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the
stream segment and also in a newspaper of statewide circulation. The notice
shall state that any person having an interest may, in writing, object to the
application. Any such objection shall be filed with the Chief Water Officer
department within two weeks after the final publication of the notice.
(6) After the Chief Water Officer director has accepted the application
made under subsection (2) of this section as a completed application and
published notice as required under subsection (5) of this section, the Chief
Water Officer director shall, if he or she determines that a hearing is
necessary, set a time and place for a public hearing on the application. The
hearing shall be held within reasonable proximity to the area in which the
wells are or would be located. At the hearing the applicant shall present all
hydrological data and other evidence supporting its application. All interested
parties shall be allowed to testify and present evidence relative to the
application.
(7) An unapproved application pending on August 26, 1983, may be amended
to include appropriation for intentional underground water storage and recovery
of such water.
-35-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(8) Application may be made to the Chief Water Officer department for a
temporary permit to appropriate water. The same standards for granting a
permanent appropriation shall apply for granting such temporary permit except
when the temporary permit is for road construction or other public use
construction and the amount of water requested is less than ten acre-feet in
total volume. For temporary permits for public-use construction, the applicant
shall include on the application the location of the diversion, the location of
use, a description of the project, the amount of water requested, and the
person to contact. Temporary permits for public-use construction and for less
than ten acre-feet in total volume may be granted without any determination of
unappropriated water and shall be considered to be in the public interest. The
requirement of filing a map or plans with the application for a temporary
permit may be waived at the discretion of the Chief Water Officer director. In
granting a temporary permit, the Chief Water Officer director shall specify a
date on which the right to appropriate water under the permit shall expire.
Under no circumstances shall such date be longer than one calendar year after
the date the temporary permit was granted. Temporary permits shall be
administered during times of shortage based on priority. The right to
appropriate water shall automatically terminate on the date specified by the
Chief Water Officer director on the temporary permit without further action by
the Chief Water Officer department.
(9) Water may be diverted from any stream, reservoir, or canal by any fire
department or emergency response services for the purpose of extinguishing a
fire in progress in an emergency without obtaining a permit from the Chief
Water Officer department. The installation of a dry well for this purpose is
allowed without the prior permission of the Chief Water Officer department, but
the Chief Water Officer department shall be informed of any such installation,
its location, and the party responsible for its installation and maintenance
within thirty days after the installation.
Sec. 86. Section 46-233.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-233.01 (1) Application may be made to the Chief Water Officer
department for a permit to appropriate any of the public surface waters of the
State of Nebraska to be diverted or stored in Nebraska for use in any other
state.
(2) In determining whether to grant such application, the Chief Water
Officer director shall consider the following factors:
(a) Whether unappropriated water exists in the source of supply named in
the application;
(b) Whether such application and appropriation when perfected are not
otherwise detrimental to the public welfare;
(c) Whether denial of the application is demanded by the public interest;
and
(d) Whether the proposed use is a beneficial use of water.
(3) When determining whether denial of such application is demanded by the
public interest, the Chief Water Officer director shall consider the following
factors:
(a) The economic, environmental, and other benefits of the proposed use;
(b) Any adverse economic, environmental, and other impacts of the proposed
use;
(c) Any current beneficial uses being made of the unappropriated water;
(d) The economic, environmental, and other benefits of not allowing the
appropriation and preserving the water supply for beneficial uses within the
state;
(e) Alternative sources of water supply available to the applicant; and
(f) Any other factors consistent with the purposes of this section that
the Chief Water Officer director deems relevant to protecting the interests of
the state and its citizens.
The application shall be deemed in the public interest if the overall
benefits to Nebraska are greater than the adverse impacts to Nebraska. The
Chief Water Officer's director's order granting or denying an application shall
specify the reasons for such action, including a discussion of the required
factors for consideration, and shall document such decision by reference to the
hearing record, if any, and to any other sources used by the Chief Water
Officer director in making the decision.
Sec. 87. Section 46-234, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-234 If there is no unappropriated water in the source of supply or if a
prior appropriation has been perfected to water the same land to be watered by
the applicant, the Chief Water Officer department may refuse such application.
An application may also be refused (1) if existing facilities other than those
owned or operated by the applicant are to be utilized and the applicant fails
to show, by documentary evidence, agreements with the owner and operator of the
facilities to allow the applicant to use such facilities or (2) when denial is
demanded by the public interest. The party making such application shall not
prosecute such work so long as such refusal continues in force. An application
for appropriation shall not be exclusive of any of the lands included therein
until the owner or owners of such land give consent to the same in proper form
duly acknowledged. No application made or canal constructed, prior to the
application of the water and the perfection of an appropriation therefor or the
filing of the consent, shall prevent other applications from being allowed and
other canals from being constructed to irrigate the same lands or any of them.
In case of an application for an appropriation of water for the development of
-36-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
water power, the Chief Water Officer department shall promptly act upon such
application and limit the time within which such appropriation shall be
perfected to the period within which the proposed power project can be
completed by uninterrupted and expeditious construction.
Sec. 88. Section 46-235, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-235 (1) For applications other than those to appropriate public waters
for induced ground water recharge, if there is unappropriated water in the
source of supply named in the application, if such application and
appropriation when perfected are not otherwise detrimental to the public
welfare, and if denial of the application is not demanded by the public
interest, the Chief Water Officer department shall approve the application and
shall make a record in its office and return the application to the applicant,
who shall on receipt thereof be authorized to proceed with the work and to take
such measures as may be necessary to perfect such application into an
appropriation. The priority of such application and appropriation when
perfected shall date from the filing of the application with in the Chief Water
Officer office of the department, and the date of filing shall be regarded as
the priority number thereof. The Chief Water Officer department may, upon
examination of such application, approve it for a shorter period of time for
perfecting the proposed appropriation or for a smaller amount of water or of
land than applied for. The Chief Water Officer department may also impose such
other reasonable conditions as the Chief Water Officer it deems appropriate to
protect the public interest. An applicant aggrieved by the action of the Chief
Water Officer department shall, upon proper showing, be granted a hearing
before the Chief Water Officer department, which hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with the rules of procedure adopted by the Chief Water Officer
department, and a full and complete record shall be kept of all such
proceedings. When a complete record of the case has been made up, the Chief
Water Officer department shall render an opinion of facts and of law based upon
the evidence before the Chief Water Officer it.
(2)(a) An application for an induced ground water recharge appropriation
for public water supplier wells constructed and placed in service before
September 9, 1993, shall be approved by the Chief Water Officer director if he
or she finds that:
(i) The appropriation is necessary to maintain the well or wells for the
use or uses for which the appropriation has been requested;
(ii) The rate and timing of the flow is the amount reasonably necessary to
maintain the well or wells for the uses for which the appropriation has been
requested; and
(iii) The application is in the public interest and is not detrimental to
the public welfare. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that wells which
are the subject of an application pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this
section are in the public interest and are not detrimental to the public
welfare.
(b) The Chief Water Officer director may approve the application for a
well or wells constructed before September 9, 1993, but may specifically deny
the applicant the right to request regulation of junior appropriators if the
Chief Water Officer director, at the time of approval, finds that the well or
wells, at the time of their construction, were not located, designed, or
constructed so as to take reasonable advantage of aquifer conditions in the
area to minimize the frequency and amount of the demand for flows for induced
ground water recharge. Thereafter a public water supplier holding an approved
application which has been denied the right to request regulation of junior
appropriators may petition the Chief Water Officer director for a hearing to
present evidence showing the Chief Water Officer director that the well or
wells have been modified, relocated, or reconstructed to take reasonable
advantage of the aquifer conditions in the area. If the Chief Water Officer
director determines that the well or wells have been so modified, relocated, or
reconstructed, the Chief Water Officer director shall cause to be modified the
approval of the application to allow for the regulation of junior
appropriators, subject to the restrictions or conditions applicable to public
water suppliers.
(c) An application for an induced ground water recharge appropriation for
public water supplier wells constructed and placed in service before September
9, 1993, shall not be subject to the requirements of sections 46-288 and
46-289.
(3) An application for an induced ground water recharge appropriation for
public water supplier wells constructed or to be constructed on or after
September 9, 1993, shall be approved by the Chief Water Officer director if he
or she makes the findings required by subdivision (2)(a) of this section and
further finds that:
(a) There is unappropriated water available for the appropriation; and
(b) The well or wells involved have been or will be located and
constructed to take reasonable advantage of aquifer conditions in the area to
minimize the frequency and amount of the demand for flows for induced ground
water recharge.
(4)(a) The Chief Water Officer director may approve the application filed
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section for a smaller amount of water than
requested by the applicant. The Chief Water Officer director may also impose
reasonable conditions on the manner and timing of the appropriation which the
Chief Water Officer director deems necessary to protect the public interest.
The Chief Water Officer director may grant an appropriation for specific months
-37-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
of the year if so demanded by the public interest. If the Chief Water Officer
director approves the application, he or she shall issue a written order, which
written order shall include the findings required by this section, the amount
of the appropriation, and any conditions or limitations imposed under this
section.
(b) In determining whether an application for an appropriation for induced
ground water recharge is in the public interest, the Chief Water Officer's
director's considerations shall include, but not be limited to, the possible
adverse effects on existing surface water or ground water users and the
economic, social, and environmental value of such uses, including, but not
limited to, irrigation, recreation, fish and wildlife, public water supply,
induced ground water recharge for public water supply systems, and water
quality maintenance.
(c) The stream segment and the determination of a reasonable and necessary
amount of water required for induced ground water recharge purposes throughout
the reach shall be defined specifically by the Chief Water Officer director in
the order issued under this section.
Sec. 89. Section 46-235.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-235.01 A public water supplier which has received an appropriation for
induced ground water recharge pursuant to section 46-235 may, from time to time
and within twenty-five years after the priority assigned pursuant to section
46-233, petition the Chief Water Officer department for a hearing to present
evidence showing that all or part of the original projection for additional
water needs specified pursuant to subsection (2) of section 46-233 corresponds
with the actual use. To the extent the public water supplier is making
beneficial use of all or a portion of the water projected in the original
application, the right to use such additional water shall vest and the priority
date of such anticipated water use shall date back to the priority date
assigned pursuant to section 46-233. A public water supplier may not request
such a hearing at intervals of less than five years for each approved
application.
Sec. 90. Section 46-235.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-235.02 (1) Just compensation shall be required if a public water
supplier exercises a preference to the injury of a senior appropriator.
(2) Just compensation shall be provided by a public water supplier to any
injured junior appropriator whose appropriation was perfected prior to
September 9, 1993, if and to the extent such injury resulted from regulation of
junior appropriators requested by the public water supplier to provide water
for any purpose other than domestic. Such compensation shall not be required to
a junior appropriator if the regulation requested is to provide water for
domestic purposes only. At the time any junior appropriator whose appropriation
was perfected prior to September 9, 1993, is regulated at the request of a
public water supplier, the Chief Water Officer department shall determine for
each such appropriator the extent to which the regulation is for domestic
purposes and the extent to which it is for other purposes.
(3) A cause of action for just compensation shall accrue at the time a
junior appropriator is regulated by the Chief Water Officer department.
Sec. 91. Section 46-235.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-235.03 Natural resources districts shall have the authority to impose
restrictions or controls on public water suppliers as specified in the Nebraska
Ground Water Management and Protection Act. Such restrictions or controls may
limit the withdrawal of ground water to a greater degree or extent than is
otherwise permitted or allowed by a permit issued by the Chief Water Officer
department.
Sec. 92. Section 46-235.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-235.04 (1) Induced ground water recharge appropriations shall be
administered in the same manner as prescribed by Chapter 46, article 2, for
other appropriations. Appropriations for induced ground water recharge may be
canceled and annulled as provided in sections 46-229.02 to 46-229.05.
(2) The Chief Water Officer department may approve the transfer of
priority dates among water wells, including replacement water wells, located
within a single well field that are subject to an induced recharge
appropriation, or are part of an application for such an appropriation, to
improve the well field's efficiency of operation with respect to river flow.
The transfers shall be approved if the Chief Water Officer department finds
that (a) the transfers would not increase the quantity of induced ground water
recharge under the original priority date or application, (b) the amount of
water withdrawn from water wells under the original priority date or
application would not increase, (c) the quantity of streamflow needed to
sustain well field operation under the original priority date would decrease,
(d) the transfer would not impair the rights of other appropriators, and (e)
the transfer is in the public interest in the same manner as provided in
section 46-235. The Chief Water Officer department may assign multiple priority
dates to a single water well that replaces two or more water wells which are
abandoned. Replacement water wells installed pursuant to this subsection must
be installed within the same well field as the abandoned water well. Notice
shall be furnished and any hearing held as provided in sections 46-291 and
46-292. For purposes of this subsection, single well field means those
contiguous tracts of land owned or leased by the applicant containing two or
-38-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
more water wells subject to induced recharge.
Sec. 93. Section 46-236, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-236 An application for appropriation of water for water power shall
meet the requirements of section 46-234 and subsection (1) of section 46-235 to
be approved. Within six months after the approval of an application for water
power and before placing water to any beneficial use, the applicant shall enter
into a contract with the State of Nebraska, through the Chief Water Officer
department, for leasing the use of all water so appropriated. Such lease shall
be upon forms prepared by the Chief Water Officer department, and the time of
such lease shall not run for a greater period than fifty years; and for the use
of water for power purposes the applicant shall pay into the state treasury on
or before January 1 each year fifteen dollars for each one hundred horsepower
for all water so appropriated. Upon application of the lessee or its assigns,
the Chief Water Officer department shall renew the lease so as to continue it
and the water appropriation in full force and effect for an additional period
of fifty years.
Upon the failure of the applicant to comply with any of the provisions of
such lease and the failure to pay any of such fees, the Chief Water Officer
department shall notify the lessee that the required fees have not been paid to
the Chief Water Officer department or that the lessee is not otherwise in
compliance with the provisions of the lease. If the lessee has not come into
compliance with all provisions of the lease or has not paid to the Chief Water
Officer department all required fees within fifteen calendar days after the
date of such notice, the Chief Water Officer department shall issue an order
denying the applicant the right to divert or otherwise use the water
appropriation for power production. The Chief Water Officer department shall
rescind the order denying use of the water appropriation at such time as the
lessee has come into compliance with all provisions of the lease and has paid
all required fees to the Chief Water Officer department. If after forty-five
calendar days from the date of issuance of the order the lessee is not in
compliance with all provisions of the lease or required fees have not been paid
to the Chief Water Officer department, such lease and water appropriation shall
be canceled by the Chief Water Officer department.
Sec. 94. Section 46-237, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-237 (1) Within six months after approval and allowance of an
application other than an application to appropriate public waters for induced
ground water recharge, the applicant shall file with in the Chief Water Officer
office of the department a map or plat which shall conform to the rules and
regulations of the department as to material, size, coloring, and scale. Such
map or plat shall show the source from which the proposed appropriation is to
be taken and all proposed dams, dikes, reservoirs, canals, powerhouses, and
other structures for the purpose of storing, conveying, or using water for any
purpose whatsoever and their true courses or positions in connection with the
boundary lines and corners of lands which they occupy. The lands to be
irrigated shall be identified in the manner prescribed by the department. No
rights shall be deemed to have been acquired until the provisions of this
section have been complied with. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, failure to so comply shall work a forfeiture of the appropriation and
all rights thereunder.
(2) For any appropriation with a priority date earlier than 1958 but for
which either the appropriator has failed to comply with the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section or a map or plat required by such subsection has
been lost or destroyed through no fault of the appropriator, the lack of such
compliance or of such map or plat shall not be the basis for an a departmental
adjudication or cancellation of the appropriation by the Chief Water Officer
and the appropriation shall not be subject to legal challenge by any party on
that basis.
(3) The Chief Water Officer department may notify any appropriator subject
to subsection (2) of this section of the need to file a map or plat of lands
under such appropriation. Unless the Chief Water Officer department grants an
extension for good cause shown, the appropriator shall file the required map
within three years after that notification and such map shall conform to the
rules and regulations of the Chief Water Officer department as to material,
size, coloring, and scale. If the appropriator fails to comply, the Chief Water
Officer department may deny the appropriator the right to divert or withdraw
water subject to the appropriation until compliance has been achieved.
Sec. 95. Section 46-238, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-238 (1) Within twelve months after the approval of any application for
water for irrigation, power, or other useful purpose by the Chief Water Officer
department, the person making such application shall commence the excavation or
construction of the works in which it is intended to divert the water and the
actual construction of any water power plant and reservoir or reservoirs for
storage in connection therewith and shall vigorously, diligently, and
uninterruptedly prosecute such work to completion unless temporarily
interrupted by some unavoidable and natural cause. A failure to comply with
this section shall work a forfeiture of the appropriation and all rights under
the appropriation. The cost of promotion and engineering work shall not be
considered a part of the cost of construction, and the progress of the
construction work shall be such that one-tenth of the total work shall be
completed within one year from the date of approval of the application. The
-39-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
construction of all work required in connection with the proposed project shall
be prosecuted in the manner described in this section and with such a force as
shall assure the average rate of constructional progress necessary to complete
such work or works within the time stipulated in the approval of such
application, notwithstanding the ordinary delays and casualties that must be
expected and provided against. A failure to carry on the construction of either
an irrigation project or a water power project as outlined in this section
shall work a forfeiture of the appropriation and all rights under the
appropriation, and the Chief Water Officer department shall cancel such
appropriation. The Chief Water Officer department shall have free access to all
records, books, and papers of any irrigation or water power company, shall have
the right to go upon the right-of-way and land of any such company, shall
inspect the work to see that it is being done according to plans and
specifications approved by the Chief Water Officer department, and shall also
keep a record of the cost of construction work when deemed advisable for
physical valuation purposes.
(2) The Chief Water Officer department may extend, for reasonable lengths
of time, the time for commencing excavation or construction, completion of
works, the application of water to a beneficial use, or any of the other
requirements for completing or perfecting an application for flow or storage
rights as fixed in the approval of an application or otherwise for the
appropriation of water. Such extension may be granted upon a petition to the
Chief Water Officer department and the showing of reasonable cause. The Chief
Water Officer department shall cause a notice of each petition received to be
published at the petitioner's expense in at least one newspaper of general
circulation in the county or counties of the appropriation once a week for
three consecutive weeks. The Chief Water Officer department shall hold a
hearing on the issue of extension on the Chief Water Officer's its own motion
or if requested by any interested person. If a hearing is held, notice shall be
given by certified mail to the applicant, to any person who requested a
hearing, and to any person who requests notification of the hearing. The Chief
Water Officer department may grant the extension in the absence of a hearing if
no requests for a hearing are received. Any interested person may be made a
party to such action. Any party affected by the decision on the petition may
appeal directly to the Court of Appeals. Subsequent extensions may be made in
the same manner.
Sec. 96. Section 46-240.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-240.01 All appropriators of water for agricultural purposes of less
than the statutory limit of direct flow from the public waters of this state
within the drainage basin of the stream from which such waters originate shall
be entitled to such additional appropriation or appropriations from the direct
flow of such stream, within the statutory limits provided by law, as may be
necessary and required for the production of crops in the practice of good
husbandry. Applications for such supplemental additional appropriations from
the direct flow, upon the approval or granting thereof, shall have priority
within the drainage basin as of the date such applications are filed with in
the Chief Water Officer office of the department.
Sec. 97. Section 46-241, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-241 (1) Every person intending to construct and operate a storage
reservoir for irrigation or any other beneficial purpose or intending to
construct and operate a facility for intentional underground water storage and
recovery shall, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section
and section 46-243, make an application to the Chief Water Officer department
upon the prescribed form and provide such plans, drawings, and specifications
as are necessary to comply with the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act. Such
application shall be filed and proceedings had thereunder in the same manner
and under the same rules and regulations as other applications. Upon the
approval of such application under this section and any approval required by
the act, the applicant shall have the right to construct and impound in such
reservoir, or store in and recover from such underground water storage
facility, all water not otherwise appropriated and any appropriated water not
needed for immediate use, to construct and operate necessary ditches for the
purpose of conducting water to such storage reservoir or facility, and to
condemn land for such reservoir, ditches, or other facility. The procedure to
condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704
to 76-724.
(2) Any person intending to construct an on-channel reservoir with a water
storage impounding capacity of less than fifteen acre-feet measured below the
crest of the lowest open outlet or overflow shall be exempt from subsection (1)
of this section as long as there will be (a) no diversion or withdrawal of
water from the reservoir for any purpose other than for watering range
livestock and (b) no release from the reservoir to provide water for a
downstream diversion or withdrawal for any purpose other than for watering
range livestock. This subsection does not exempt any person from the
requirements of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act or section 54-2425.
(3) Any person intending to construct a reservoir, holding pond, or lagoon
for the sole purpose of holding, managing, or disposing of animal or human
waste shall be exempt from subsection (1) of this section. This subsection does
not exempt any person from any requirements of the Safety of Dams and
Reservoirs Act or section 46-233 or 54-2425.
(4) Every person intending to modify or rehabilitate an existing storage
-40-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
reservoir so that its impounding capacity is to be increased shall comply with
subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The owner of a storage reservoir or facility shall be liable for all
damages arising from leakage or overflow of the water therefrom or from the
breaking of the embankment of such reservoir. The owner or possessor of a
reservoir or intentional underground water storage facility does not have the
right to store water in such reservoir or facility during the time that such
water is required downstream in ditches for direct irrigation or for any
reservoir or facility holding a senior right. Every person who owns, controls,
or operates a reservoir or intentional underground water storage facility,
except political subdivisions of this state, shall be required to pass through
the outlets of such reservoir or facility, whether presently existing or
hereafter constructed, a portion of the measured inflows to furnish water for
livestock in such amounts and at such times as directed by the Chief Water
Officer department to meet the requirements for such purposes as determined by
the Chief Water Officer department, except that a reservoir or facility owner
shall not be required to release water for this purpose which has been legally
stored. Any dam shall be constructed in accordance with the Safety of Dams and
Reservoirs Act, and the outlet works shall be installed so that water may be
released in compliance with this section. The requirement for outlet works may
be waived by the Chief Water Officer department upon a showing of good cause.
Whenever any person diverts water from a public stream and returns it into the
same stream, he or she may take out the same amount of water, less a reasonable
deduction for losses in transit, to be determined by the Chief Water Officer
department, if no prior appropriator for beneficial use is prejudiced by such
diversion.
(6) An application for storage and recovery of water intentionally stored
underground may be made only by an appropriator of record who shows, by
documentary evidence, sufficient interest in the underground water storage
facility to entitle the applicant to the water requested.
Sec. 98. Section 46-242, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-242 (1) After the completion to the satisfaction of the Chief Water
Officer department of a storage reservoir for which a permit has been obtained
pursuant to section 46-241, any person proposing to apply to beneficial use the
water stored shall file with the Chief Water Officer department an application
for a permit particularly describing the use to which the water is to be
applied and, if for irrigation, describing the land to be irrigated.
(2) Application may be made for a permit to appropriate water for the
irrigation of land lying both upstream and downstream from a storage reservoir
or intentional underground water storage facility. Under an approved
application for a permit to appropriate water stored in a reservoir or facility
for use on land upstream from such reservoir or facility, water may be diverted
from the stream by the applicant and a compensating amount of water shall be
released from the reservoir or facility for the use of downstream
appropriators, but the rights of prior appropriators shall not be adversely
affected by such exchange of water.
(3) The owner of a storage reservoir shall have a preferred right to make
such application for a period of six months from the time limited for the
completion of such reservoir. The date of the expiration of such period shall
be endorsed upon the application when allowed. If an application is made by a
person other than the owner of a reservoir at any time, the application shall
not be approved by the Chief Water Officer department until the applicant
shows, by documentary evidence, sufficient interest in such storage reservoir
to entitle the applicant to enough water for the purpose set forth in the
application.
(4) Application may be made for a permit to appropriate water from a
storage reservoir, subject to subsection (3) of this section, or an intentional
underground water storage facility, subject to subsection (6) of section
46-241, for instream use of water for recreation or fish and wildlife if the
appropriation will not prejudice the rights of any prior appropriator for a
beneficial use.
(5) An unapproved application for a permit pursuant to this section which
is pending on August 26, 1983, may be amended to include use of stored water
for intentional underground water storage.
Sec. 99. Section 46-250, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-250 The owner of any ditch, storage reservoir, storage capacity, or
other device for appropriating water may, upon petition to the Chief Water
Officer Department of Natural Resources, and upon its approval, change the
point at which the water under any water appropriation of record is diverted
from a natural stream or reservoir, change the line of any flume, ditch, or
aqueduct, or change a storage site. No reclamation district or power
appropriator may change the established return flow point without the approval
of the Chief Water Officer department.
Sec. 100. Section 46-252, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-252 (1) Any person may conduct, either from outside the state or from
sources located in the state, quantities of water over and above those already
present into or along any of the natural streams or channels of this state, for
purposes of instream beneficial uses or withdrawal of some or all of such water
for out-of-stream beneficial uses, at any point without regard to any prior
appropriation of water from such stream, due allowance being made for losses in
-41-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
transit to be determined by the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural
Resources. The Chief Water Officer department shall monitor movement of the
water by measurements or other means and shall be responsible for assuring that
such quantities are not subsequently diverted or withdrawn by others unless
they are authorized to do so by the person conducting the water.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, before
any person may conduct water into or along any of the natural streams or
channels of the state, he or she shall first obtain a permit from the Chief
Water Officer department. Application for the permit shall be made on forms
provided by the Chief Water Officer department. Applications shall include
plans and specifications detailing the intended times, amounts, and streamreach
locations and such other information as required by the Chief Water Officer
department. The water subject to such a permit shall be deemed appropriated for
the use specified in the permit. Permitholders shall be liable for any damages
resulting from the overflow of such stream or channel when water so conducted
contributed to such overflow.
(3) Any person actually engaged in the construction or operation of any
water power plant may, without filing with the Chief Water Officer department
and upon payment of all damages, use any such stream or channel for a tailrace
or canal and may, whenever necessary, widen, deepen, or straighten the bed of
any such stream. All damages resulting therefrom shall be determined in the
manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.
(4) Any person holding a storage use permit pursuant to section 46-242
shall not be required to obtain the permit required by this section.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt a person from
obtaining any other permits required by law.
Sec. 101. Section 46-254, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-254 Any person owning or in control of any ditch, reservoir, or other
device for appropriating or using water who willfully opens, closes, changes,
or interferes with any headgate or controlling gate, or by any method or means
takes any water from any natural stream, reservoir, or other source, through
any ditch or canal to any land or lands, or allows the same to be done, or uses
or allows to be used any water upon any land or lands, or for any other purpose
whatsoever, without authority from the Chief Water Officer Department of
Natural Resources, or who stores water in or releases water from a reservoir
other than in compliance with orders of the Chief Water Officer Director of
Natural Resources or his or her representative, shall be guilty of a Class II
misdemeanor. Each day that the water is allowed to run without authority from
the Chief Water Officer department shall constitute a separate offense.
Sec. 102. Section 46-256, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-256 Persons owning or controlling any ditch, canal, or reservoir for
the purpose of storing or using water for any purpose shall, upon thirty days'
notice by the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources, construct
and maintain at the point of diversion a substantial headgate, of a design
approved by the Chief Water Officer department, so built that it may be closed,
or partially closed and fastened at any stage with lock or seal. They shall
also construct a device for measuring and apportioning the water appropriated,
which device shall be of a design approved by the Chief Water Officer
department and built at the most practical point to be selected and fixed by
the Chief Water Officer it. If they neglect or refuse, for a period of ten
days, to construct such headgate and measuring device, the Chief Water Officer
department shall refuse to allow any water to be delivered to or used by or
through any such ditch, canal, or reservoir or any other contrivance or device
for appropriating, using, or storing water, and the Chief Water Officer
department may construct bars, dams, or other obstructions to prevent such
delivery or use.
Sec. 103. Section 46-258, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-258 Any owner or person in control of any ditch for irrigation purposes
shall have the ditch in order to receive water from the source of supply on or
before April 15 of each year, shall construct necessary outlets in the banks
for the delivery of water to all persons who are entitled to the same, and
shall maintain a substantial headgate and measuring box or weir at the head of
each lateral, which shall be constructed in accordance with plans and
specifications approved by the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural
Resources. A multiplicity of outlets shall be avoided. The outlet shall be at
the most convenient and practicable point consistent with the protection and
safety of the ditch and the efficient distribution of water among the various
claimants thereof.
Sec. 104. Section 46-261, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-261 (1) The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources may
require an appropriator or his or her agent to furnish the Chief Water Officer
department, by April 1 in any year, a list or map of all lands to be irrigated,
the acreage of each tract, and the names of the owners, controllers, or
officers for every ditch, reservoir, or other device for appropriating,
diverting, carrying, or distributing water to be used as a basis for the
distribution of water until April 1 of the following year, and if so ordered
such a list or map shall be furnished by the appropriator or his or her agent
to the Chief Water Officer department.
(2) By April 1, any district or company which has transferred an
-42-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
appropriation pursuant to sections 46-2,127 to 46-2,129 in the previous
calendar year shall provide the Chief Water Officer department:
(a) A legal description and list or map of the tracts of land receiving
and transferring an appropriation of water, or portion thereof, within the
district or company;
(b) The water appropriation permit number under sections 46-233 to 46-235
and the priority date of the water appropriation;
(c) A statement on whether objections were filed, whether a hearing was
held, and how consent was given;
(d) The effective date of the transfer of the appropriation; and
(e) A statement summarizing the water use on the receiving and
transferring tracts of land.
(3) The Chief Water Officer department may require the owner or controller
of any canal or ditch to install an approved recording gauge at one or more
specific locations to record the amount of water used.
(4) For any appropriation not held by an irrigation district, a
reclamation district, a public power and irrigation district, or a mutual
irrigation or canal company, the Chief Water Officer department may require the
owner of an appropriation for irrigation purposes to provide the Chief Water
Officer department with any or all of the following information relative to the
use of water under the appropriation during the previous irrigation season: (a)
A list or map of all lands irrigated; (b) the acreage of each tract irrigated;
(c) the rate at which water was diverted; (d) the amount diverted; (e) for any
lands under the appropriation that were not irrigated, any sufficient cause, as
described in section 46-229.04, which the appropriator claims was the reason
for such nonuse; and (f) any other information needed by the Chief Water
Officer department to properly monitor and administer use of water under the
appropriation. If the appropriator claims sufficient cause for nonuse, he or
she shall also provide the Chief Water Officer department with any evidence the
Chief Water Officer department requires as a condition for accepting such
claimed cause as sufficient cause to excuse nonuse.
(5) The Chief Water Officer department may deny an appropriator the right
to any water to be delivered to or used by or through any ditch, reservoir, or
other contrivance for the appropriation, use, or storage of water if the
appropriator is not in compliance with this section, with subsection (2) of
section 46-230, or with any conditions of any permit, notice, or order of the
Chief Water Officer department concerning the appropriation. The Chief Water
Officer department may construct bars or dams or may install such other devices
as are necessary to prevent such delivery or use.
Sec. 105. Section 46-263.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-263.02 The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources is
hereby authorized and empowered to offer and pay out of the fees collected by
the Chief Water Officer department rewards of not to exceed twenty-five dollars
in any case for the apprehension and conviction of any person or persons
violating the provisions of section 46-263.01.
Sec. 106. Section 46-273, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-273 The United States of America is hereby authorized, in conformity to
the laws of the State of Nebraska, to appropriate, develop, and store any
unappropriated flood or unused waters, in connection with any project
constructed by the United States pursuant to the provisions of an Act of
Congress approved June 17, 1902, being An Act providing for the reclamation of
arid lands (32 Stat. L. 388), and all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental
thereto. When the officers of the United States Bureau of Reclamation determine
that any water so developed or stored is in excess of the needs of the project
as then completed or is flood or unused water, the United States may contract
to furnish such developed, stored, flood, or unused water, under the terms and
conditions imposed by Act of Congress and the rules and regulations of the
United States, to any person who may have theretofore been granted a permit to
appropriate a portion of the normal flow of any stream, if the water so
appropriated shall, during some portion of the year, be found insufficient for
the needs of the land to which it is appurtenant. The United States and every
person entering into a contract as herein provided shall have the right to
conduct such water into and along any of the natural streams of the state, but
not so as to raise the waters thereof above the ordinary high water mark, and
may take out the same again at any point desired, without regard to the prior
rights of others to water from the same stream; but due allowance shall be made
for losses in transit, the amount of such allowance to be determined by the
Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources. The Chief Water Officer
department shall supervise and enforce the distribution of such water so
delivered with like authority and under the same provisions as in the case of
general appropriators.
Sec. 107. Section 46-286, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-286 An ephemeral natural stream shall mean that portion of a natural
stream in which water flows only after a precipitation event or when augmented
by surface water runoff caused by the pumping of ground water for irrigation.
The portion of a natural stream that is shown as an intermittent stream on the
most recent United States Geological Survey topographic quadrangle map
published prior to July 18, 2008, shall be considered an ephemeral natural
stream unless the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources has
investigated the stream and determined that the stream or a reach of the stream
-43-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
is perennial or intermittent and subject to Chapter 46, article 2. The Chief
Water Officer's department's determination for the purposes of this section
shall be adopted and promulgated in rule or regulation.
Sec. 108. Section 46-288, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-288 For purposes of this section and section 46-289, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Basin of origin shall mean the river basin in which the point or
proposed point of diversion of water is located;
(2) Beneficial use shall include, but not be limited to, reasonable and
efficient use of water for domestic, municipal, agricultural, industrial,
commercial, power production, subirrigation, fish and wildlife, ground water
recharge, interstate compact, water quality maintenance, or recreational
purposes. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to affect the
preferences for use of surface water as provided in section 46-204;
(3) Interbasin transfer shall mean the diversion of water in one river
basin and the transportation of such water to another river basin for storage
or utilization for a beneficial use; and
(4) River basin shall mean any of the following natural hydrologic basins
of the state as shown on maps located in the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources: (a) The White River and Hat Creek basin; (b) the
Niobrara River basin; (c) the Platte River basin, including the North Platte
and South Platte River basins, except that for purposes of transfer between the
North and South Platte River basins each shall be considered a separate river
basin; (d) the Loup River basin; (e) the Elkhorn River basin; (f) the
Republican River basin; (g) the Little Blue River basin; (h) the Big Blue River
basin; (i) the Nemaha River basin; and (j) the Missouri tributaries basin.
Sec. 109. Section 46-289, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-289 The Legislature finds, recognizes, and declares that the transfer
of water to outside the boundaries of a river basin may have impacts on the
water and other resources in the basin and that such impacts differ from those
caused by uses of water within the same basin in part because any unused water
will not be returned to the stream from which it is taken for further use in
that river basin. The Legislature therefor recognizes the need to delineate
factors for consideration by the Chief Water Officer of the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Director of Natural Resources when evaluating an
application made pursuant to section 46-233 which involves an interbasin
transfer of water in order to determine whether denial of such application is
demanded by the public interest. Those considerations shall include, but not be
limited to, the following factors:
(1) The economic, environmental, and other benefits of the proposed
interbasin transfer and use;
(2) Any adverse impacts of the proposed interbasin transfer and use;
(3) Any current beneficial uses being made of the unappropriated water in
the basin of origin;
(4) Any reasonably foreseeable future beneficial uses of the water in the
basin of origin;
(5) The economic, environmental, and other benefits of leaving the water
in the basin of origin for current or future beneficial uses;
(6) Alternative sources of water supply available to the applicant; and
(7) Alternative sources of water available to the basin of origin for
future beneficial uses.
The application shall be deemed in the public interest if the overall
benefits to the state and the applicant's basin are greater than or equal to
the adverse impacts to the state and the basin of origin. The Chief Water
Officer's director's order granting or denying an application shall specify the
reasons for such action, including a discussion of the required factors for
consideration, and shall document such decision by reference to the hearing
record, if any, and to any other sources used by the Chief Water Officer
director in making the decision.
Sec. 110. Section 46-290, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-290 (1)(a) Except as provided in this section and sections 46-2,120 to
46-2,130, any person having a permit to appropriate water for beneficial
purposes issued pursuant to sections 46-233 to 46-235, 46-240.01, 46-241,
46-242, or 46-637 and who desires (i) to transfer the use of such appropriation
to a location other than the location specified in the permit, (ii) to change
that appropriation to a different type of appropriation as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, or (iii) to change the purpose for which the
water is to be used under a natural-flow, storage, or storage-use appropriation
to a purpose not at that time permitted under the appropriation shall apply for
approval of such transfer or change to the Chief Water Officer Department of
Natural Resources.
(b) The application for such approval shall contain (i) the number
assigned to such appropriation by the Chief Water Officer department, (ii) the
name and address of the present holder of the appropriation, (iii) if
applicable, the name and address of the person or entity to whom the
appropriation would be transferred or who will be the user of record after a
change in the location of use, type of appropriation, or purpose of use under
the appropriation, (iv) the legal description of the land to which the
appropriation is now appurtenant, (v) the name and address of each holder of a
mortgage, trust deed, or other equivalent consensual security interest against
-44-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
the tract or tracts of land to which the appropriation is now appurtenant, (vi)
if applicable, the legal description of the land to which the appropriation is
proposed to be transferred, (vii) if a transfer is proposed, whether other
sources of water are available at the original location of use and whether any
provisions have been made to prevent either use of a new source of water at the
original location or increased use of water from any existing source at that
location, (viii) if applicable, the legal descriptions of the beginning and end
of the stream reach to which the appropriation is proposed to be transferred
for the purpose of augmenting the flows in that stream reach, (ix) if a
proposed transfer is for the purpose of increasing the quantity of water
available for use pursuant to another appropriation, the number assigned to
such other appropriation by the Chief Water Officer department, (x) the purpose
of the current use, (xi) if a change in purpose of use is proposed, the
proposed purpose of use, (xii) if a change in the type of appropriation is
proposed, the type of appropriation to which a change is desired, (xiii) if a
proposed transfer or change is to be temporary in nature, the duration of the
proposed transfer or change, and (xiv) such other information as the Chief
Water Officer department by rule and regulation requires.
(2) If a proposed transfer or change is to be temporary in nature, a copy
of the proposed agreement between the current appropriator and the person who
is to be responsible for use of water under the appropriation while the
transfer or change is in effect shall be submitted at the same time as the
application.
(3) Regardless of whether a transfer or a change in the purpose of use is
involved, the following changes in type of appropriation, if found by the Chief
Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Director of
Natural Resources to be consistent with section 46-294, may be approved subject
to the following:
(a) A natural-flow appropriation for direct out-of-stream use may be
changed to a natural-flow appropriation for aboveground reservoir storage or
for intentional underground water storage;
(b) A natural-flow appropriation for intentional underground water storage
may be changed to a natural-flow appropriation for direct out-of-stream use or
for aboveground reservoir storage;
(c) A natural-flow appropriation for direct out-of-stream use, for
aboveground reservoir storage, or for intentional underground water storage may
be changed to an instream appropriation subject to sections 46-2,107 to
46-2,119 if the Chief Water Officer director determines that the resulting
instream appropriation would be consistent with subdivisions (2), (3), and (4)
of section 46-2,115;
(d) A natural-flow appropriation for direct out-of-stream use, for
aboveground reservoir storage, or for intentional underground water storage may
be changed to an appropriation for induced ground water recharge if the Chief
Water Officer director determines that the resulting appropriation for induced
ground water recharge would be consistent with subdivisions (2)(a)(i) and (ii)
of section 46-235;
(e) An appropriation for the manufacturing of hydropower at a facility
located on a natural stream channel may be permanently changed in full to an
instream basin-management appropriation to be held jointly by the Game and
Parks Commission and any natural resources district or combination of natural
resources districts. The beneficial use of such change is to maintain the
streamflow for fish, wildlife, and recreation that was available from the
manufacturing of hydropower prior to the change. Such changed appropriation may
also be utilized by the owners of the appropriation to assist in the
implementation of an approved integrated management plan or plans developed
pursuant to sections 46-714 to 46-718 for each natural resources district
within the river basin. Any such change under this section shall be subject to
review under sections 46-229 to 46-229.06 to ensure that the beneficial uses of
the change of use are still being achieved; and
(f) The incidental underground water storage portion, whether or not
previously quantified, of a natural-flow or storage-use appropriation may be
separated from the direct-use portion of the appropriation and may be changed
to a natural-flow or storage-use appropriation for intentional underground
water storage at the same location if the historic consumptive use of the
direct-use portion of the appropriation is transferred to another location or
is terminated, but such a separation and change may be approved only if, after
the separation and change, (i) the total permissible diversion under the
appropriation will not increase, (ii) the projected consequences of the
separation and change are consistent with the provisions of any integrated
management plan adopted in accordance with section 46-718 or 46-719 for the
geographic area involved, and (iii) if the location of the proposed intentional
underground water storage is in a river basin, subbasin, or reach designated as
overappropriated in accordance with section 46-713, the integrated management
plan for that river basin, subbasin, or reach has gone into effect, and that
plan requires that the amount of the intentionally stored water that is
consumed after the change will be no greater than the amount of the
incidentally stored water that was consumed prior to the change. Approval of a
separation and change pursuant to this subdivision (f) shall not exempt any
consumptive use associated with the incidental recharge right from any
reduction in water use required by an integrated management plan for a river
basin, subbasin, or reach designated as overappropriated in accordance with
section 46-713.
Whenever any change in type of appropriation is approved pursuant to this
-45-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
subsection and as long as that change remains in effect, the appropriation
shall be subject to the statutes, rules, and regulations that apply to the type
of appropriation to which the change has been made.
(4) The Legislature finds that induced ground water recharge
appropriations issued pursuant to sections 46-233 and 46-235 and instream
appropriations issued pursuant to section 46-2,115 are specific to the location
identified in the appropriation. Neither type of appropriation shall be
transferred to a different location, changed to a different type of
appropriation, or changed to permit a different purpose of use.
(5) In addition to any other purposes for which transfers and changes may
be approved, such transfers and changes may be approved if the purpose is (a)
to maintain or augment the flow in a specific stream reach for any instream use
that the Chief Water Officer department has determined, through rules and
regulations, to be a beneficial use or (b) to increase the frequency that a
diversion rate or rate of flow specified in another valid appropriation is
achieved.
For any transfer or change approved pursuant to subdivision (a) of this
subsection, the Chief Water Officer department shall be provided with a report
at least every five years while such transfer or change is in effect. The
purpose of such report shall be to indicate whether the beneficial instream use
for which the flow is maintained or augmented continues to exist. If the report
indicates that it does not or if no report is filed within sixty days after the
Chief Water Officer's department's notice to the appropriator that the deadline
for filing the report has passed, the Chief Water Officer department may cancel
the its approval of the transfer or change and such appropriation shall revert
to the same location of use, type of appropriation, and purpose of use as prior
to such approval.
(6) A quantified or unquantified appropriation for incidental underground
water storage may be transferred to a new location along with the direct-use
appropriation with which it is recognized if the Chief Water Officer director
finds such transfer to be consistent with section 46-294 and determines that
the geologic and other relevant conditions at the new location are such that
incidental underground water storage will occur at the new location. The Chief
Water Officer director may request such information from the applicant as is
needed to make such determination and may modify any such quantified
appropriation for incidental underground water storage, if necessary, to
reflect the geologic and other conditions at the new location.
(7) Unless an incidental underground water storage appropriation is
changed as authorized by subdivision (3)(f) of this section or is transferred
as authorized by subsection (6) of this section or subsection (1) of section
46-291, such appropriation shall be canceled or modified, as appropriate, by
the Chief Water Officer director to reflect any reduction in water that will be
stored underground as the result of a transfer or change of the direct-use
appropriation with which the incidental underground water storage was
recognized prior to the transfer or change.
(8) Any appropriation for manufacturing of hydropower changed under
subdivision (3)(e) of this section shall maintain the priority date and
preference category of the original manufacturing appropriation and shall be
subject to condemnation and subordination pursuant to sections 70-668 and
70-669. Any person holding a subordination agreement that was established prior
to such change of appropriation shall be entitled to enter into a new
subordination agreement for terms consistent with the original subordination
agreement at no additional cost. Any person having obtained a condemnation
award that was established prior to such change of appropriation shall be
entitled to the same benefits created by such award, and any obligations
created by such award shall become the obligations of the new owner of the
appropriation changed under this section.
Sec. 111. Section 46-291, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-291 (1) Upon receipt of an application filed under section 46-290 for a
transfer in the location of use of an appropriation, the Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources shall review it for compliance with this
subsection. The Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources may approve
the application without notice or hearing if he or she determines that: (a) The
appropriation is used and will continue to be used exclusively for irrigation
purposes; (b) the only lands involved in the proposed transfer are (i) lands
within the quarter section of land to which the appropriation is appurtenant,
(ii) lands within such quarter section of land and one or more quarter sections
of land each of which is contiguous to the quarter section of land to which the
appropriation is appurtenant, or (iii) lands within the boundaries or service
area of and capable of service by the same irrigation district, reclamation
district, public power and irrigation district, or mutual irrigation or canal
company; (c) after the transfer, the total number of acres irrigated under the
appropriation will be no greater than the number of acres that could legally be
irrigated under the appropriation prior to the transfer; (d) all the land
involved in the transfer is under the same ownership or is within the same
irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and irrigation
district, or mutual irrigation or canal company; (e) the transfer will not
result in a change in the point of diversion or the point of diversion will be
changed but the change meets the following requirements: (i) The new point of
diversion is on the same named stream, the same tributary, or the same river or
creek as the approved point of diversion; (ii) the proposed point of diversion
will not move above or below an existing diversion point owned by another
-46-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
appropriator; and (iii) the proposed point of diversion will not move above or
below a tributary stream or a constructed river return or a constructed drain;
and (f) the transfer will not diminish the water supply available for or
otherwise adversely affect any other surface water appropriator. If transfer of
an appropriation with associated incidental underground water storage is
approved in accordance with this subsection, the associated incidental
underground water storage also may be transferred pursuant to this subsection
as long as such transfer would continue to be consistent with the requirements
of this subsection. If necessary, the boundaries of the incidental underground
water storage area may be modified to reflect any change in the location of
that storage consistent with such a transfer. Transfers shall not be approved
pursuant to this subsection until the Chief Water Officer department has
adopted and promulgated rules and regulations establishing the criteria the
Chief Water Officer it will use to determine whether proposed transfers are
consistent with subdivision (1)(f) of this section.
(2) If after reviewing an application filed under section 46-290 the Chief
Water Officer director determines that it cannot be approved pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, he or she shall cause a notice of such
application to be posted on the department's website of the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment, to be sent by certified mail to each holder of
a mortgage, trust deed, or other equivalent consensual security interest that
is identified by the applicant pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)(v) of section
46-290 and to any entity owning facilities currently used or proposed to be
used for purposes of diversion or delivery of water under the appropriation,
and to be published at the applicant's expense at least once each week for
three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper of general circulation in
each county containing lands to which the appropriation is appurtenant and, if
applicable, in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each county
containing lands to which the appropriation is proposed to be transferred.
(3) The notice shall contain: (a) A description of the appropriation; (b)
the number assigned to such appropriation in the records of the department; (c)
the date of priority; (d) if applicable, a description of the land or stream
reach to which such water appropriation is proposed to be transferred; (e) if
applicable, the type of appropriation to which the appropriation is proposed to
be changed; (f) if applicable, the proposed change in the purpose of use; (g)
whether the proposed transfer or change is to be permanent or temporary and, if
temporary, the duration of the proposed transfer or change; and (h) any other
information the Chief Water Officer director deems relevant and essential to
provide the interested public with adequate notice of the proposed transfer or
change.
(4) The notice shall state (a) that any interested person may object to
and request a hearing on the application by filing such objections in writing
specifically stating the grounds for each objection and (b) that any such
objection and request shall be filed with in the Chief Water Officer office of
the department within two weeks after the date of final publication of the
notice.
(5) Within the time period allowed by this section for the filing of
objections and requests for hearings, the county board of any county containing
land to which the appropriation is appurtenant and, if applicable, the county
board of any county containing land to which the appropriation is proposed to
be transferred may provide the Chief Water Officer department with comments
about the potential economic impacts of the proposed transfer or change in such
county. The filing of any such comments by a county board shall not make the
county a party in the application process, but such comments shall be
considered by the Chief Water Officer director in determining pursuant to
section 46-294 whether the proposed transfer or change is in the public
interest.
Sec. 112. Section 46-292, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-292 The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources may hold a
hearing on an application filed under section 46-290 on the Chief Water
Officer's its own motion and shall hold a hearing if a timely request therefor
is filed by any interested person in accordance with section 46-291. Any such
hearing shall be subject to section 61-206.
Sec. 113. Section 46-293, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-293 (1) The Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Director of Natural Resources shall independently review each
application subject to subsection (2) of section 46-291 to determine whether
the requirements of section 46-294 will be met if the transfer or change is
approved. The requirement of this subsection is not altered when there are
objectors who have become parties to the proposed transfer or change, but if a
hearing is called by the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources on
the Chief Water Officer's its own motion or as the result of a request therefor
filed in accordance with subsection (4) of section 46-291, any evidence
considered by the Chief Water Officer director in making such determinations
shall be made a part of the record of the hearing as provided in section
84-914.
(2) Either on his or her own motion or in response to objections or
comments received pursuant to subsection (4) or (5) of section 46-291, the
Chief Water Officer director may require the applicant to provide additional
information before a hearing will be scheduled or, if no hearing is to be held,
before the application will receive further consideration. The information
-47-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
requested may include economic, social, or environmental impact analyses of the
proposed transfer or change, information about the amount of water historically
consumed under the appropriation, copies of any plans for mitigation of any
anticipated adverse impacts that would result from the proposed transfer or
change, and such other information as the Chief Water Officer director deems
necessary in order to determine whether the proposed transfer or change is
consistent with section 46-294.
Sec. 114. Section 46-294, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-294 (1) Except for applications approved in accordance with subsection
(1) of section 46-291, the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Director of Natural Resources shall approve an
application filed pursuant to section 46-290 only if the application and the
proposed transfer or change meet the following requirements:
(a) The application is complete and all other information requested
pursuant to section 46-293 has been provided;
(b) The proposed use of water after the transfer or change will be a
beneficial use of water;
(c)(i) Any requested transfer in the location of use is within the same
river basin as defined in section 46-288 or (ii) the river basin from which the
appropriation is to be transferred is tributary to the river basin to which the
appropriation is to be transferred;
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
proposed transfer or change, alone or when combined with any new or increased
use of any other source of water at the original location or within the same
irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and irrigation
district, or mutual irrigation or canal company for the original or other
purposes, will not diminish the supply of water available for or otherwise
adversely affect any other water appropriator and will not significantly
adversely affect any riparian water user who files an objection in writing
pursuant to section 46-291;
(e) The quantity of water that is transferred for diversion or other use
at the new location will not exceed the historic consumptive use under the
appropriation or portion thereof being transferred, except that this
subdivision does not apply to (i) a transfer in the location of use if both the
current use and the proposed use are for irrigation, the number of acres to be
irrigated will not increase after the transfer, and the location of the
diversion from the stream will not change or (ii) a transfer or change in the
purpose of use of a surface water irrigation appropriation as provided for in
subsection (3), (5), or (6) of section 46-290 if the transfer or change in
purpose will not diminish the supply of water available or otherwise adversely
affect any other water appropriator, adversely affect Nebraska's ability to
meet its obligations under a multistate agreement, or result in administration
of the prior appropriation system by the Chief Water Officer Department of
Natural Resources, which would not have otherwise occurred;
(f) The appropriation, prior to the transfer or change, is not subject to
termination or cancellation pursuant to sections 46-229 to 46-229.04;
(g) If a proposed transfer or change is of an appropriation that has been
used for irrigation and is in the name of an irrigation district, reclamation
district, public power and irrigation district, or mutual irrigation or canal
company or is dependent upon any such district's or company's facilities for
water delivery, such district or company has approved the transfer or change;
(h) If the proposed transfer or change is of a storage-use appropriation
and if the owner of that appropriation is different from the owner of the
associated storage appropriation, the owner of the storage appropriation has
approved the transfer or change;
(i) If the proposed transfer or change is to be permanent, either (i) the
purpose for which the water is to be used before the transfer or change is in
the same preference category established by section 46-204 as the purpose for
which the water is to be used after the transfer or change or (ii) the purpose
for which the water is to be used before the transfer or change and the purpose
for which the water is to be used after the transfer or change are both
purposes for which no preferences are established by section 46-204;
(j) If the proposed transfer or change is to be temporary, it will be for
a duration of no less than one year and, except as provided in section
46-294.02, no more than thirty years;
(k) The transfer or change will not be inconsistent with any applicable
state or federal law and will not jeopardize the state's compliance with any
applicable interstate water compact or decree or cause difficulty in fulfilling
the provisions of any other formal state contract or agreement; and
(l) The proposed transfer or change is in the public interest. The Chief
Water Officer's director's considerations relative to the public interest shall
include, but not be limited to, (i) the economic, social, and environmental
impacts of the proposed transfer or change and (ii) whether and under what
conditions other sources of water are available for the uses to be made of the
appropriation after the proposed transfer or change. The Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to govern the Chief Water Officer's director's determination of
whether a proposed transfer or change is in the public interest.
(2) The applicant has the burden of proving that the proposed transfer or
change will comply with subdivisions (1)(a) through (l) of this section, except
that (a) the burden is on a riparian user to demonstrate his or her riparian
status and to demonstrate a significant adverse effect on his or her use in
-48-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
order to prevent approval of an application and (b) if both the current use and
the proposed use after a transfer are for irrigation, the number of acres to be
irrigated will not increase after the transfer, and the location of the
diversion from the stream will not change, there is a rebuttable presumption
that the transfer will be consistent with subdivision (1)(d) of this section.
(3) In approving an application, the Chief Water Officer director may
impose any reasonable conditions deemed necessary to protect the public
interest, to ensure consistency with any of the other criteria in subsection
(1) of this section, or to provide the Chief Water Officer department with
information needed to properly and efficiently administer the appropriation
while the transfer or change remains in effect. If necessary to prevent
diminution of supply for any other appropriator, the conditions imposed by the
Chief Water Officer director shall require that historic return flows be
maintained or replaced in quantity, timing, and location. After approval of any
such transfer or change, the appropriation shall be subject to all water use
restrictions and requirements in effect at any new location of use and, if
applicable, at any new diversion location. An appropriation for which a
transfer or change has been approved shall retain the same priority date as
that of the original appropriation. If an approved transfer or change is
temporary, the location of use, purpose of use, or type of appropriation shall
revert to the location of use, purpose of use, or type of appropriation prior
to the transfer or change.
(4) In approving an application for a transfer, the Chief Water Officer
director may also authorize the overlying of water appropriations on the same
lands, except that if any such overlying of appropriations would result in
either the authorized diversion rate or the authorized aggregate annual
quantity that could be diverted to be greater than is otherwise permitted by
section 46-231, the Chief Water Officer director shall limit the total
diversion rate or aggregate annual quantity for the appropriations overlain to
the rate or quantity that he or she determines is necessary, in the exercise of
good husbandry, for the production of crops on the land involved. The Chief
Water Officer director may also authorize a greater number of acres to be
irrigated if the amount and rate of water approved under the original
appropriation is not increased by the change of location. An increase in the
number of acres to be irrigated shall be approved only if (a) such an increase
will not diminish the supply of water available to or otherwise adversely
affect another water appropriator or (b) the transfer would not adversely
affect the water supply for any river basin, subbasin, or reach that has been
designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713 or determined to be
fully appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 and (i) the number of acres
authorized under the appropriation when originally approved has not been
increased previously, (ii) the increase in the number of acres irrigated will
not exceed five percent of the number of acres being irrigated under the permit
before the proposed transfer or a total of ten acres, whichever acreage is
less, and (iii) all the use will be either on the quarter section to which the
appropriation was appurtenant before the transfer or on an adjacent quarter
section.
Sec. 115. Section 46-294.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-294.01 Whenever a temporary transfer is approved in accordance with
sections 46-290 to 46-294, the applicant shall, within sixty days after the
order of approval of the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources,
cause copies of the following to be filed with the county clerk or register of
deeds of the county in which the land subject to the appropriation prior to the
transfer is located: (1) The permit by which the appropriation was established;
(2) the agreement by which the temporary transfer is to be effected; and (3)
the order of the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources approving
the temporary transfer. Whenever renewal of a temporary transfer is approved
pursuant to section 46-294.02, the applicant shall, within sixty days after
such approval, cause a copy of the order of the Chief Water Officer director
approving such renewal to be filed with the county clerk or register of deeds
of such county. Such documents shall be indexed to the land subject to the
appropriation prior to the transfer. The applicant shall file with the Chief
Water Officer department, within ninety days after the Chief Water Officer's
department's order of approval, proof of filing with the county clerk or
register of deeds. Failure to file such proof of filing within such ninety-day
time period shall be grounds for the Chief Water Officer director to negate any
prior approval of the transfer or renewal.
Sec. 116. Section 46-294.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-294.02 A temporary transfer or a change in the type or purpose of use
of an appropriation may be renewed or otherwise extended by the parties thereto
at any time following the midpoint of the transfer or change term, but any such
renewal or extension is subject to review and approval pursuant to sections
46-290 to 46-294. No renewal or extension shall cause the term of any such
temporary transfer or change to exceed thirty years in duration from the date
the renewal or extension is approved by the Chief Water Officer of the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Director of Natural Resources.
Sec. 117. Section 46-294.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-294.05 The Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Director of Natural Resources may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out sections 46-290 to 46-294.04.
-49-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Sec. 118. Section 46-296, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
46-296 For purposes of sections 46-202 and 46-295 to 46-2,106, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment;
(2) (1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources;
(2) Director means the Director of Natural Resources;
(3) Person means a natural person, partnership, limited liability company,
association, corporation, municipality, or agency or political subdivision of
the state or of the federal government;
(4) Underground water storage means the act of storing or recharging water
in underground strata. Such water shall be known as water stored underground
but does not include ground water as defined in section 46-706 which occurs
naturally;
(5) Intentional underground water storage means underground water storage
which is an intended purpose or result of a water project or use. Such storage
may be accomplished by any lawful means such as injection wells, infiltration
basins, canals, reservoirs, and other reasonable methods; and
(6) Incidental underground water storage means underground water storage
which occurs as an indirect result, rather than an intended or planned purpose,
of a water project or use and includes, but is not limited to, seepage from
reservoirs, canals, and laterals, and deep percolation from irrigated lands.
Sec. 119. Section 46-297, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-297 Any person who has an approved, unperfected appropriation pursuant
to Chapter 46, article 2, may apply to the Chief Water Officer department for a
modification of such permit to include intentional underground water storage
associated with the appropriation. The application shall be made on a form
prescribed and furnished by the Chief Water Officer department without cost to
the applicant. Upon receipt of such an application, the Chief Water Officer
department shall proceed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the Chief Water Officer department, subject to section
46-226.02.
Sec. 120. Section 46-2,101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,101 (1) Any person intending to levy fees or assessments in
accordance with section 46-299 or to modify such fees or assessments shall,
prior to levying such fees, assessments, modified fees, or modified
assessments, file with the Chief Water Officer department an application for
approval of authority to levy such fees on a form prescribed and furnished by
the Chief Water Officer department.
(2) Such an application shall include a fee schedule and the following
information:
(a) The source of the water stored or to be stored underground;
(b) The underground water storage method;
(c) The relative amounts of water stored or to be stored underground and
naturally occurring ground water;
(d) The data or reference studies used by the applicant to determine the
underground water storage;
(e) A description of the areas served or to be served by the water stored
underground;
(f) The amount of surface water, if any, for which the applicant has an
appropriation; and
(g) The manner, use, and location of any such surface water appropriation.
The application shall be processed under the applicable rules and
regulations of the Chief Water Officer department adopted and promulgated
pursuant to section 61-206.
(3) An application shall be approved if the fees, assessments, modified
fees, or modified assessments appear reasonable and comply with the
requirements of section 46-299.
(4) The Chief Water Officer department shall review approved fee schedules
every five years after approval to determine whether the fees should be
increased, decreased, or eliminated, except that if the adopted schedules have
been pledged to repayment of financing for the project, the Chief Water Officer
department shall only review after repayment is completed.
Sec. 121. Section 46-2,104, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,104 If an action is commenced pursuant to section 46-2,102 or
46-2,103, an order of the Chief Water Officer director identifying water stored
or to be stored underground, or approving fees or assessments, may not be
collaterally attacked.
Sec. 122. Section 46-2,105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,105 Any person aggrieved by a decision made or an order issued by the
Chief Water Officer director pursuant to section 46-226.02, 46-233, 46-240,
46-241, 46-242, 46-297, or 46-2,101 may appeal as provided in section 61-207.
Sec. 123. Section 46-2,108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,108 (1) For purposes of sections 46-2,107 to 46-2,119, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(a) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of
-50-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Water, Energy, and Environment;
(b) (a) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources; and
(b) Director means the Director of Natural Resources; and
(c) Instream appropriation means the undiverted application of the waters
of a natural stream within or bordering upon the state for recreation or fish
and wildlife purposes.
(2) An instream appropriation may be obtained only by the Game and Parks
Commission or a natural resources district and only for that amount of water
necessary for recreation or fish and wildlife. The instream use of water for
recreation or fish and wildlife shall be considered a beneficial use of water.
Sec. 124. Section 46-2,109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,109 Each natural resources district and the Game and Parks Commission
shall conduct studies to identify specific stream segments which the district
or commission considers to have a critical need for instream flows. Such
studies shall quantify the instream flow needs in the identified stream
segments. Any district or the Game and Parks Commission may request the
assistance of the Conservation and Survey Division of the University of
Nebraska, the Game and Parks Commission, the Department of Environment and
Energy, the Department of Natural Resources, or any other state agency or the
Chief Water Officer in order to comply with this section.
Sec. 125. Section 46-2,110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,110 Following notice and a public hearing, any natural resources
district or the Game and Parks Commission may file with the Chief Water Officer
director an application for a permit to appropriate water for instream flows in
each stream segment identified pursuant to section 46-2,109. The application
shall include the locations on the stream at which the need for instream flows
begins and ends and the time of year when instream flows are most critical. The
application shall also provide a detailed description of the amount of water
necessary to provide adequate instream flows.
Sec. 126. Section 46-2,111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,111 (1) The Legislature finds that instream appropriations for
recreation, fish, and wildlife should consider preferences among different uses
and that all appropriations should consider the possible legal relationship
between surface water and ground water. Thus the Legislature finds that, since
such issues have not been fully considered, the director shall not grant any
permit to appropriate water, except as specified in subsection (2) of this
section, before January 1, 1997, for any application pending on or filed after
June 2, 1995.
(2) The Chief Water Officer director may grant applications for (a)
appropriations for flood control or sediment control structures which will not
make or cause to be made any consumptive use of the impounded water, (b)
applications for temporary appropriations for public construction that are five
cubic feet per second or less, or (c) applications by public water suppliers
for induced ground water recharge appropriations pursuant to sections 46-233 to
46-238.
Sec. 127. Section 46-2,112, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,112 A permit to appropriate water for instream flows shall be subject
to review every fifteen years after it is granted. Notice of a pending review
shall be published in a newspaper published or of general circulation in the
area involved at least once each week for three consecutive weeks, the last
publication to be not later than fourteen years and ten months after the permit
was granted or after the date of the Chief Water Officer's director's action
following the last such review, whichever is later, and such notice shall be
mailed to the appropriator of record and posted on the department's website.
The notice shall state that any interested person may file comments relating to
the review of the instream appropriation or may request a hearing to present
evidence relevant to such review. Any such comments or request for hearing
shall be filed with in the Chief Water Officer headquarters office of the
department within six weeks after the date of final publication of the notice.
The appropriator of record shall, within the six-week period, file written
documentation of the continued use of the appropriation. If no requests for
hearing are received and if the Chief Water Officer director is satisfied with
the information provided by the appropriator of record that the appropriation
continues to be beneficially used and is in the public interest, the Chief
Water Officer director shall issue an order stating such findings. If requested
by any interested person, or on his or her own motion based on the comments and
information filed, the Chief Water Officer director shall schedule a hearing.
If a hearing is held, the purpose of the hearing shall be to receive evidence
regarding whether the water appropriated under the permit still provides the
beneficial uses for which the permit was granted and whether the permit is
still in the public interest. The hearing shall proceed under the rebuttable
presumption that the appropriation continues to provide the beneficial uses for
which the permit was granted and that the appropriation is in the public
interest. After the hearing, the Chief Water Officer director may by order
modify or cancel, in whole or in part, the instream appropriation.
Sec. 128. Section 46-2,113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,113 It is in the state's and the public interest that the filing of
-51-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
the following classes of applications before the Chief Water Officer department
demand that the Chief Water Officer director shall appropriately modify any
existing or pending instream appropriation or application to not interfere with
such application or the granting of such appropriation:
(1) Applications for induced recharge to public water supply wells;
(2) Applications for storage rights necessary for flood and sediment
control projects which are dry or will not result in a net consumption of water
exceeding two hundred acre-feet on an average annual basis;
(3) Applications for transfer permits associated with natural flow,
storage use, power generation, or hydropower;
(4) Applications for de minimis uses; or
(5) Applications for industrial or manufacturing de minimis consumptive
uses.
Sec. 129. Section 46-2,114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,114 Prior to taking action on an application for an instream
appropriation, the Chief Water Officer director shall conduct any studies he or
she deems necessary to evaluate the application and shall publish notice of
such application at the applicant's expense at least once a week for three
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the
stream segment and also in a newspaper of statewide circulation. The notice
shall state that any person having an interest may in writing object to and
request a hearing on the application. Any such objection and request for
hearing shall be filed with the Chief Water Officer department within two weeks
of final publication of the notice.
Sec. 130. Section 46-2,115, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,115 An application for an instream appropriation which is pending on
or filed after January 1, 1997, shall be approved by the Chief Water Officer
director if he or she finds that:
(1) In order to allow for future beneficial uses, there is unappropriated
water available to provide the approved instream flow rate at least twenty
percent of the time during the period requested;
(2) The appropriation is necessary to maintain the existing recreational
uses or needs of existing fish and wildlife species;
(3) The appropriation will not interfere with any senior surface water
appropriation;
(4) The rate and timing of the flow is the minimum necessary to maintain
the existing recreational uses or needs of existing fish and wildlife species;
and
(5) The application is in the public interest.
The application may be granted for a rate of flow that is less than that
requested by the applicant or for a shorter period of time than requested by
the applicant.
Sec. 131. Section 46-2,116, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,116 In determining whether an application for an instream
appropriation is in the public interest, the Chief Water Officer director shall
consider the following factors:
(1) The economic, social, and environmental value of the instream use or
uses including, but not limited to, recreation, fish and wildlife, induced
recharge for municipal water systems, and water quality maintenance; and
(2) The economic, social, and environmental value of reasonably
foreseeable alternative out-of-stream uses of water that will be foregone or
accorded junior status if the appropriation is granted.
Sec. 132. Section 46-2,116.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,116.01 If the Chief Water Officer director determines that there is
insufficient unappropriated natural flow available for an application for an
instream appropriation and if the applicant consents, the Chief Water Officer
department may conduct a study to determine whether the instream flow needs can
be met through the use of stored water in new storage facilities. The study
shall address the availability of storage sites, the estimated cost of
providing any required storage, and such other findings and conclusions as the
Chief Water Officer department deems appropriate.
Sec. 133. Section 46-2,116.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,116.02 If the Chief Water Officer department determines that instream
flow needs can be met through the use of stored water in new storage facilities
after a study conducted under section 46-2,116.01, the applicant may request
financial assistance for the construction of necessary storage facilities from
the Nebraska Resources Development Fund. The cost of the project may be shared
with any other users of the stored water.
Sec. 134. Section 46-2,117, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,117 The Chief Water Officer director shall not conduct a contested
case hearing on an instream appropriation application filed after January 1,
1997, other than a hearing to address procedural matters, until such time as
the parties have completed mediation or nonbinding arbitration. Mediation or
nonbinding arbitration shall be deemed completed when the person retained to
conduct the mediation or nonbinding arbitration has concluded further efforts
would probably not result in resolution of major issues. The costs of mediation
or nonbinding arbitration shall be shared by the parties.
-52-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Sec. 135. Section 46-2,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,118 (1) All water used to provide instream flows shall be applied
only to that segment of the stream for which the appropriation is granted. The
stream segment and the determination of a reasonable and necessary amount of
water required for instream flow purposes shall be defined specifically by the
Chief Water Officer director in the permit.
(2) After the water allowed for instream flows has passed through the
defined stream segment, all rights to such water shall be deemed relinquished
and the water shall be available for appropriation.
Sec. 136. Section 46-2,119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,119 Instream appropriations shall be administered in the same manner
as prescribed by Chapter 46, article 2, for other appropriations. Reservoirs
shall not be required by the Chief Water Officer director to release, for the
benefit of an instream appropriation, water previously impounded in accordance
with section 46-241 or 46-243. Reservoirs with storage rights senior to an
instream appropriation shall not be required to pass, for the benefit of that
instream appropriation, inflows that could be stored by such reservoir if the
instream appropriation were not in effect. Notwithstanding subsection (5) of
section 46-241, a reservoir with storage rights senior to an instream
appropriation also shall not be required to pass inflows for downstream direct
irrigation if the appropriation for direct irrigation is junior to and would be
denied water because of that instream appropriation. Instream appropriations
may be canceled as provided in sections 46-229.02 to 46-229.05.
Sec. 137. Section 46-2,120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,120 (1) Any irrigation district, reclamation district, public power
and irrigation district, rural water district, or mutual irrigation or canal
company using the procedure described in sections 46-2,121 to 46-2,129 and
which is exempt from the Open Meetings Act shall provide notice by mail to each
owner of land in the district or served by the company not less than seven days
before any meeting or hearing under sections 46-2,121 to 46-2,129.
(2) For purposes of sections 46-2,120 to 46-2,130:
(a) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment; and
(b) (a) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.
Natural Resources; and
(b) Director means the Director of Natural Resources.
Sec. 138. Section 46-2,122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,122 (1) Any irrigation district, reclamation district, public power
and irrigation district, rural water district, or mutual irrigation or canal
company may file an application for transfer and a map with the Chief Water
Officer department identifying all tracts of lands that have received water
delivered by the district or company and beneficially applied to the tract in
at least one of the preceding ten consecutive years. The application for
transfer and map shall be prepared and filed in accordance with the rules and
regulations of the Chief Water Officer department.
(2) Any tract of land within the boundaries of the district or served by
the company may receive a water appropriation, or portion thereof, transferred
from a tract or tracts of land currently under the appropriation on file with
the Chief Water Officer department. The Chief Water Officer director shall
grant the transfer if:
(a) The owner of the land to which the water appropriation is attached and
the owner of the ditch, canal, or other diverting works subject to transfer
consent in writing to the Chief Water Officer department to the transfer of the
appropriation from the tract of land;
(b) The water allotment on the receiving tract of land will not exceed the
amount that can be beneficially used for the purposes for which the
appropriation was made and will not exceed the least amount of water that
experience may indicate is necessary, in the exercise of good husbandry, for
the production of crops;
(c) The water will be applied on the receiving tract to a use in the same
preference category as the use on the transferring tract; and
(d) The aggregate water use within the district or company after transfer
will not exceed the aggregate water appropriation held by the district or
company for the benefit of the owners of land to which the water appropriations
are attached.
Sec. 139. Section 46-2,123, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,123 The Chief Water Officer department may hold a hearing on the
application for transfer and map under section 46-2,122 if the Chief Water
Officer department determines that a hearing is necessary to determine whether
the application for transfer and map are in compliance with such section. The
Chief Water Officer department shall hold a hearing on the application if
requested by any owner of land within the district or served by the company.
The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with section 61-206 and the rules
and regulations of the Chief Water Officer department.
Sec. 140. Section 46-2,124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,124 Any irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and
irrigation district, rural water district, or mutual irrigation or canal
-53-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
company intending to file an application for transfer and a map with the Chief
Water Officer department under section 46-2,122 shall give notice prior to the
meeting at which the application and map will be approved for filing. Notice
shall be given in the manner provided in section 46-2,128.
Sec. 141. Section 46-2,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,125 After an investigation and hearing, if applicable, the Chief
Water Officer director shall issue an order granting or denying the application
for transfer and map under section 46-2,122. The Chief Water Officer director
shall deny the application if the conditions in subsection (2) of such section
are not met. An order granting or denying an application for transfer and map
shall be in writing and shall specify the following:
(1) The tracts of land retaining an appropriation;
(2) The tracts of land receiving an appropriation; and
(3) The tracts of land transferring an appropriation.
An appeal may be taken from the decision of the Chief Water Officer
department on the application for transfer and map as provided in section
61-207.
Sec. 142. Section 46-2,128, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,128 Commencing at least six weeks but not more than twelve weeks
before transferring any water appropriations under section 46-2,127, the
district or company shall cause notice of the proposed transfer to be published
at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper of
general circulation in each county containing lands on which the water
appropriation is or is proposed to be applied. The district or company shall
also provide the notice to the Chief Water Officer department. The notice shall
contain:
(1) A description of the water appropriation to be transferred;
(2) The number assigned the water appropriation permit in the records of
the department under sections 46-233 to 46-235;
(3) The priority date of the water appropriation;
(4) A description of the land to which the water appropriation is proposed
to be applied;
(5) A statement that any owner of land within the district or served by
the canal company may object to and request a hearing on the proposed transfer
within seven calendar days after final publication; and
(6) Any other relevant information.
Sec. 143. Section 46-2,130, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,130 Nothing in sections 46-2,120 to 46-2,129 shall be construed to
limit or restrict the powers of the Chief Water Officer department with respect
to adjudication of water rights.
Sec. 144. Section 46-2,139, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-2,139 The Storm Water Management Plan Program is created. The purpose
of the program is to facilitate and fund the duties of cities and counties
under the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., as such act existed
on January 1, 2006, regarding storm water runoff under the National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System requirements. The Storm Water Management Plan
Program shall function as a grant program administered by the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy, using funds appropriated
for the program. The department shall deduct from funds appropriated amounts
sufficient to reimburse itself for its costs of administration of the grant
program. Any city or county when applying for a grant under the program shall
have a storm water management plan approved by the department which meets the
requirements of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System. Grant
applications shall be made to the department on forms prescribed by the
department. Grant funds shall be distributed by the department as follows:
(1) Not less than eighty percent of the funds available for grants under
this section shall be provided to cities and counties in urbanized areas, as
identified in 77 Federal Register 18652-18669, that apply for grants and meet
the requirements of this section. Grants made pursuant to this subdivision
shall be distributed proportionately based on the population of applicants
within such category, as determined by the most recent federal census update or
recount certified by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the
Census. For the purpose of distributing grant funds to a county pursuant to
this subdivision, the proportion shall be based on the county population, less
the population of city applicants within that county. Any funds available for
grants under this subdivision and not awarded by the end of a calendar year
shall be available for grants in the following year; and
(2) Not more than twenty percent of the funds available for grants under
this section shall be provided to cities and counties outside of urbanized
areas, as identified in 77 Federal Register 18652-18669, with populations
greater than ten thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal
census update or recount certified by the United States Department of Commerce,
Bureau of the Census, that apply for grants and meet the requirements of this
section. Grants under this subdivision shall be distributed proportionately
based on the population of applicants within this category as determined by the
most recent federal census update or recount certified by the United States
Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census. For the purpose of distributing
grant funds to a county pursuant to this subdivision, the proportion shall be
based on the county population, less the population of city applicants within
-54-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
that county. Any funds available for grants pursuant to this subdivision which
have not been awarded at the end of each calendar year shall be available for
awarding grants pursuant to subdivision (1) of this section.
Any city or county receiving a grant under subdivision (1) or (2) of this
section shall contribute matching funds equal to twenty percent of the grant
amount.
Sec. 145. Section 46-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-302 Whenever the board of directors of any irrigation district shall,
by resolution, determine that it is to the interest, convenience, and welfare
of the district that the district, under sections 46-301 to 46-315, purchase,
construct, or otherwise acquire, operate, and maintain any electric light and
power plant, lines, or systems, whether as an addition, extension, enlargement,
alteration, or reconstruction of any site, irrigation works, or other property
owned or controlled by the district, or as a plant, lines, or system
independent of works or property already owned or controlled by the district,
the board of directors shall thereupon prepare comprehensive written plans,
statements, and reports setting out the nature, location, and description of
the proposed plant, lines, and system, including method or methods of
generation or acquisition, the location of transmission lines, the use of other
sites, properties, and works already owned or controlled by the district,
estimated costs of acquisition and construction, the method or means of
financing the proposed plan and project, the amount of bonds, if any, proposed
to be issued in connection therewith, and such other data as the Chief Water
Officer Department of Natural Resources shall prescribe. The expense thereof
may be authorized by any special meeting or at the annual meeting of such
district. Such plans, statements, and reports, including a copy of such
resolution, shall be duly certified by the board of directors and shall be
thereupon submitted to the Chief Water Officer department for the Chief Water
Officer's its examination as set forth in section 46-304.
Sec. 146. Section 46-303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-303 In lieu of the resolution of the board of directors and the
preparation and submission by the board of plans, reports, and statements as
provided in section 46-302, a petition containing and setting forth the data
and information required in such section concerning the proposed electric light
and power plant, lines, and systems may be presented to the Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources, signed by not less than twenty percent of all
the qualified electors of the district. Such petition shall declare that, in
the opinion of the petitioners, it is to the interest, convenience, and welfare
of the district that the district, under sections 46-301 to 46-315, adopt
substantially the plan or method set out in the petition for the establishment,
acquisition, and operation by the district of electric light and power plant,
lines, and systems. The petition shall contain the affidavit of the person or
persons who circulated the same, certifying that each name signed thereto is
the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be and that the
person is a qualified elector of the district.
Sec. 147. Section 46-304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-304 Upon receipt by the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural
Resources of the plans, reports, and statements provided for in section 46-302
or of the petition provided for in section 46-303, the Chief Water Officer
department shall examine the proposed plan and project, make an estimate of the
probable cost thereof, and make such further examination and investigation
concerning the same as the Chief Water Officer department shall deem necessary
or advisable. If the Chief Water Officer department deems the proposed plan and
project feasible and practicable, either as originally submitted or as changed
and amended by the Chief Water Officer department, the Chief Water Officer
department shall then file with the board of directors of the irrigation
district concerned its report in the matter, which report shall include a
complete explanation of the proposed project, the plans and maps showing
location of the project, the estimated cost of the project, and the probable
receipts from the sale of electric energy, and the certificate of the Chief
Water Officer department that the project has been examined and deemed feasible
and practicable by the Chief Water Officer department.
Sec. 148. Section 46-305, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-305 Upon the filing of the data and certificates with the board of
directors of the district, the board of directors and the other proper officers
of the district shall submit the proposed plan and project to the qualified
electors of the district for their approval or rejection, at a general election
or at a special election called for that purpose, the submission of proposition
and all matters pertaining to such election to conform, including notice of
election, as nearly as may be, and except as otherwise expressly provided in
sections 46-301 to 46-315, to the provisions of law governing elections upon
propositions for the issuance of bonds of the district. The report of the Chief
Water Officer Department of Natural Resources and all other data and
information on file with the board of directors or the officers of the district
shall be subject to inspection at all reasonable business hours by any elector
of the district, or other interested persons, for the entire period during
which notice of the election shall be published. Such question and proposition
shall be thus submitted by ballots upon which shall appear, in a clear, fair,
and concise manner, a statement of the nature and description of the proposed
-55-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
project, and, if such proposition includes the issuance of bonds of the
district, there shall also appear upon the ballots a general description of
such bonds, including principal amount, rate of interest and when payable, date
of issuance, and date of maturity. At the bottom of the ballots substantially
the following form shall appear:
FOR the adoption of the foregoing plan and project (and issuance of bonds
of the district).
AGAINST the adoption of the foregoing plan and project (and the issuance
of bonds of the district).
If a majority of the ballots cast on such proposition are in favor
thereof, the board of directors shall declare the same adopted, and the board
of directors of the district shall proceed forthwith to put such plan and
project into effect, including the issuance of bonds of the district if
included in the proposition submitted at the election, the levy and collection
of taxes and assessments to pay such bonds and interest thereon, and the
execution of all contracts proper or incident to the consummation of such plan
and project.
Sec. 149. Section 46-312, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-312 If at any time after the initial acquisition or establishment by
any irrigation district of an electric light and power plant, lines, or systems
the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources deems it to be
practicable and expedient that additional plants, lines, or systems, or
extensions or improvements of the existing electric light and power plant,
lines, or systems, should be made by the district, and if the cost of such
additions and extensions cannot be made or provided for by the application of
unused funds derived from the operation of the existing electric light and
power plant, lines, or systems or by the pledge or assignment of future net
revenue as in sections 46-301 to 46-315, then the board of directors may, and
on the petition of not less than twenty-five percent of the qualified electors
of the district shall, submit to the electors of the district at any general
election or at any special election called for the purpose, the question and
proposition of making such improvements, additions, or extensions and the
issuance of bonds of the district to pay the cost thereof. A statement of the
Chief Water Officer department with reference to the expediency and feasibility
of such proposed extension and addition shall be made by the Chief Water
Officer such department to the irrigation district whenever requested by the
board of directors of such district. Such election shall be held and the result
thereof determined and declared in conformity with the provisions of law
governing elections upon the proposition of the issuance of bonds of the
district. Complete plans and a description of the proposed additions,
improvements, changes, or extensions shall be prepared and kept on file in the
main office of the district or of the board of the district, subject to
inspection by any elector or other interested person, at all reasonable
business hours during the period of publication of notice of such election. The
ballots at such election shall conform, as nearly as practicable, with the
requirements of section 46-305.
Sec. 150. Section 46-315, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-315 Every irrigation district in this state shall have the exclusive
right to make application to the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural
Resources for the use of all water used for irrigation purposes and all return
flow and seepage water from irrigated land in its district for the purpose of
operating hydroelectric plants under sections 46-301 to 46-315.
Sec. 151. Section 46-514, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-514 For purposes of the Reclamation Act, Chief Water Officer means the
Chief Water Officer of department means the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources.
Sec. 152. Section 46-515, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-515 The Chief Water Officer department is hereby vested with
jurisdiction, power, and authority, when conditions stated in section 46-516
are found to exist, to establish reclamation districts for conserving,
developing, and stabilizing supplies of water for domestic, irrigation, power,
manufacturing, and other beneficial uses as herein provided.
Sec. 153. Section 46-516, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-516 Before any reclamation district is established under the
Reclamation Act, a petition shall be filed with in the Chief Water Officer
office of the department signed by the owners of not less than thirty percent
of the acreage of lands to be included in the district, exclusive of land in
cities and villages, and each tract or tracts of land and the total acreage
shall be listed opposite the name of the signer. A signing petitioner shall not
be permitted after the filing of the petition to withdraw his or her name
therefrom. No district shall be formed under the act unless the taxable
valuation of land, together with improvements thereon, within the proposed
district, exclusive of land and improvements thereon in cities and villages, is
five million seven hundred twenty thousand dollars or more. The petition shall
set forth:
(1) The proposed name of the district;
(2) That property within the proposed district will be benefited by the
accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in section 46-515;
-56-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(3) A general description of the purpose of the contemplated improvement
and of the territory to be included in the proposed district. The description
need not be given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivision, but it shall be
sufficient to enable a property owner to ascertain whether the property is
within the territory proposed to be organized as a district. The territory need
not be contiguous if it is so situated that the organization of a single
district of the territory described is calculated to promote one or more of the
purposes enumerated in section 46-515;
(4) The taxable value of all irrigable land within the boundaries of the
proposed district;
(5) A general description of the divisions of the district, the number of
directors of the district proposed for each subdivision, and the names and
addresses of the proposed members of the board of directors of the district.
There shall be not less than five nor more than twenty-one directors named
therein who shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified. In
the petition the directors named shall be divided as nearly as possible into
three equal groups, the members of the first group to hold office until their
successors have been elected at the first general state election thereafter and
have qualified, the members of the second group to hold office until their
successors have been elected at the second general state election thereafter
and have qualified, and the members of the third group until the members
elected at the third general state election thereafter have qualified. After
the name of each director, it shall be stated to which of the three groups he
or she belongs; and
(6) A prayer for the organization of the district by the name proposed.
No petition with the requisite signatures shall be declared null and void
on account of alleged defects, but the Chief Water Officer department may at
any time permit the petition to be amended to conform to the facts, to correct
any errors in the description of the territory, or in any other particular.
Similar petitions or duplicate copies of the same petition for the organization
of the same district may be filed and shall together be regarded as one
petition. All such petitions filed prior to the hearing on the first petition
filed shall be considered by the Chief Water Officer department the same as
though filed with the first petition placed on file. In determining whether the
requisite number of landowners have signed the petition, the Chief Water
Officer department shall be governed by the names as they appear upon the tax
roll which shall be prima facie evidence of such ownership.
Sec. 154. Section 46-517, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-517 At the time of filing the petition or at any time subsequent
thereto, and prior to the time of hearing on the said petition, a bond shall be
filed in the amount of two thousand dollars, with security approved by the
Chief Water Officer department to pay all expenses connected with the
proceedings in case the organization of the district be not effected. If at any
time during the proceeding the Chief Water Officer department shall be
satisfied that the bond first executed is insufficient in amount, the Chief
Water Officer it may require the execution of an additional bond within a time
to be fixed at not less than ten days distant. Upon a failure of the petitioner
to execute the same, the petition shall be dismissed.
Sec. 155. Section 46-518, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-518 Immediately after the filing of such petition, the Chief Water
Officer department shall (1) by order fix a place and time, not less than
ninety days nor more than one hundred and twenty days after the petition is
filed, for hearing thereon, (2) cause notice by publication to be made of the
pendency of the petition and of the time and place of hearing thereon, and (3)
forthwith cause a copy of such said notice to be mailed by either registered or
certified mail to the county boards of each of the several counties having
territory within the proposed district.
Sec. 156. Section 46-519, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-519 At any time after the filing of a petition for the organization of
a reclamation district and not less than thirty days prior to the time fixed by
the order of the Chief Water Officer department for the hearing upon the said
petition, and not thereafter, a petition may be filed with in the Chief Water
Officer office of the department wherein the proceeding for the creation of the
said district is pending, signed by not fewer than the owners of thirty percent
of the acreage of lands in the district, exclusive of land in cities and
villages, who have not signed the petition for creating the district,
protesting the creation of the district. The protesting petition shall list
each tract or tracts of land and the total acreage of each signer opposite his
or her name.
Sec. 157. Section 46-521, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-521 Upon the day set for the hearing upon the original petition, if it
shall appear to the Chief Water Officer department from such evidence as may be
adduced by any party in interest, that the said protesting petition is not
signed by the requisite number of owners of lands, the Chief Water Officer
department shall thereupon dismiss the said protesting petition and shall
proceed with the original hearing as provided in section 46-525.
Sec. 158. Section 46-522, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-522 If the Chief Water Officer department shall find from the evidence
-57-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
that the said protesting petition is signed by the requisite number of owners
of lands, the Chief Water Officer department shall forthwith dismiss the
original petition praying for the creation of the district. The finding of the
Chief Water Officer department upon the said question of the genuineness of the
signatures, and all matters of law and fact incident to such determination,
shall be final and conclusive on all parties in interest whether appearing or
not.
Sec. 159. Section 46-524, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-524 Such objection shall be limited to a denial of the statements in
the petition. It shall be heard by the Chief Water Officer department without
unnecessary delay.
Sec. 160. Section 46-525, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-525 Upon the said hearing, if it shall appear that a petition for the
organization of a reclamation district has been signed and presented, as
provided in section 46-516, in conformity with the Reclamation Act sections
46-501 to 46-573, and that the allegations of the petition are true, and that
no protesting petition has been filed, or if filed has been dismissed as
provided in section 46-521, the Chief Water Officer department shall, by order
duly entered of record, adjudicate all questions of jurisdiction, declare the
district organized, and give it a corporate name, by which it shall thereafter
be known in all proceedings. Thereupon the district shall be a political
subdivision of the State of Nebraska and a body corporate with all the powers
of a public or municipal corporation.
Sec. 161. Section 46-526, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-526 In such decree the Chief Water Officer department shall designate
the place, prayed for in the petition, where the office or principal place of
business of the district shall be located, which shall be within the corporate
limits of the district. It may be changed by order of the Chief Water Officer
department from time to time, upon the application of the board of directors of
the said district. The regular meetings of the board shall be held at such
office or place of business, but for cause may be adjourned to any convenient
place. The official records and files of the district shall be kept at the
office so established.
Sec. 162. Section 46-527, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-527 If the Chief Water Officer department finds that no petition has
been signed and presented in conformity with the Reclamation Act sections
46-501 to 46-573, or that the material facts are not as set forth in the
petition filed, the Chief Water Officer it shall dismiss the said proceedings
and adjudge the costs against the signers of the petition in such proportion as
the Chief Water Officer it shall deem just and equitable. No appeal or writ of
error shall lie from an order dismissing the said proceeding. Nothing herein
shall be construed to prevent the filing of a subsequent petition or petitions
for similar improvements or for a similar reclamation district, and the right
to so renew such proceeding is hereby expressly granted and authorized.
Sec. 163. Section 46-528, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-528 If an order is entered establishing the district, such order shall
be deemed final. Any person, firm, or corporation owning real property within
any reclamation district, created or established by virtue of the Reclamation
Act, feeling himself or herself aggrieved by the establishment of such
district, the determination of its boundaries, or the enclosure therein of any
of his or her property may appeal the final order of the Chief Water Officer
department adjudging such district to be duly incorporated. The appeal shall be
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, except that the appeal
shall be to the district court of the county wherein the principal office of
the reclamation district is located. If no appeal is taken within the time
prescribed in the Administrative Procedure Act, the entry of such final order
by the Chief Water Officer department shall finally and conclusively establish
the regular organization of the district against all persons, except the State
of Nebraska in an action in the nature of a writ of quo warranto commenced by
the Attorney General within three months after the decree declaring such
district organized as herein provided and not otherwise. The organization of
such districts shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit,
action, or proceeding, except as herein expressly authorized.
Sec. 164. Section 46-529, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-529 Within thirty days after the said district has been declared a
corporation by the Chief Water Officer department, the Chief Water Officer such
department shall transmit to the Secretary of State and to the county clerk in
each of the counties having lands in the said district copies of the findings
and the decree of the Chief Water Officer department incorporating the said
district. The same shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, in
the same manner as articles of incorporation are now required to be filed under
the general laws concerning corporations, and also be filed in the office of
the county clerk of each county in which a part of the district is located
where they shall become permanent records. The clerk in each county shall
receive a fee of one dollar for filing and preserving the same. The Secretary
of State shall receive for filing the said copies such fees as now are or
hereafter may be provided by law for like services in similar cases.
-58-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Sec. 165. Section 46-530, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-530 Within thirty days after entering the final order establishing the
district, the Chief Water Officer department shall enter an order appointing
the board of directors named in the petition in accordance with subsection (5)
of section 46-516. After the selection of the original board of directors of a
district as provided for in subsection (5) of section 46-516, their successors
shall be elected as provided in section 32-516. Elections shall be conducted as
provided in the Election Act and shall take office on the first Thursday after
the first Tuesday in January next succeeding their election. Qualified electors
of the municipality or municipalities within the territory which composes the
territory of a district shall be qualified electors of such district. A
qualified elector of a subdivision may only cast his or her ballot for a
director to be elected from such subdivision.
Sec. 166. Section 46-536, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-536 Each director before entering upon his or her official duties shall
take and subscribe to an oath before an officer authorized to administer oaths,
that he or she will support the Constitutions of the United States and the
State of Nebraska, will honestly, faithfully, and impartially perform the
duties of his or her office and will not be interested directly or indirectly
in any contract let by the said district. The oath shall be filed with in the
Chief Water Officer office of the department in the original case.
Sec. 167. Section 46-541, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-541 The board shall have power on behalf of the district:
(1) To have perpetual succession, except that all districts organized
prior to January 1, 1950, which have not entered into a bona fide construction
of their works shall, within fifteen years following January 1, 1961, cause to
be submitted to the qualified electors of the district the following question:
Shall the district be continued for an additional fifteen years?
.... Yes
.... No
The election shall be held in the same manner set out in section 46-564
relating to submission to qualified electors for the approval of bonded
indebtedness.
In the event a majority of the qualified voters voting in such election
vote yes, then such district shall be continued for an additional fifteen
years. For all districts organized after January 1, 1950, and not having
entered into a bona fide construction of their works before January 1, 1961,
the directors shall, within fifteen years following January 1, 1961, cause to
be submitted the same question to the qualified electors of the district. All
districts organized after November 1, 1953, which have not entered into a bona
fide construction of their works within fifteen years after the first day of
July of the year of assessment of the taxable property of the district shall
submit to the qualified electors of the district the question of whether the
district shall be continued for an additional fifteen years. If a district has
pending before the Congress of the United States a bill for the authorization
or reauthorization of its project at the expiration of any one of such fifteen-
year periods, the district shall be continued until such authorization or
reauthorization is granted by the Congress of the United States and
appropriations made for the actual construction of its work, which additional
period shall not exceed ten years from the expiration of the fifteen-year
period.
If at the end of the fifteen-year period, plus the additional ten-year
period granted while its project is pending before the Congress of the United
States for authorization or reauthorization and an appropriation for the actual
construction of its works, no physical construction of any of its works has
been started, then the same question shall again be submitted to the qualified
electors. In the event a majority of the qualified voters voting in such
election vote yes, then such district shall be continued for an additional
fifteen years.
In the event of a failure to receive a majority affirmative vote of the
voters voting in such election, the district shall be dissolved and the
district shall submit to the Chief Water Officer department a full and complete
audit by a public accountant showing the assets possessed by the district.
Thereupon the Chief Water Officer department shall enter an order providing
that within sixty days the assets of such district shall be liquidated, all
rights granted by the Chief Water Officer department shall be canceled, and any
assets on hand shall be divided as follows:
(a) All bills payable and all expenses of dissolution shall be deducted
from the assets and paid; and
(b) The balance remaining shall be divided proportionately among the
operating public school districts of the district in the proportion that the
number of acres in each school district bears to the total number of acres of
all of the school districts within the boundaries of the district. If the
district is confined to one county, distribution shall be made by the county
treasurer of such county. If the district extends into more than one county,
the funds for disbursement to such school districts shall be paid to the county
within which the schoolhouses are located for distribution to such school
districts;
(2) To take by appropriation, grant, purchase, bequest, devise, or lease,
and to hold and enjoy water rights and waterworks, and any and all real and
-59-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
personal property of any kind within or without the district necessary or
convenient to the full exercise of its powers; to purchase, sell, lease,
encumber, alienate, or otherwise dispose of waterworks and real and personal
property; to enter into contracts for furnishing water service for use within
the district; to acquire, construct, operate, control, and use any and all
works, facilities, and means necessary or convenient to the exercise of its
power, both within and without the district, for the purpose of providing for
the use of such water within the district; and to do and perform any and all
things necessary or convenient to the full exercise of the powers granted in
this subdivision;
(3) To have and to exercise the power of eminent domain in addition to any
other rights and powers conferred in this section upon any district organized
under the Reclamation Act, for the purposes and after the manner provided for
in sections 76-704 to 76-724, except that when any reclamation district
exercises the power of eminent domain as to water being used for power
purposes, it shall not include any other properties of any irrigation district,
public power district, or public power and irrigation district organized and
existing under the laws of the State of Nebraska;
(4) To construct and maintain works and establish and maintain facilities
across or along any public street or highway and in, upon, or over any vacant
public lands, which public lands are now or may hereafter become the property
of the State of Nebraska, and to construct works and establish and maintain
facilities across any stream of water or watercourse. The district shall
promptly restore any such street or highway to its former state of usefulness
as nearly as may be and shall not use the same in such manner as to completely
or unnecessarily impair the usefulness thereof. In the use of streets, the
district shall be subject to the reasonable rules and regulations of the
county, city, or village where such streets lie concerning excavation and the
refilling of excavation, the relaying of pavements, and the protection of the
public during periods of construction. The district shall not be required to
pay any license or permit fees or file any bonds. The district may be required
to pay reasonable inspection fees;
(5) To contract with the government of the United States or any agency
thereof for the construction, preservation, operation, and maintenance of
tunnels, reservoirs, regulating or reregulating basins, diversion works and
canals, dams, power plants, drains, and all necessary works incident thereto,
to acquire rights to the use of water from such works, and to enter into
contracts for the use of water from such works by persons and corporations,
public and private;
(6) To list in separate ownership the lands within the district which are
susceptible of irrigation from the district sources, to enter into contracts to
furnish water service to all such lands, and to levy assessments as hereinafter
provided against the lands within the district to which water service is
furnished on the basis of the value per acre-foot of water service furnished to
the lands within the district. The board may divide the district into units and
fix a different value per acre-foot of water in the respective units and in
such case shall assess the lands within each unit upon the same basis of value
per acre-foot of water service furnished to lands within such unit;
(7) To fix rates at which water service, not otherwise provided for in
this section, may be furnished. Rates shall be equitable although not
necessarily equal or uniform for like classes of service throughout the
district;
(8) To adopt plans and specifications for the works for which the district
was organized, which plans and specifications may at any time be changed or
modified by the board. The plans shall include maps, profiles, and such other
data and descriptions as may be necessary to set forth the location and
character of the works, and a copy thereof shall be kept in the office of the
district and open to public inspection. The plans and specifications and any
changes shall be approved by the Chief Water Officer department in accordance
with the statutes;
(9) To appropriate and otherwise acquire water rights within or without
the state; to develop, store, and transport water; to provide, contract for,
and furnish water service for municipal and domestic purposes, irrigation,
power, milling, manufacturing, mining, metallurgical use, and any and all other
beneficial uses and to derive revenue and benefits therefrom; to fix the terms
and rates therefor; to make and adopt plans for and to acquire, construct,
operate, and maintain dams, reservoirs, canals, conduits, pipelines, tunnels,
power plants, transmission lines, and any and all works, facilities,
improvements, and property necessary or convenient therefor; and in the doing
of all of such things to obligate itself and execute and perform such
obligations according to the tenor thereof. The contracts for furnishing of
water service for irrigation and domestic purposes shall only be made for use
within the district. The board may transfer water appropriations within the
district pursuant to sections 46-2,127 to 46-2,129;
(10) To invest any surplus money in the district treasury, including such
money as may be in any sinking fund established for the purpose of providing
for the payment of the principal or interest of any contract, bond, or other
indebtedness or for any other purpose, not required for the immediate
necessities of the district, in its own bonds or in treasury notes or bonds of
the United States. The investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue
of such bonds or treasury notes, or part thereof, at the original sale of the
same or by the subsequent purchase of such bonds or treasury notes. Any bonds
or treasury notes thus purchased and held may, from time to time, be sold and
-60-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
the proceeds reinvested in bonds or treasury notes as provided in this
subdivision. Sales of any bonds or treasury notes thus purchased and held
shall, from time to time, be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied
to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds or treasury notes were
originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district. The functions
and duties authorized by this subdivision shall be performed under such rules
and regulations as shall be prescribed by the board;
(11) To refund bonded indebtedness incurred by the district under and
pursuant to such rules and regulations as shall be prescribed by the board;
(12) To borrow money, incur indebtedness, and issue bonds or other
evidence of such indebtedness;
(13) To adopt bylaws not in conflict with the Constitution of Nebraska and
laws of the state for carrying on the business, objects, and affairs of the
board and of the district; and
(14) To enter into agreements for water service with agencies of the
federal government or the Game and Parks Commission through which water will be
made available, at rates determined as provided in subdivision (7) of this
section, for hunting, fishing, and recreational development. The water service
shall not exceed the amount of water which may be appropriated for such
purposes by order of the Chief Water Officer department, and such amounts shall
be included in the total appropriative right of the district or districts
involved.
Sec. 168. Section 46-583, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-583 At the hearing, if the board of directors of such district deems it
not for the best interest of such district that a change of its boundaries be
so made as to include therein the lands mentioned in the petition, the board of
directors of such district shall order that the petition be rejected. But if
the board of directors of such district deems it for the best interest of such
district that the boundaries of such district be changed and if it appears that
the petition for the annexation and incorporation of the tract or tracts of
land has been signed and presented as provided in section 46-574, that the
allegations of the petition are true, and that no protesting petition has been
filed, or if filed has been dismissed as provided by sections 46-574 to 46-584,
the board of directors of such district may enter a tentative order annexing
and including all lands described in the petition, or some part thereof. The
order shall not become final until the proposition of levying taxes as provided
for in section 46-543 has been complied with and until the proposition of
levying taxes has been submitted by a resolution of the board of directors of
such district to the qualified electors residing within the tract or tracts of
land described in the tentative order at an election held for that purpose in
the same manner as provided for submission of incurring bonded indebtedness in
sections 46-564 to 46-566, and when the proposition has been approved by a
majority of the qualified electors residing within the tract or tracts of land
voting on the proposition at such election, then the board of directors shall
enter a final order annexing and including all lands described in the tentative
order. If at such election a majority of the qualified electors vote against
the proposition, then the board of directors of such district shall set aside
the tentative order, shall order that the petition be denied, and shall proceed
no further in that matter. If the proposition is approved by a majority of the
qualified electors of the tract or tracts voting on the proposition at such
election in the manner provided for in section 46-543, the board of directors
of such district shall certify to the county board of the county in which the
tract or tracts of land are situated the rate of tax to be levied. The final
order entered by the board of directors of such district shall describe the
entire boundaries of the district, and for that purpose the board of directors
may cause a survey of such portions thereof to be made as the board of
directors deems necessary. A copy of the final order of the board of directors
ordering such annexation, certified by the president and secretary of the board
of directors of such district, shall be filed with the Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources, and thereupon the district shall be and remain
a reclamation district as fully and to every intent and purpose as if the lands
which are included in the district by the annexation thereof and the change of
boundaries had been included therein at the original organization of the
district. Such tract or tracts of land so annexed to such district shall enjoy
all the rights and privileges, of whatever kind and nature, and be subject to
all the contract, obligation, lien, or charge for or upon which the original
district was or might become liable or chargeable.
Sec. 169. Section 46-601.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-601.01 For purposes of Chapter 46, article 6:
(1) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment;
(2) Common carrier means any carrier of water including a pipe, canal,
ditch, or other means of piping or adjoining water for irrigation purposes;
(3) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment;
(4) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment; and
(5)(a) (1)(a) Water well means any excavation that is drilled, cored,
bored, washed, driven, dug, jetted, or otherwise constructed for the purpose of
exploring for ground water, monitoring ground water, utilizing the geothermal
properties of the ground, obtaining hydrogeologic information, or extracting
water from or injecting fluid as defined in section 81-1502 into the
underground water reservoir.
-61-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(b) Water well includes any excavation made for any purpose if ground
water flows into the excavation under natural pressure and a pump or other
device is placed in the excavation for the purpose of withdrawing water from
the excavation for irrigation. For such excavations, construction means placing
a pump or other device into the excavation for the purpose of withdrawing water
for irrigation.
(c) Water well does not include (i) any excavation made for obtaining or
prospecting for oil or natural gas or for inserting media to repressure oil or
natural gas bearing formations regulated by the Nebraska Oil and Gas
Conservation Commission or (ii) any structure requiring a permit by the Chief
Water Officer Department of Natural Resources used to exercise surface water
appropriation. ; and
(2) Common carrier means any carrier of water including a pipe, canal,
ditch, or other means of piping or adjoining water for irrigation purposes.
Sec. 170. Section 46-602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-602 (1) Each water well completed in this state on or after July 1,
2001, excluding test holes and dewatering wells to be used for less than ninety
days, shall be registered with the department Department of Natural Resources
as provided in this section within sixty days after completion of construction
of the water well. The licensed water well contractor as defined in section
46-1213 constructing the water well, or the owner of the water well if the
owner constructed the water well, shall file the registration on a form made
available by the department and shall also file with the department the
information from the well log required pursuant to section 46-1241. The
department shall, by January 1, 2002, provide licensed water well contractors
with the option of filing such registration forms electronically. No signature
shall be required on forms filed electronically. The fee required by subsection
(3) of section 46-1224 shall be the source of funds for any required fee to a
contractor which provides the online services for such registration. Any
discount in the amount paid the state by a credit card, charge card, or debit
card company or a third-party merchant bank for such registration fees shall be
deducted from the portion of the registration fee collected pursuant to section
46-1224.
(2)(a) If the newly constructed water well is a replacement water well,
the registration form shall include (i) the registration number of the water
well being replaced, if applicable, and (ii) the date the original water well
was decommissioned or a certification that the water well will be
decommissioned within one hundred eighty days or a certification that the
original water well will be modified and equipped to pump fifty gallons per
minute or less and will be used only for livestock, monitoring, observation, or
any other nonconsumptive use or de minimis use approved by the applicable
natural resources district.
(b) For purposes of this section, replacement water well means a water
well which is constructed to provide water for the same purpose as the original
water well and is operating in accordance with any applicable permit from the
department or the Chief Water Officer and any applicable rules and regulations
of the natural resources district and, if the purpose is for irrigation, the
replacement water well delivers water to the same tract of land served by the
original water well and (i) replaces a decommissioned water well within one
hundred eighty days after the decommissioning of the original water well, (ii)
replaces a water well that has not been decommissioned but will not be used
after construction of the new water well and the original water well will be
decommissioned within one hundred eighty days after such construction, except
that in the case of a municipal water well, the original municipal water well
may be used after construction of the new water well but shall be
decommissioned within one year after completion of the replacement water well,
or (iii) the original water well will continue to be used but will be modified
and equipped within one hundred eighty days after such construction of the
replacement water well to pump fifty gallons per minute or less and will be
used only for livestock, monitoring, observation, or any other nonconsumptive
or de minimis use approved by the applicable natural resources district.
(c) No water well shall be registered as a replacement water well until
the department Department of Natural Resources has received a properly
completed notice of decommissioning for the water well being replaced on a form
made available by the department, or properly completed notice, prepared in
accordance with subsection (7) of this section, of the modification and
equipping of the original water well to pump fifty gallons per minute or less
for use only for livestock, monitoring, observation, or any other
nonconsumptive or de minimis use approved by the applicable natural resources
district. Such notices, as required, shall be completed by (i) the licensed
water well contractor as defined in section 46-1213 who decommissions the water
well or modifies and equips the water well, (ii) the licensed pump installation
contractor as defined in section 46-1209 who decommissions the water well or
modifies and equips the water well, or (iii) the owner if the owner
decommissions a driven sandpoint well which is on land owned by him or her for
farming, ranching, or agricultural purposes or as his or her place of abode.
The department Department of Environment and Energy shall, by rule and
regulation, determine which contractor or owner shall be responsible for such
notice in situations in which more than one contractor or owner may be required
to provide notice under this subsection.
(3) For a series of two or more water wells completed and pumped into a
common carrier as part of a single site plan for irrigation purposes, a
-62-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
registration form and a detailed site plan shall be filed for each water well.
The registration form shall include the registration numbers of other water
wells included in the series if such water wells are already registered.
(4) A series of water wells completed for purposes of installation of a
ground heat exchanger for a structure for utilizing the geothermal properties
of the ground shall be considered as one water well. One registration form and
a detailed site plan shall be filed for each such series.
(5) One registration form shall be required along with a detailed site
plan which shows the location of each such water well in the site and a log
from each such water well for water wells constructed as part of a single site
plan for (a) monitoring ground water, obtaining hydrogeologic information, or
extracting contaminants from the ground, (b) water wells constructed as part of
remedial action approved by the department Department of Environment and Energy
pursuant to section 66-1525, 66-1529.02, or 81-15,124, and (c) water well
owners who have a permit issued pursuant to the Industrial Ground Water
Regulatory Act and also have an underground injection control permit issued by
the department Department of Environment and Energy.
(6) The department Department of Natural Resources shall be notified by
the owner of any change in the ownership of a water well required to be
registered under this section. Notification shall be in such form and include
such evidence of ownership as the department Director of Natural Resources by
rule and regulation directs. The department shall use such notice to update the
registration on file. The department shall not collect a fee for the filing of
the notice.
(7) The licensed water well contractor or licensed pump installation
contractor responsible therefor shall notify the department within sixty days
on a form provided by the department of any pump installation or any
modifications to the construction of the water well or pump, after the initial
registration of the well. For a change of use resulting in modification and
equipping of an original water well which is being replaced in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section, the licensed water well contractor or licensed
pump installation contractor shall notify the department within sixty days on a
form provided by the department of the water well and pump modifications and
equipping of the original water well. A water well owner shall notify the
department within sixty days on a form provided by the department of any other
changes or any inaccuracies in recorded water well information, including, but
not limited to, changes in use. The department shall not collect a fee for the
filing of the notice.
(8) Whenever a water well becomes an illegal water well as defined in
section 46-706, the owner of the water well shall either correct the deficiency
that causes the well to be an illegal water well or shall cause the proper
decommissioning of the water well in accordance with rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act. The
licensed water well contractor who decommissions the water well, the licensed
pump installation contractor who decommissions the water well, or the owner if
the owner decommissions a driven sandpoint well which is on land owned by him
or her for farming, ranching, or agricultural purposes or as his or her place
of abode, shall provide a properly completed notice of decommissioning to the
department Department of Natural Resources within sixty days. The department
Department of Environment and Energy shall, by rule and regulation, determine
which contractor or owner shall be responsible for such notice in situations in
which more than one contractor or owner may be required to provide notice under
this subsection. The department Department of Natural Resources shall not
collect a fee for the filing of the notice.
(9) Except for water wells which are used solely for domestic purposes and
were constructed before September 9, 1993, and for test holes and dewatering
wells used for less than ninety days, each water well which was completed in
this state before July 1, 2001, and which is not registered on that date shall
be an illegal water well until it is registered with the department Department
of Natural Resources. Such registration shall be completed by a licensed water
well contractor or by the current owner of the water well, shall be on forms
provided by the department, and shall provide as much of the information
required by subsections (1) through (5) of this section for registration of a
new water well as is possible at the time of registration.
(10) Water wells which are or were used solely for injecting any fluid
other than water into the underground water reservoir, which were constructed
before July 16, 2004, and which have not been properly decommissioned on or
before July 16, 2004, shall be registered on or before July 1, 2005.
(11) Water wells described in subdivision (1)(b) of section 46-601.01
shall be registered with the department Department of Natural Resources as
provided in subsection (1) of this section within sixty days after the water
well is constructed. Water wells described in subdivision (1)(b) of section
46-601.01 which were constructed prior to May 2, 2007, shall be registered
within one hundred eighty days after such date.
Sec. 171. Section 46-604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-604 The department Director of Natural Resources shall retain the
registration form required by section 46-602 and shall make a copy available to
the natural resources district within which the water well is located, to the
owner of the water well, and to the licensed water well contractor as defined
in section 46-1213.
Sec. 172. Section 46-606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-63-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
46-606 (1) The department Director of Natural Resources shall collect in
advance a registration fee of forty dollars and the fee required by subsection
(3) of section 46-1224 for each water well registered under section 46-602
except as provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.
(2) For water wells permitted pursuant to the Industrial Ground Water
Regulatory Act, the department director shall collect in advance a registration
fee of forty dollars and the fee required by subsection (3) of section 46-1224
for each of the first ten such water wells registered under section 46-602, and
for each group of ten or fewer such water wells registered thereafter, the
department director shall collect in advance a registration fee of forty
dollars and the fee required by subsection (3) of section 46-1224.
(3) For a series of water wells completed for purposes of installation of
a ground heat exchanger for a structure for utilizing the geothermal properties
of the ground, the department director shall collect in advance a fee of forty
dollars for each such series and the fee required by subsection (3) of section
46-1224.
(4) For water wells constructed as part of a single site plan for
monitoring ground water, obtaining hydrogeologic information, or extracting
contaminants from the ground, the department director shall collect in advance
a registration fee of forty dollars and the fee required by subsection (3) of
section 46-1224 for each of the first five such water wells registered under
section 46-602, and for each group of five or fewer such water wells registered
thereafter, the department director shall collect in advance a registration fee
of forty dollars and the fee required by subsection (3) of section 46-1224.
However, if such water wells are a part of remedial action approved by the
department Department of Environment and Energy pursuant to section 66-1525,
66-1529.02, or 81-15,124, the fee set pursuant to this subsection shall be
collected as if only one water well was being registered and the fee required
by subsection (3) of section 46-1224 shall be collected.
(5)(a) For a series of two or more water wells completed and pumped into a
common carrier as part of a single site plan for irrigation purposes, the
department director shall collect in advance a registration fee of forty
dollars and the fee required by subsection (3) of section 46-1224 for each of
the first two such wells registered under section 46-602.
(b) Any additional water wells which are part of a series registered under
this subsection shall not be subject to a new well registration fee.
(6) The department director shall remit the fees collected to the State
Treasurer for credit to the appropriate fund. From the registration fees
required by subsections (1) through (5) of this section, the State Treasurer
shall credit to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Department of
Natural Resources Cash Fund the amount determined by the department Department
of Natural Resources to be necessary to pay for the costs of processing notices
filed pursuant to section 46-230, the costs of water resources update notices
required by section 76-2,124, and the costs for making corrections to water
well registration data authorized by subsections (6) and (7) of section 46-602
and shall credit the remainder of the registration fees required by subsections
(1) through (5) of this section to the Water Well Decommissioning Fund. The
State Treasurer shall credit the fees required by subsection (3) of section
46-1224 to the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Licensing Fund.
Sec. 173. Section 46-609, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-609 (1) Except as otherwise provided by this section or section 46-610,
no irrigation water well shall be constructed upon any land in this state
within six hundred feet of any registered irrigation water well and no existing
nonirrigation water well within six hundred feet of any registered irrigation
water well shall be used for irrigation purposes. Such spacing requirement
shall not apply to (a) any water well used to irrigate two acres or less or (b)
any replacement irrigation water well if it is constructed within fifty feet of
the irrigation water well being replaced and if the water well being replaced
was constructed prior to September 20, 1957, and is less than six hundred feet
from a registered irrigation water well.
(2) The spacing protection of subsection (1) of this section shall apply
to an unregistered water well for a period of sixty days after completion of
such water well.
(3) No person shall use a water well for purposes other than its
registered purpose until the water well registration has been changed to the
intended new use, except that a person may use a water well registered for
purposes other than its intended purpose for use for livestock, monitoring,
observation, or any other nonconsumptive or de minimis use approved by the
applicable natural resources district. The change to a new use shall be made by
filing a water well registration modification with the department Department of
Natural Resources and shall be approved only if the water well is in conformity
with subsection (1) of this section and with section 46-651.
Sec. 174. Section 46-610, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-610 (1) Any person may apply to the Chief Water Officer Director of
Natural Resources for a special permit to drill an irrigation water well
without regard to the spacing requirements of section 46-609 and shall pay a
fee to the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources of twelve
dollars and fifty cents, which fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the General Fund. Such application shall be in such form as the Chief
Water Officer director directs and shall contain a statement of the proposed
location of the irrigation water well, the reason for seeking such special
-64-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
permit, the legal description of the land to be irrigated by the irrigation
water well, the number of acres to be irrigated, the proposed size of the
irrigation water well, the estimated capacity of the irrigation water well,
expressed in gallons per minute, to the extent that capacity is susceptible of
advance determination, and the name of the person who is actually going to
construct the irrigation water well.
(2) A separate application, like that provided for in subsection (1) of
this section, shall be submitted for each irrigation water well for which a
special permit is sought. When considering the approval or rejection of any
application, the Chief Water Officer director shall consider the size, shape,
and irrigation needs of the property for which such special permit is sought,
the known ground water supply, the effect on the ground water supply and the
surrounding land of the irrigation water well for which such special permit is
sought, any waiver or agreement allowing the new irrigation water well by the
owner of any registered irrigation water well less than six hundred feet from
the location of the proposed new irrigation water well, and such other
information as may be available. Such application may be approved or
disapproved in whole or in part or may be approved with conditions, and the
special permit shall be issued or refused accordingly.
Sec. 175. Section 46-613.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-613.01 The Legislature recognizes and declares that the maintenance of
an adequate source of ground water within this state is essential to the social
stability of the state and the health, safety, and welfare of its citizens and
that reasonable restrictions on the transportation of ground water from this
state are a proper exercise of the police powers of the state. The need for
such restrictions, which protect the health, safety, and general welfare of the
citizens of this state, is hereby declared a matter of legislative
determination.
Any person, firm, city, village, municipal corporation, or other entity
intending to withdraw ground water from any water well located in the State of
Nebraska and transport it for use in another state shall apply to the Chief
Water Officer Department of Natural Resources for a permit to do so. In
determining whether to grant or deny such permit, the Chief Water Officer
Director of Natural Resources shall consider:
(1) The nature of the proposed use and whether it is a beneficial use of
ground water;
(2) The availability to the applicant of alternative sources of surface or
ground water;
(3) Any negative effect of the proposed withdrawal on ground water
supplies needed to meet present or reasonable future demands for water in the
area of the proposed withdrawal, to comply with any interstate compact or
decree, or to fulfill the provisions of any other formal state contract or
agreement;
(4) Any negative effect of the proposed withdrawal on surface water
supplies needed to meet present or reasonable future demands within the state,
to comply with any interstate compact or decree, or to fulfill the provisions
of any other formal state contract or agreement;
(5) Any adverse environmental effect of the proposed withdrawal or
transportation of ground water;
(6) The cumulative effect of the proposed withdrawal and transfer relative
to the matters listed in subdivisions (3) through (7) (6) of this section when
considered in conjunction with all other transfers subject to this section; and
(7) Any other factors consistent with the purposes of this section that
the Chief Water Officer director deems relevant to protect the health, safety,
and welfare of the state and its citizens.
Issuance of a permit shall be conditioned on the applicant's compliance
with the rules and regulations of the natural resources district from which the
water is to be withdrawn. The applicant shall be required to provide access to
his or her property at reasonable times for purposes of inspection by officials
of the district or the Chief Water Officer or the Chief Water Officer's
representatives department.
The Chief Water Officer director may include such reasonable conditions on
the proposed use as he or she deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section.
Sec. 176. Section 46-613.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-613.02 Any person violating any provision of sections 46-601 to
46-613.01 or furnishing false information under such sections shall be guilty
of a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day of a violation may be considered a separate
offense. The Attorney General and the county attorneys may pursue appropriate
proceedings pursuant to this section when notified by the Chief Water Officer
Director of Natural Resources that such a violation has occurred.
Sec. 177. Section 46-637, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-637 The use of water described in section 46-636 may only be made after
securing a permit from the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources
for such use. In approving or disapproving applications for such permits, the
Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources shall take into account the
effect that such pumping may have on the amount of water in the stream and its
ability to meet the requirements of appropriators from the stream. This section
does not apply to (1) water wells located within fifty feet of the bank of a
channel of any natural stream which were in existence on July 1, 2000, and (2)
-65-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
replacement water wells as defined in section 46-602 that are located within
fifty feet of the banks of a channel of a stream if the water wells being
replaced were originally constructed prior to July 1, 2000, and were located
within fifty feet of the bank of a channel of any natural stream.
Sec. 178. Section 46-638, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-638 (1) The Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources may grant
and administer permits to public water suppliers: (a) To locate, develop, and
maintain ground water supplies through water wells or other means and to
transport water into the area to be served; and (b) to continue existing use of
ground water and the transportation of ground water into the area served.
(2) For purposes of the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water
Transfers Permit Act and sections 46-651 to 46-655, (a) public water supplier
shall mean a city, village, municipal corporation, metropolitan utilities
district, rural water district, natural resources district, irrigation
district, reclamation district, or sanitary and improvement district which
supplies or intends to supply water to inhabitants of cities, villages, or
rural areas for domestic or municipal purposes and (b) water well shall have
the same meaning as in section 46-601.01.
Sec. 179. Section 46-639, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-639 An applicant which desires to avail itself of the Municipal and
Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act shall make application in
writing to the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources for a permit.
The application shall include (1) a statement of the amount of water for which
a permit is desired together with an exhibit of maps showing the location of
all water wells and (2) such other information as the Chief Water Officer
director deems necessary or desirable. The application shall be accompanied by
a fee in the amount of fifty dollars for the first five million gallons per day
and an additional twenty dollars for each additional increment of five million
gallons per day requested. The fee shall be based on the amounts of water
requested on a daily average basis.
Sec. 180. Section 46-640, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-640 Upon receipt of an application filed under section 46-639, the
Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources shall cause a notice of such
application to be published at the applicant's expense at least once a week for
three consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published or of general
circulation in each county containing lands on which the water well field or
any part of such water well field is or is proposed to be located. The notice
shall contain a description of the lands upon which such water well field is or
is proposed to be located, the amount of water requested, the number of water
wells constructed or proposed, and any other relevant information. The notice
shall state that any interested person may object to and request a hearing on
the application by filing written objections specifically stating the grounds
for each objection within two weeks after the date of final publication with in
the Chief Water Officer office of the director.
Sec. 181. Section 46-641, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-641 The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources may hold a
hearing on an application filed under section 46-639 on the Chief Water
Officer's its own motion and shall hold a hearing on such an application if
requested by any person pursuant to section 46-640.
Sec. 182. Section 46-642, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-642 (1) If the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources finds
that the withdrawal and transportation of ground water requested by the
applicant are reasonable, are not contrary to the conservation and beneficial
use of ground water, and are not otherwise detrimental to the public welfare,
he or she shall grant a permit to the applicant to withdraw and transport water
in the amount applied for or in a lesser amount. The permit so granted shall
have a priority date as of the time when the application is filed with the
Chief Water Officer director.
(2) In determining whether to grant or deny a permit under subsection (1)
of this section, the Chief Water Officer director shall consider the factors
set forth in subdivisions (1) through (7) of section 46-613.01.
Sec. 183. Section 46-644, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-644 Permits granted by the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural
Resources shall be valid for a period of five years after the granting of a
permit and as long thereafter as the water for which the permit is granted is
used. For the purposes of the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water
Transfers Permit Act, the commencement of construction of facilities to provide
water for beneficial use shall be deemed the date of the commencement of
beneficial use. If it appears that the holder of a permit granted under the act
has not used water for a beneficial purpose and in accordance with the terms of
the permit for more than five years, such permit may be revoked or modified by
the Chief Water Officer director. The procedure for such revocation or
modification shall be the same as that provided for in sections 46-229.02 to
46-229.05.
Sec. 184. Section 46-645, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-645 The Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources may grant to
-66-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
any public water supplier permits to store excess, unused, and unappropriated
water for recharging ground water reservoirs. The procedure to be followed in
granting permits to utilize excess, unused, and unappropriated water for
recharging ground water reservoirs shall, so far as applicable, be the same as
that required for granting permits for the use of ground water as provided in
the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act.
Sec. 185. Section 46-648, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-648 The use of ground water pursuant to a permit granted by the Chief
Water Officer Director of Natural Resources under the Municipal and Rural
Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act shall be subject to and governed by
section 46-613.
Sec. 186. Section 46-649, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-649 The Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources may adopt and
promulgate all rules and regulations necessary or desirable to secure
compliance with the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit
Act.
Sec. 187. Section 46-653, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-653 Any person may apply to the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural
Resources for a special permit to drill or to change the intended use of a
water well without regard to the spacing requirements of section 46-651. Such
application shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Chief Water
Officer director and shall contain a statement of the precise location of the
water well or proposed water well, facts justifying the request for such
special permit, the size or proposed size of such water well, expressed in
gallons per minute, to the extent that capacity is susceptible of advance
determination, and, if applicable, the name of the person who is actually going
to drill the water well. A separate application shall be submitted for each
water well for which a special permit is sought, and each application shall be
accompanied by a fee of twelve dollars and fifty cents which shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund. When considering the
approval or rejection of any such application, the Chief Water Officer director
shall consider the facts offered as justification of the need for the special
permit, the known ground water supply, and such other pertinent information as
may be available. Such application may be approved or disapproved in whole or
in part and the special permit issued or refused accordingly.
Sec. 188. Section 46-654, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-654 (1) Any public water supplier having a permit under the Municipal
and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act is hereby granted the
protection of sections 46-651 to 46-655 for all water wells for which a permit
has been or in the future is granted by the Chief Water Officer Department of
Natural Resources under such act.
(2) If in its application for a permit pursuant to such act a public water
supplier requests the protection of the spacing requirements of section 46-651
for test holes and water wells under construction and if the permit is granted,
the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources shall identify in the
permit the area to which the spacing protection will apply and the spacing
protection of section 46-651 shall then apply to such area for a period of one
year from the date the permit is granted. The Chief Water Officer director
shall notify, by certified or registered mail, owners and occupiers of land
affected by the granting of such spacing protection, according to information
supplied by the applicant. Costs of providing such notice shall be borne by the
applicant. Owners or occupiers of land not receiving the notice required by
this subsection shall not be bound by the spacing requirements until the
applicant's water wells are completed. Such protection may be extended by the
Chief Water Officer director, by a similar procedure, upon application by the
public water supplier and good cause shown, for additional one-year periods.
Sec. 189. Section 46-655.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-655.01 (1) A public water supplier as defined in section 46-638 may
obtain protection for a public water supply wellfield from encroachment from
other water wells by filing with the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural
Resources a notice of intent to consider a wellfield. The notice of intent
shall include:
(a) The legal description of the land being considered as a public water
supply wellfield; and
(b) Written consent of the owner of the land considered for a public water
supply wellfield, allowing the public water supplier to conduct an evaluation
as to whether such land is suitable for a public water supply wellfield.
(2) A notice of intent filed under this section shall be limited to a
contiguous tract of land. No public water supplier shall have more than three
notices of intent under this section on file with the Chief Water Officer
department at any one time.
(3) A notice of intent filed under this section shall expire one year
after the date of filing and may be renewed for one additional year by filing
with the Chief Water Officer department a notice of renewal of the original
notice of intent filed under this section before expiration of the original
notice of intent.
(4) At the time a notice of intent or a notice of renewal is filed with
the Chief Water Officer department, the public water supplier shall:
-67-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(a) Provide a copy of the notice of intent or notice of renewal to the
owners of land falling within the spacing protection provided by subdivision
(5)(a) of this section pursuant to the notice;
(b) Provide a copy of the notice to the natural resources district or
districts within which the land being considered for a wellfield is located;
and
(c) Publish a copy of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in
the area in which the wellfield is being considered.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this subsection,
during the time that a notice of intent under this section is in effect, no
person may drill or construct a water well, as defined in section 46-601.01,
within the following number of feet of the boundaries of the land described in
the notice of intent, whichever is greater:
(i) One thousand feet; or
(ii) The maximum number of feet specified in any applicable regulations of
a natural resources district that a well of a public water supplier must be
spaced from another well.
(b) Any person who, at least one hundred eighty days prior to filing a
notice of intent, obtained a valid permit from a natural resources district to
drill or construct a water well within the area subject to the protection
provided by this section is not prohibited from drilling or constructing a
water well.
(c) The public water supplier may waive the protection provided by this
section and allow a person to drill or construct a new or replacement water
well within the area subject to the protection provided by this section.
(6) Within thirty days after the public water supplier reaches a
determination that the land described in a particular notice of intent is not
suitable for a public water supply wellfield, the public water supplier shall
notify the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources, all affected
natural resources districts, the owner of the land described in the notice of
intent, and the owners of all land falling within the spacing protection
provided by subdivision (5)(a) of this section pursuant to the notice of intent
of such determination. Upon receipt by the Chief Water Officer department of
the notice of such determination, the notice of intent that contains the
description of such tract of land shall terminate immediately, notwithstanding
any other provision of this section.
Sec. 190. Section 46-676, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-676 For purposes of the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act, the :
(1) The definitions found in section 46-706 are used. ;
(2) Department means the Department of Natural Resources; and
(3) Director means the Director of Natural Resources.
Sec. 191. Section 46-677, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-677 (1) Except as provided in sections 46-676.01 and 46-678.01:
(a) Any person who desires to withdraw and transfer ground water from
aquifers located within the State of Nebraska for industrial purposes shall,
prior to commencing construction of any water wells, obtain from the Chief
Water Officer director a permit to authorize such withdrawal and transfer of
such ground water; and
(b) Any person who prior to April 23, 1993, has withdrawn ground water
from aquifers located in the State of Nebraska for industrial purposes may file
an application for a permit to authorize the transfer of such ground water at
any time.
(2) For purposes of this section, industrial purposes includes
manufacturing, commercial, and power generation uses of water and commercial
use includes, but is not limited to, maintenance of the turf of a golf course.
Sec. 192. Section 46-678, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-678 (1) Applications for permits required by section 46-677 shall be on
forms provided by the Chief Water Officer director and shall contain:
(a) A statement of the amount of ground water which the applicant proposes
to use;
(b) A statement of the proposed use and whether the ground water will be
transferred for use at a location other than the well site;
(c) A hydrologic evaluation of the impact of the proposed use on the
surrounding area and on existing users;
(d) The date when the applicant expects to first use the ground water; and
(e) Such other relevant information as the Chief Water Officer director
may deem necessary or desirable.
(2) Such applications shall be accompanied by an exhibit of maps showing
the location, depth, and capacity of the proposed water wells.
Sec. 193. Section 46-679, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-679 Within thirty days of the receipt of an application made under
section 46-677, the Chief Water Officer director shall accept the application
as a completed application or return the application to the applicant as an
incomplete application. If the application is deemed to be incomplete, the
Chief Water Officer director shall inform the applicant as to the deficiencies
in the application.
Sec. 194. Section 46-680, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-680 (1) After the Chief Water Officer director has accepted the
-68-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
application made under section 46-677 as a completed application, the Chief
Water Officer director shall cause a notice of such application to be published
at the applicant's expense at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in
a legal newspaper published or of general circulation in each county containing
land on which one or more water wells are proposed to be located. The notice
shall include (a) the amount of ground water the applicant proposes to use, (b)
a description of the proposed use and location of that use, (c) the number of
water wells proposed at each location of withdrawal, and (d) any other
information deemed necessary by the Chief Water Officer director to provide
adequate notice of the application to interested persons. The notice shall
state that any interested person may object to and request a hearing on the
application by filing written objections stating the grounds for each objection
within two weeks after the date of final publication of the notice. Such
objections shall be filed with in the Chief Water Officer headquarters office
of the department.
(2) The Chief Water Officer director may hold a hearing on an application
made under section 46-677 at his or her discretion and shall hold a hearing on
such an application if requested by any interested person pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 195. Section 46-682, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-682 The applicant may negotiate with any user of water in order to
obtain an agreement whereby the user waives any cause of action against the
applicant for damages or injunctive or other relief for interference with such
water use, in exchange for financial payment, substitute water, or other
compensation. The applicant shall file copies of any such agreements with the
Chief Water Officer director who shall consider the agreements in determining
whether to grant or deny a permit. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to limit any power of eminent domain possessed by an applicant.
Sec. 196. Section 46-683, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-683 (1) The Chief Water Officer director shall issue a written order
containing specific findings of fact either granting or denying a permit. The
Chief Water Officer director shall grant a permit only if he or she finds that
the applicant's withdrawal and any transfer of ground water are in the public
interest. In determining whether the withdrawal and transfer, if any, are in
the public interest, the Chief Water Officer's director's considerations shall
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Possible adverse effects on existing surface or ground water users;
(b) The effect of the withdrawal and any transfer of ground water on
surface or ground water supplies needed to meet reasonably anticipated domestic
and agricultural demands in the area of the proposed ground water withdrawal;
(c) The availability of alternative sources of surface or ground water
reasonably accessible to the applicant in or near the region of the proposed
withdrawal or use;
(d) The economic benefit of the applicant's proposed use;
(e) The social and economic benefits of existing uses of surface or ground
water in the area of the applicant's proposed use and any transfer;
(f) Any waivers of liability from existing users filed with the Chief
Water Officer director;
(g) The effects on interstate compacts or decrees and the fulfillment of
the provisions of any other state contract or agreement; and
(h) Other factors reasonably affecting the equity of granting the permit.
(2) The Chief Water Officer director may grant a permit for less water
than requested by the applicant. The Chief Water Officer director may also
impose reasonable conditions on the manner and timing of the ground water
withdrawals and on the manner of any transfer of ground water which the Chief
Water Officer director deems necessary to protect existing users of water. If a
hearing is held, the Chief Water Officer director shall issue such written
order within ninety days of the hearing.
Sec. 197. Section 46-683.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-683.01 If during construction or operation a permitholder determines
(1) that an additional amount of water is or will be required for the proposed
use set forth in a permit issued pursuant to section 46-683 or (2) that there
is a need to amend any condition set forth in the permit, the permitholder may
file an application to amend the permit. Following a hearing conducted in the
manner prescribed by section 46-680, the Chief Water Officer director shall
issue a written order containing specific findings of fact either granting or
denying the proposed amendment in accordance with the public interest
considerations enumerated in section 46-683. An application to amend a permit
shall not be approved if the amendment would increase the daily peak withdrawal
or the annual volume by more than twenty-five percent from the amounts approved
in the original permit, except for an amendment to increase the maximum daily
volumetric flow rate or annual volume to levels authorized under a permit
issued by the department Department of Environment and Energy pursuant to
section 81-1504 and subsection (9) of section 81-1505.
Sec. 198. Section 46-684, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-684 (1) A permit granted pursuant to section 46-683 shall be revoked,
following a hearing conducted in the same manner as hearings conducted pursuant
to section 46-680, if the Chief Water Officer director determines that the
permitholder has failed to exercise the right to withdraw ground water within
-69-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
three years of the date specified in the permit or for a period of three
consecutive years thereafter.
(2) If it appears to the Chief Water Officer director that a permitholder
has withdrawn more ground water than the amount specified in the permit or has
violated any of the conditions specified in the permit, the Chief Water Officer
director shall give written notice to the permitholder of the alleged
violation.
Within thirty days following receipt of such notice, the permitholder may:
(a) File an application to amend the permit as provided in section
46-683.01;
(b) Request a hearing before the Chief Water Officer director; or
(c) Take appropriate measures to comply with the permit.
If the permitholder fails to take action pursuant to subdivision (2)(a),
(2)(b), or (2)(c) of this section, the Chief Water Officer director may issue
an order requiring compliance with the permit and seek, if appropriate, a court
injunction prohibiting further violations of the permit.
If the permitholder requests a hearing, the Chief Water Officer director
shall within thirty days schedule a hearing within or in reasonable proximity
to the area where the water wells are located. Within forty-five days following
the hearing, the Chief Water Officer director shall issue an order containing
specific findings of fact with reference to the alleged violation and directing
the permitholder, if necessary, to cease and desist from further violations of
the permit.
(3) Nothing in this section shall limit the penalty provisions of section
46-687.
Sec. 199. Section 46-685, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-685 Any affected person aggrieved by any order issued or final decision
made by the Chief Water Officer director pursuant to the Industrial Ground
Water Regulatory Act may appeal the order to the Court of Appeals. For purposes
of this section, affected person means the applicant for a permit which is the
subject of the Chief Water Officer's director's order or final decision and any
owner of an estate or interest in or concerning land or water whose interest is
or may be impacted in a direct and significant manner by the Chief Water
Officer's director's order or final decision.
Sec. 200. Section 46-686, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-686 Any owner of an estate or interest in or concerning land or water,
except a person who has signed an agreement filed with the Chief Water Officer
director pursuant to section 46-682, may bring an action for damages or
injunctive or other relief for any injury done to his or her land or water
rights by the holder of a permit issued pursuant to section 46-683. Nothing in
the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act shall be construed as limiting the
right to resort to other means of review, redress, or relief provided by law.
Sec. 201. Section 46-686.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-686.01 The Chief Water Officer director shall have jurisdiction over
any ground water withdrawal and transfer made under section 46-678.01. Any
person using ground water at the time a notice to transfer is filed under such
section whose wells thereafter suffer an unanticipated decline in ground water
levels may petition the Chief Water Officer director for a hearing. Such
petition shall specifically set forth the cause and extent of the ground water
decline as well as the nature and extent of any injury resulting from that
decline. If at such hearing the injured party presents evidence showing that
the ground water levels declined as a result of such transfer and shows the
nature and extent of any resulting injury, the Chief Water Officer director may
issue an order terminating or conditioning the transfer to eliminate any
further injury. If the injured party prevails and an order is issued pursuant
to this section, the order shall provide that the person filing the notice of
transfer shall pay the costs of the Chief Water Officer and department staff
department and of the injured party, including reasonable attorney's fees. The
injured party may maintain a civil action against the person filing the notice
of transfer to recover the costs of a hydrologic evaluation. The order of the
Chief Water Officer director may be appealed to the Court of Appeals.
Sec. 202. Section 46-688, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-688 The Chief Water Officer director may adopt and promulgate all rules
and regulations necessary or desirable to secure compliance with the Industrial
Ground Water Regulatory Act. The Chief Water Officer director shall by
regulation specify the contents and scope of the hydrologic evaluation required
by section 46-678, taking into account the current state of hydrologic
knowledge and techniques, and the factors for permit approval listed in section
46-683.
Sec. 203. Section 46-691, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-691 (1) Any person who withdraws ground water for agricultural
purposes, or for any purpose pursuant to a ground water remediation plan as
required under the Environmental Protection Act, including the providing of
water for domestic purposes, from aquifers located within the State of Nebraska
may transfer the use of the ground water off the overlying land if the ground
water is put to a reasonable and beneficial use within the State of Nebraska
and is used for an agricultural purpose, or for any purpose pursuant to a
ground water remediation plan as required under the Environmental Protection
-70-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Act, including the providing of water for domestic purposes, after transfer,
and if such withdrawal, transfer, and use (a) will not significantly adversely
affect any other water user, (b) is consistent with all applicable statutes and
rules and regulations, and (c) is in the public interest. The determination
made by a natural resources district under subsection (2) of this section or
the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources under subsection (3) of
this section shall include consideration of the factors set forth in
subdivisions (1) through (7) of section 46-613.01. For purposes of this
section, domestic has the same meaning as in section 46-613.
(2) Any affected party may object to the transfer of ground water by
filing written objections, specifically stating the grounds for such objection,
in the office of the natural resources district containing the land from which
the ground water is withdrawn. Upon the filing of such objections or on its own
initiative, the natural resources district shall conduct a preliminary
investigation to determine if the withdrawal, transfer, and use of ground water
is consistent with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
Following the preliminary investigation, if the district has reason to believe
that the withdrawal, transfer, or use may not comply with any rule or
regulation of the district, it may utilize its authority under the Nebraska
Ground Water Management and Protection Act to prohibit such withdrawal,
transfer, or use. If the district has reason to believe that the withdrawal,
transfer, and use is consistent with all rules and regulations of the district
but may not comply with one or more other requirements of subsection (1) of
this section, the district shall request that the Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources hold a hearing on such transfer.
(3) At the hearing, all interested persons may appear and present
testimony. Agencies or political subdivisions of this state and the appropriate
natural resources districts shall offer as evidence any information in their
possession which they deem relevant to the purposes of the hearing. After the
hearing, if the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources finds that
the withdrawal, transfer, or use of ground water is contrary to the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, he or she shall issue a cease
and desist order prohibiting the withdrawal and transfer.
(4) The Chief Water Officer director may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 204. Section 46-703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-703 The Legislature further finds:
(1) The management, conservation, and beneficial use of hydrologically
connected ground water and surface water are essential to the continued
economic prosperity and well-being of the state, including the present and
future development of agriculture in the state;
(2) Hydrologically connected ground water and surface water may need to be
managed differently from unconnected ground water and surface water in order to
permit equity among water users and to optimize the beneficial use of
interrelated ground water and surface water supplies;
(3) Natural resources districts already have significant legal authority
to regulate activities which contribute to declines in ground water levels and
to nonpoint source contamination of ground water and are the preferred entities
to regulate, through ground water management areas, ground water related
activities which are contributing to or are, in the reasonably foreseeable
future, likely to contribute to conflicts between ground water users and
surface water appropriators or to water supply shortages in fully appropriated
or overappropriated river basins, subbasins, or reaches;
(4) The Legislature recognizes that ground water use or surface water use
in one natural resources district may have adverse affects on water supplies in
another district or in an adjoining state. The Legislature intends and expects
that each natural resources district within which water use is causing external
impacts will accept responsibility for ground water management in accordance
with the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act in the same manner
and to the same extent as if the impacts were contained within that district;
(5) The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources is responsible
for regulation of surface water resources and local surface water project
sponsors are responsible for much of the structured irrigation utilizing
surface water supplies, and the Chief Water Officer and the local surface water
project sponsors these entities should be responsible for regulation of surface
water related activities which contribute to conflicts between ground water
users and surface water appropriators or to water supply shortages in fully
appropriated or overappropriated river basins, subbasins, or reaches;
(6) All involved natural resources districts, the Chief Water Officer
department, and surface water project sponsors should cooperate and collaborate
on the identification and implementation of management solutions to conflicts
between ground water users and surface water appropriators or to water supply
shortages in fully appropriated or overappropriated river basins, subbasins,
and reaches; and
(7) An Interrelated Water Review Board is needed to resolve any conflicts
between the Chief Water Officer department and the involved natural resources
districts concerning the content, implementation, or enforcement of integrated
management plans for fully appropriated and overappropriated river basins,
subbasins, and reaches.
Sec. 205. Section 46-704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-704 The Legislature also finds that:
-71-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(1) The levels of nitrate nitrogen and other contaminants in ground water
in certain areas of the state are increasing;
(2) Long-term solutions should be implemented and efforts should be made
to prevent the levels of ground water contaminants from becoming too high and
to reduce high levels sufficiently to eliminate health hazards;
(3) Agriculture has been very productive and should continue to be an
important industry to the State of Nebraska;
(4) Natural resources districts have the legal authority to regulate
certain activities and, as local entities, are the preferred regulators of
activities which may contribute to ground water contamination in both urban and
rural areas;
(5) The department is authorized Department of Environment and Energy
should be given authority to regulate sources of contamination when necessary
to prevent serious deterioration of ground water quality;
(6) The powers given to districts and the department Department of
Environment and Energy should be used to stabilize, reduce, and prevent the
increase or spread of ground water contamination; and
(7) There is a need to provide for the orderly management of ground water
quality in areas where available data, evidence, and other information indicate
that present or potential ground water conditions require the designation of
such areas as management areas.
Sec. 206. Section 46-705, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-705 Nothing in the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act
shall be construed to limit the powers of the department Department of
Environment and Energy provided in the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act.
Nothing in the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act
relating to the contamination of ground water is intended to limit the powers
of the department Department of Environment and Energy provided in Chapter 81,
article 15.
Sec. 207. Section 46-706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-706 For purposes of the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water
Transfers Permit Act, the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act,
and sections 46-601 to 46-613.02, 46-636, 46-637, and 46-651 to 46-655, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Person means a natural person, a partnership, a limited liability
company, an association, a corporation, a municipality, an irrigation district,
an agency or a political subdivision of the state, or a department, an agency,
or a bureau of the United States;
(2) Ground water means that water which occurs in or moves, seeps,
filters, or percolates through ground under the surface of the land;
(3) Contamination or contamination of ground water means nitrate nitrogen
or other material which enters the ground water due to action of any person and
causes degradation of the quality of ground water sufficient to make such
ground water unsuitable for present or reasonably foreseeable beneficial uses;
(4) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment;
(5) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment;
(6) (4) District means a natural resources district operating pursuant to
Chapter 2, article 32;
(7) (5) Illegal water well means (a) any water well operated or
constructed without or in violation of a permit required by the Nebraska Ground
Water Management and Protection Act, (b) any water well not in compliance with
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, (c) any
water well not properly registered in accordance with sections 46-602 to
46-604, or (d) any water well not in compliance with any other applicable laws
of the State of Nebraska or with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to such laws;
(8) (6) To commence construction of a water well means the beginning of
the boring, drilling, jetting, digging, or excavating of the actual water well
from which ground water is to be withdrawn;
(9) (7) Management area means any area so designated by a district
pursuant to section 46-712 or 46-718, by the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Director of Environment and Energy pursuant to section 46-725, or
by the Interrelated Water Review Board pursuant to section 46-719. Management
area includes a control area or a special ground water quality protection area
designated prior to July 19, 1996;
(10) (8) Management plan means a ground water management plan developed by
a district and submitted to the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural
Resources for review pursuant to section 46-711;
(11) (9) Ground water reservoir life goal means the finite or infinite
period of time which a district establishes as its goal for maintenance of the
supply and quality of water in a ground water reservoir at the time a ground
water management plan is adopted;
(12) (10) Board means the board of directors of a district;
(13) (11) Acre-inch means the amount of water necessary to cover an acre
of land one inch deep;
(14) (12) Subirrigation or subirrigated land means the natural occurrence
of a ground water table within the root zone of agricultural vegetation, not
exceeding ten feet below the surface of the ground;
(15) (13) Best management practices means schedules of activities,
maintenance procedures, and other management practices utilized for purposes of
-72-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
irrigation efficiency, to conserve or effect a savings of ground water, or to
prevent or reduce present and future contamination of ground water. Best
management practices relating to contamination of ground water may include, but
not be limited to, irrigation scheduling, proper rate and timing of fertilizer
application, and other fertilizer and pesticide management programs. In
determining the rate of fertilizer application, the district shall consult with
the University of Nebraska or a certified crop advisor certified by the
American Society of Agronomy;
(16) (14) Point source means any discernible, confined, and discrete
conveyance, including, but not limited to, any pipe, channel, tunnel, conduit,
well, discrete fissure, container, rolling stock, vessel, other floating craft,
or other conveyance, over which the department Department of Environment and
Energy has regulatory authority and from which a substance which can cause or
contribute to contamination of ground water is or may be discharged;
(17) (15) Allocation, as it relates to water use for irrigation purposes,
means the allotment of a specified total number of acre-inches of irrigation
water per irrigated acre per year or an average number of acre-inches of
irrigation water per irrigated acre over any reasonable period of time;
(18) (16) Rotation means a recurring series of use and nonuse of
irrigation wells on an hourly, daily, weekly, monthly, or yearly basis;
(19) (17) Water well has the same meaning as in section 46-601.01;
(20) (18) Surface water project sponsor means an irrigation district
created pursuant to Chapter 46, article 1, a reclamation district created
pursuant to Chapter 46, article 5, or a public power and irrigation district
created pursuant to Chapter 70, article 6;
(21) (19) Beneficial use means that use by which water may be put to use
to the benefit of humans or other species;
(22) (20) Consumptive use means the amount of water that is consumed under
appropriate and reasonably efficient practices to accomplish without waste the
purposes for which the appropriation or other legally permitted use is lawfully
made;
(23) (21) Dewatering well means a well constructed and used solely for the
purpose of lowering the ground water table elevation;
(24) (22) Emergency situation means any set of circumstances that requires
the use of water from any source that might otherwise be regulated or
prohibited and the agency, district, or organization responsible for regulating
water use from such source reasonably and in good faith believes that such use
is necessary to protect the public health, safety, and welfare, including, if
applicable, compliance with federal or state water quality standards;
(25) (23) Good cause shown means a reasonable justification for granting a
variance for a consumptive use of water that would otherwise be prohibited by
rule or regulation and which the granting agency, district, or organization
reasonably and in good faith believes will provide an economic, environmental,
social, or public health and safety benefit that is equal to or greater than
the benefit resulting from the rule or regulation from which a variance is
sought;
(26) (24) Historic consumptive use means the amount of water that has
previously been consumed under appropriate and reasonably efficient practices
to accomplish without waste the purposes for which the appropriation or other
legally permitted use was lawfully made;
(27) (25) Monitoring well means a water well that is designed and
constructed to provide ongoing hydrologic or water quality information and is
not intended for consumptive use;
(28) (26) Order, except as otherwise specifically provided, includes any
order required by the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act, by
rule or regulation, or by a decision adopted by a district by vote of the board
of directors of the district taken at any regularly scheduled or specially
scheduled meeting of the board;
(29) (27) Overall difference between the current and fully appropriated
levels of development means the extent to which existing uses of hydrologically
connected surface water and ground water and conservation activities result in
the water supply available for purposes identified in subsection (3) of section
46-713 to be less than the water supply available if the river basin, subbasin,
or reach had been determined to be fully appropriated in accordance with
section 46-714;
(30) (28) Test hole means a hole designed solely for the purposes of
obtaining information on hydrologic or geologic conditions;
(31) (29) Variance means (a) an approval to deviate from a restriction
imposed under subsection (1), (2), (8), or (9) of section 46-714 or (b) the
approval to act in a manner contrary to existing rules or regulations from a
governing body whose rule or regulation is otherwise applicable;
(32) (30) Certified irrigated acres means the number of acres or portion
of an acre that a natural resources district has approved for irrigation from
ground water in accordance with law and with rules adopted by the district; and
(33) (31) Certified water uses means beneficial uses of ground water for
purposes other than irrigation identified by a district pursuant to rules
adopted by the district.
Sec. 208. Section 46-707, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-707 (1) Regardless of whether or not any portion of a district has been
designated as a management area, in order to administer and enforce the
Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act and to effectuate the
policy of the state to conserve ground water resources, a district may:
-73-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(a) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to discharge the
administrative duties assigned in the act;
(b) Require such reports from ground water users as may be necessary;
(c) Require the reporting of water uses and irrigated acres by landowners
and others with control over the water uses and irrigated acres for the purpose
of certification by the district;
(d) Require meters to be placed on any water wells for the purpose of
acquiring water use data;
(e) Require decommissioning of water wells that are not properly
classified as active status water wells as defined in section 46-1204.02 or
inactive status water wells as defined in section 46-1207.02;
(f) Conduct investigations and cooperate or contract with agencies of the
United States, agencies or political subdivisions of this state, public or
private corporations, or any association or individual on any matter relevant
to the administration of the act;
(g) Report to and consult with the department Department of Environment
and Energy on all matters concerning the entry of contamination or
contaminating materials into ground water supplies; and
(h) Issue cease and desist orders, following three days' notice to the
person affected stating the contemplated action and in general the grounds for
the action and following reasonable opportunity to be heard, to enforce any of
the provisions of the act or of orders or permits issued pursuant to the act,
to initiate suits to enforce the provisions of orders issued pursuant to the
act, and to restrain the construction of illegal water wells or the withdrawal
or use of water from illegal water wells.
Before any rule or regulation is adopted pursuant to this subsection, a
public hearing shall be held within the district. Notice of the hearing shall
be given as provided in section 46-743.
(2) In addition to the powers enumerated in subsection (1) of this
section, a district may impose an immediate temporary stay for a period of one
hundred eighty days on the construction of any new water well and on any
increase in the number of acres historically irrigated, without prior notice or
hearing, upon adoption of a resolution by the board finding that such temporary
immediate stay is necessary. The district shall hold at least one public
hearing on the matter within the district during such one hundred eighty days,
with the notice of the hearing given as provided in section 46-743, prior to
making a determination as to imposing a permanent stay or conditions in
accordance with subsections (1) and (6) of section 46-739. Within forty-five
days after a hearing pursuant to this subsection, the district shall decide
whether to exempt from the immediate temporary stay the construction of water
wells for which permits were issued prior to the date of the resolution
commencing the stay but for which construction had not begun prior to such
date. If construction of such water wells is allowed, all permits that were
valid when the stay went into effect shall be extended by a time period equal
to the length of the stay and such water wells shall otherwise be completed in
accordance with section 46-738. Water wells listed in subsection (3) of section
46-714 and water wells of public water suppliers are exempt from this
subsection.
(3) In addition to the powers enumerated in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, a district may assess a fee against a person requesting a
variance to cover the administrative cost of consideration of the variance,
including, but not limited to, costs of copying records and the cost of
publishing a notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county
or counties of the district, radio announcements, or other means of
communication deemed necessary in the area where the property is located.
Sec. 209. Section 46-709, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-709 Each district shall maintain a ground water management plan based
upon the best available information and shall submit amendments to such plan to
the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources for review and approval.
The plan shall include, but not be limited to, the identification to the
extent possible of:
(1) Ground water supplies within the district including transmissivity,
saturated thickness maps, and other ground water reservoir information, if
available;
(2) Local recharge characteristics and rates from any sources, if
available;
(3) Average annual precipitation and the variations within the district;
(4) Crop water needs within the district;
(5) Current ground water data-collection programs;
(6) Past, present, and potential ground water use within the district;
(7) Ground water quality concerns within the district;
(8) Proposed water conservation and supply augmentation programs for the
district;
(9) The availability of supplemental water supplies, including the
opportunity for ground water recharge;
(10) The opportunity to integrate and coordinate the use of water from
different sources of supply;
(11) Ground water management objectives, including a proposed ground water
reservoir life goal for the district. For management plans adopted or revised
after July 19, 1996, the ground water management objectives may include any
proposed integrated management objectives for hydrologically connected ground
water and surface water supplies but a management plan does not have to be
-74-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
revised prior to the adoption or implementation of an integrated management
plan pursuant to section 46-718 or 46-719;
(12) Existing subirrigation uses within the district;
(13) The relative economic value of different uses of ground water
proposed or existing within the district; and
(14) The geographic and stratigraphic boundaries of any proposed
management area.
If the expenses incurred by a district preparing or amending a ground
water management plan exceed twenty-five percent of the district's current
budget, the district may make application to the Nebraska Resources Development
Fund for assistance.
Each district's ground water management plan shall also identify, to the
extent possible, the levels and sources of ground water contamination within
the district, ground water quality goals, long-term solutions necessary to
prevent the levels of ground water contaminants from becoming too high and to
reduce high levels sufficiently to eliminate health hazards, and practices
recommended to stabilize, reduce, and prevent the occurrence, increase, or
spread of ground water contamination.
Sec. 210. Section 46-711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-711 (1) The Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources shall
review any ground water management plan or plan modification submitted by a
district to ensure that the best available studies, data, and information,
whether previously existing or newly initiated, were utilized and considered
and that such plan is supported by and is a reasonable application of such
information. If a management area is proposed and the primary purpose of the
proposed management area is protection of water quality, the director shall
consult with the Department of Environment and Energy regarding approval or
denial of the management plan. The Chief Water Officer director shall consult
with the Conservation and Survey Division of the University of Nebraska and
such other state or federal agencies the Chief Water Officer director shall
deem necessary when reviewing plans. Within ninety days after receipt of a
plan, the Chief Water Officer director shall transmit his or her specific
findings, conclusions, and reasons for approval or disapproval to the district
submitting the plan.
(2) If the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources disapproves a
ground water management plan, the district which submitted the plan shall, in
order to establish a management area, submit to the Chief Water Officer
director either the original or a revised plan with an explanation of how the
original or revised plan addresses the issues raised by the Chief Water Officer
director in his or her reasons for disapproval. Once a district has submitted
an explanation pursuant to this section, such district may proceed to schedule
a hearing pursuant to section 46-712.
Sec. 211. Section 46-712, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-712 (1) A natural resources district may establish a ground water
management area in accordance with this section to accomplish any one or more
of the following objectives: (a) Protection of ground water quantity; (b)
protection of ground water quality; or (c) prevention or resolution of
conflicts between users of ground water and appropriators of surface water,
which ground water and surface water are hydrologically connected.
(2) Prior to establishment by a district of a management area other than a
management area being established in accordance with section 46-718, the
district's management plan shall have been approved by the Chief Water Officer
Director of Natural Resources or the district shall have completed the
requirements of subsection (2) of section 46-711. If necessary to determine
whether a management area should be designated, the district may initiate new
studies and data-collection efforts and develop computer models. In order to
establish a management area, the district shall fix a time and place for a
public hearing to consider the management plan information supplied by the
Chief Water Officer director and to hear any other evidence. The hearing shall
be located within or in reasonable proximity to the area proposed for
designation as a management area. Notice of the hearing shall be published as
provided in section 46-743, and the hearing shall be conducted in accordance
with such section.
(3)(a) Within ninety days after the hearing, the district shall determine
whether a management area shall be designated. If the district determines that
no management area shall be established, the district shall issue an order to
that effect.
(b) If the district determines that a management area shall be
established, the district shall by order designate the area as a management
area and shall adopt one or more controls authorized by section 46-739 to be
utilized within the area in order to achieve the ground water management
objectives specified in the plan. Such an order shall include a geographic and
stratigraphic definition of the area. The boundaries and controls shall take
into account any considerations brought forth at the hearing and administrative
factors directly affecting the ability of the district to implement and carry
out local ground water management.
(c) The controls adopted shall not include controls substantially
different from those set forth in the notice of the hearing. The area
designated by the order shall not include any area not included in the notice
of the hearing.
(4) Modification of the boundaries of a district-designated management
-75-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
area or dissolution of such an area shall be in accordance with the procedures
established in this section. Hearings for such modifications or for dissolution
may not be initiated more often than once a year. Hearings for modification of
controls may be initiated as often as deemed necessary by the district, and
such modifications may be accomplished using the procedure in this section.
(5) A district shall, prior to adopting or amending any rules or
regulations for a management area, consult with any holders of permits for
intentional or incidental underground water storage and recovery issued
pursuant to section 46-226.02, 46-233, 46-240, 46-241, 46-242, or 46-297.
(6) If a ground water management area has been adopted by a district under
this section that includes one or more controls authorized by subdivision (1)
(f) or (1)(m) of section 46-739, the district may request that the Chief Water
Officer Department of Natural Resources to conduct an evaluation to determine
if an immediate stay should be placed on the issuance of new surface water
natural-flow appropriations in the area, river basin, subbasin, or reach of the
management area, and the Chief Water Officer department may determine that the
stay is in the public interest. The stay may include provisions for exceptions
to be granted for beneficial uses as described in subsection (3) of section
46-714 or for a project that provides hydrological benefit to the area of the
stay and may include provisions that the stay may be rescinded based on new or
additional information that may become available.
Sec. 212. Section 46-713, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-713 (1)(a) By January 1 of each year beginning in 2006 and except as
otherwise provided in this section and section 46-720, the Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources shall complete an evaluation of the expected
long-term availability of hydrologically connected water supplies for both
existing and new surface water uses and existing and new ground water uses in
each of the state's river basins and shall issue a report that describes the
results of the evaluation. For purposes of the evaluation and the report, a
river basin may be divided into two or more subbasins or reaches. A river
basin, subbasin, or reach for which an integrated management plan has been or
is being developed pursuant to sections 46-715 to 46-717 or pursuant to section
46-719 shall not be evaluated unless it is being reevaluated as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. For each river basin, subbasin, or reach
evaluated, the report shall describe (i) the nature and extent of use of both
surface water and ground water in each river basin, subbasin, or reach, (ii)
the geographic area within which the Chief Water Officer department
preliminarily considers surface water and ground water to be hydrologically
connected and the criteria used for that determination, and (iii) the extent to
which the then-current uses affect available near-term and long-term water
supplies. River basins, subbasins, and reaches designated as overappropriated
in accordance with subsection (4) of this section shall not be evaluated by the
Chief Water Officer department. The Chief Water Officer department is not
required to perform an annual evaluation for a river basin, subbasin, or reach
during the four years following a status change in such river basin, subbasin,
or reach under subsection (12) of section 46-714.
(b) Based on the information reviewed in the evaluation process, the Chief
Water Officer department shall arrive at a preliminary conclusion for each
river basin, subbasin, and reach evaluated as to whether such river basin,
subbasin, or reach presently is fully appropriated without the initiation of
additional uses. The Chief Water Officer department shall also determine if and
how such preliminary conclusion would change if no additional legal constraints
were imposed on future development of hydrologically connected surface water
and ground water and reasonable projections are made about the extent and
location of future development in such river basin, subbasin, or reach.
(c) In addition to the conclusion about whether a river basin, subbasin,
or reach is fully appropriated, the Chief Water Officer department shall
include in the report, for informational purposes only, a summary of relevant
data provided by any interested party concerning the social, economic, and
environmental impacts of additional hydrologically connected surface water and
ground water uses on resources that are dependent on streamflow or ground water
levels but are not protected by appropriations or regulations.
(d) In preparing the report, the Chief Water Officer department shall rely
on the best scientific data, information, and methodologies readily available
to ensure that the conclusions and results contained in the report are
reliable. In the its report, the Chief Water Officer department shall provide
sufficient documentation to allow these data, information, methodologies, and
conclusions to be independently replicated and assessed. Upon request by the
Chief Water Officer department, state agencies, natural resources districts,
irrigation districts, reclamation districts, public power and irrigation
districts, mutual irrigation companies, canal companies, municipalities, and
other water users and stakeholders shall provide relevant data and information
in their possession. The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources
shall specify by rule and regulation the types of scientific data and other
information that will be considered for making the preliminary determinations
required by this section.
(2)(a) The Chief Water Officer department shall complete a reevaluation of
a river basin, subbasin, or reach for which an integrated management plan has
been or is being prepared if the Chief Water Officer department has reason to
believe that a reevaluation might lead to a different determination about
whether such river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated or
overappropriated. A decision to reevaluate may be reached by the Chief Water
-76-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Officer department on his or her its own or in response to a petition filed
with the Chief Water Officer department by any interested person. To be
considered sufficient to justify a reevaluation, a petition shall be
accompanied by supporting information showing that (i) new scientific data or
other information relevant to the determination of whether the river basin,
subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated or overappropriated has become
available since the last evaluation of such river basin, subbasin, or reach,
(ii) the Chief Water Officer department relied on incorrect or incomplete
information when the river basin, subbasin, or reach was last evaluated, or
(iii) the Chief Water Officer department erred in the its interpretation or
application of the information available when the river basin, subbasin, or
reach was last evaluated. If a petition determined by the Chief Water Officer
department to be sufficient is filed before July 1 of any year, the
reevaluation of the river basin, subbasin, or reach involved shall be included
in the next annual report prepared in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section. If any such petition is filed on or after July 1 of any year, the
Chief Water Officer department may defer the reevaluation of the river basin,
subbasin, or reach involved until the second annual report after such filing.
(b) If the reevaluation results in a different determination by the Chief
Water Officer department, then (i) the Chief Water Officer department shall
notify, by certified mail, the affected natural resources districts and any
irrigation district, public power and irrigation district, mutual irrigation
company, canal company, or municipality that relies on water from the affected
river basin, subbasin, or reach of the preliminary change in the determination
and (ii) the Chief Water Officer department shall hold one or more public
hearings not more than ninety days after the publication of the notice required
in subdivision (b)(i) of this subsection. Notice of the hearings shall be
provided in the same manner as the notice required in subsection (1) of section
46-714. Any interested person may appear at the hearing and present written or
oral testimony and evidence concerning the appropriation status of the river
basin, subbasin, or reach.
(c) Within thirty days after the final hearing under subdivision (b) of
this subsection, the Chief Water Officer department shall notify the
appropriate natural resources districts of the Chief Water Officer's
department's final determination with respect to the appropriation status of
the river basin, subbasin, or reach.
(3) A river basin, subbasin, or reach shall be deemed fully appropriated
if the Chief Water Officer department determines based upon the its evaluation
conducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and information presented
at the hearing pursuant to subsection (4) of section 46-714 that then-current
uses of hydrologically connected surface water and ground water in the river
basin, subbasin, or reach cause or will in the reasonably foreseeable future
cause (a) the surface water supply to be insufficient to sustain over the long
term the beneficial or useful purposes for which existing natural-flow or
storage appropriations were granted and the beneficial or useful purposes for
which, at the time of approval, any existing instream appropriation was
granted, (b) the streamflow to be insufficient to sustain over the long term
the beneficial uses from wells constructed in aquifers dependent on recharge
from the river or stream involved, or (c) reduction in the flow of a river or
stream sufficient to cause noncompliance by Nebraska with an interstate compact
or decree, other formal state contract or agreement, or applicable state or
federal laws.
(4)(a) A river basin, subbasin, or reach shall be deemed overappropriated
if, on July 16, 2004, the river basin, subbasin, or reach is subject to an
interstate cooperative agreement among three or more states and if, prior to
such date, the Chief Water Officer department has declared a moratorium on the
issuance of new surface water appropriations in such river basin, subbasin, or
reach and has requested each natural resources district with jurisdiction in
the affected area in such river basin, subbasin, or reach either (i) to close
or to continue in effect a previously adopted closure of all or part of such
river basin, subbasin, or reach to the issuance of additional water well
permits in accordance with subdivision (1)(k) of section 46-656.25 as such
section existed prior to July 16, 2004, or (ii) to temporarily suspend or to
continue in effect a temporary suspension, previously adopted pursuant to
section 46-656.28 as such section existed prior to July 16, 2004, on the
drilling of new water wells in all or part of such river basin, subbasin, or
reach.
(b) Within sixty days after July 16, 2004, the Chief Water Officer
department shall designate which river basins, subbasins, or reaches are
overappropriated. The designation shall include a description of the geographic
area within which the Chief Water Officer department has determined that
surface water and ground water are hydrologically connected and the criteria
used to make such determination.
Sec. 213. Section 46-714, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-714 (1) Whenever the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural
Resources makes a preliminary determination that a river basin, subbasin, or
reach not previously designated as overappropriated and not previously
determined to be fully appropriated has become fully appropriated, the Chief
Water Officer department shall place an immediate stay on the issuance of any
new natural-flow, storage, or storage-use appropriations in such river basin,
subbasin, or reach. The Chief Water Officer department shall also provide
prompt notice of such preliminary determination to all licensed water well
-77-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
contractors in the state and to each natural resources district that
encompasses any of the geographic area involved. Such notice to natural
resources districts shall be by certified mail. The notice shall be addressed
to the manager of the natural resources district or his or her designee and
shall include the signature of the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural
Resources. Immediately upon receipt of such notice by the natural resources
district, there shall be a stay on issuance of water well construction permits
in the geographic area preliminarily determined by the Chief Water Officer
department to include hydrologically connected surface water and ground water
in such river basin, subbasin, or reach. The Chief Water Officer department
shall also notify the public of the preliminary determination that the river
basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated and of the affected geographic
area. Such notice shall be provided by publication once each week for three
consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper of statewide circulation and in
such other newspaper or newspapers as are deemed appropriate by the Chief Water
Officer department to provide general circulation in the river basin, subbasin,
or reach.
(2) If the Chief Water Officer department preliminarily determines a river
basin, subbasin, or reach to be fully appropriated and has identified the
existence of hydrologically connected surface water and ground water in such
river basin, subbasin, or reach, stays shall also be imposed:
(a) On the construction of any new water well in the area covered by the
determination unless a permit with conditions imposed by the natural resources
district has been issued prior to the determination. Such conditions shall meet
the objectives of subsection (4) of section 46-715 and may include, but are not
limited to, conditions in accordance with subsection (6) of section 46-739. Any
well constructed pursuant to such permit shall be completed in accordance with
section 46-738; and
(b) On the use of an existing water well or an existing surface water
appropriation in the affected area to increase the number of acres historically
irrigated.
Such additional stays shall begin ten days after the first publication, in
a newspaper of statewide circulation, of the notice of the preliminary
determination that the river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated.
(3) Exceptions to the stays imposed pursuant to subsection (1), (2), (8),
or (9) of this section shall exist for (a) test holes, (b) dewatering wells
with an intended use of one year or less, (c) monitoring wells, (d) wells
constructed pursuant to a ground water remediation plan under the Environmental
Protection Act, (e) water wells designed and constructed to pump fifty gallons
per minute or less, except that no two or more water wells that each pump fifty
gallons per minute or less may be connected or otherwise combined to serve a
single project such that the collective pumping would exceed fifty gallons per
minute, (f) water wells for range livestock, (g) new surface water uses or
water wells that are necessary to alleviate an emergency situation involving
the provision of water for human consumption or public health and safety, (h)
water wells defined by the applicable natural resources district as replacement
water wells, but the consumptive use of any such replacement water well can be
no greater than the historic consumptive use of the water well it is to replace
or, if applicable, the historic consumptive use of the surface water use it is
to replace, (i) new surface water uses and water wells to which a right or
permit is transferred in accordance with state law, but the consumptive use of
any such new use can be no greater than the historic consumptive use of the
surface water use or water well from which the right or permit is being
transferred, (j) water wells and increases in ground water irrigated acres for
which a variance is granted by the applicable natural resources district for
good cause shown, (k) subject to any conditions imposed by the applicable
natural resources district, to the extent permitted by the applicable natural
resources district, increases in ground water irrigated acres that result from
the use of water wells that were permitted prior to the effective date of the
determination made in subsection (1) of this section and completed in
accordance with section 46-738 but were not used for irrigation prior to that
effective date, (l) to the extent permitted by the applicable natural resources
district, increases in ground water irrigated acres that result from the use of
water wells that are constructed after the effective date of the stay in
accordance with a permit granted by that natural resources district prior to
the effective date of the stay, (m) surface water uses for which temporary
public-use construction permits are issued pursuant to subsection (8) of
section 46-233, (n) surface water uses and increases in surface water irrigated
acres for which a variance is granted by the Chief Water Officer department for
good cause shown, and (o) water wells for which permits have been approved by
the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources pursuant to the
Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act prior to the
effective date of the stay.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any stay imposed
pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall remain in effect for
the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach until the Chief Water Officer
department has made a final determination regarding whether the river basin,
subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated and, if the Chief Water Officer's
department's final determination is that the river basin, subbasin, or reach is
fully appropriated, shall remain in effect as provided in subsection (11) of
this section. Within the time period between the dates of the preliminary and
final determinations, the Chief Water Officer department and the affected
natural resources districts shall consult with any irrigation district,
-78-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
reclamation district, public power and irrigation district, mutual irrigation
company, canal company, or municipality that relies on water from the affected
river basin, subbasin, or reach and with other water users and stakeholders as
deemed appropriate by the Chief Water Officer department or the natural
resources districts. The Chief Water Officer department shall also hold one or
more public hearings not more than ninety days after the first publication of
the notice required by subsection (1) of this section. Notice of the hearings
shall be provided in the same manner as the notice required by such subsection.
Any interested person may appear at such hearing and present written or oral
testimony and evidence concerning the appropriation status of the river basin,
subbasin, or reach, the Chief Water Officer's department's preliminary
conclusions about the extent of the area within which the surface water and
ground water supplies for the river basin, subbasin, or reach are determined to
be hydrologically connected, and whether the stays on new uses should be
terminated.
(5) Within thirty days after the final hearing under subsection (4) of
this section, the Chief Water Officer department shall notify the appropriate
natural resources districts of the Chief Water Officer's department's final
determination with respect to the appropriation status of the river basin,
subbasin, or reach. If the final determination is that the river basin,
subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated, the Chief Water Officer department,
at the same time, shall (a) decide whether to continue or to terminate the
stays on new surface water uses and on increases in the number of surface water
irrigated acres and (b) designate the geographic area within which the Chief
Water Officer department considers surface water and ground water to be
hydrologically connected in the river basin, subbasin, or reach and describe
the methods and criteria used in making that determination. The Chief Water
Officer department shall provide notice of the its decision to continue or
terminate the stays in the same manner as the notice required by subsection (1)
of this section.
(6) Within ninety days after a final determination by the Chief Water
Officer department that a river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully
appropriated, an affected natural resources district may hold one or more
public hearings on the question of whether the stays on the issuance of new
water well permits, on the construction of new water wells, or on increases in
ground water irrigated acres should be terminated. Notice of the hearings shall
be published as provided in section 46-743.
(7) Within forty-five days after a natural resources district's final
hearing pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the natural resources
district shall decide (a) whether to terminate the stay on new water wells in
all or part of the natural resources district subject to the stay and (b)
whether to terminate the stay on increases in ground water irrigated acres. If
the natural resources district decides not to terminate the stay on new water
wells in any geographic area, it shall also decide whether to exempt from such
stay the construction of water wells for which permits were issued prior to the
issuance of the stay but for which construction had not begun prior to issuance
of the stay. If construction of water wells for which permits were issued prior
to the stay is allowed, all permits that were valid when the stay went into
effect shall be extended by a time period equal to the length of the stay.
(8) Whenever the Chief Water Officer department designates a river basin,
subbasin, or reach as overappropriated, each previously declared moratorium on
the issuance of new surface water appropriations in the river basin, subbasin,
or reach shall continue in effect. The Chief Water Officer department shall
also provide prompt notice of such designation to all licensed water well
contractors in the state and to each natural resources district that
encompasses any of the geographic area involved. Immediately upon receipt of
such notice by a natural resources district, there shall be a stay on the
issuance of new water well construction permits in any portion of such natural
resources district that is within the hydrologically connected area designated
by the Chief Water Officer department. The Chief Water Officer department shall
also notify the public of the Chief Water Officer's its designation of such
river basin, subbasin, or reach as overappropriated and of the geographic area
involved in such designation. Such notice shall be published once each week for
three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper of statewide circulation and
in such other newspapers as are deemed appropriate by the Chief Water Officer
department to provide general notice in the river basin, subbasin, or reach.
(9) Beginning ten days after the first publication of notice under
subsection (8) of this section in a newspaper of statewide circulation, there
shall also be stays (a) on the construction of any new water well in the
hydrologically connected area if such construction has not commenced prior to
such date and if no permit for construction of the water well has been issued
previously by either the Chief Water Officer department or the natural
resources district, (b) on the use of an existing water well in the
hydrologically connected area to increase the number of acres historically
irrigated, and (c) on the use of an existing surface water appropriation to
increase the number of acres historically irrigated in the affected area.
(10) Within ninety days after a designation by the Chief Water Officer
department of a river basin, subbasin, or reach as overappropriated, a natural
resources district that encompasses any of the hydrologically connected area
designated by the Chief Water Officer department may hold one or more public
hearings on the question of whether to terminate the stays on (a) the
construction of new water wells within all or part of its portion of the
hydrologically connected area, (b) the issuance of new water well construction
-79-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
permits in such area, or (c) the increase in ground water irrigated acres in
such area. Notice of any hearing for such purpose shall be provided pursuant to
section 46-743. Prior to the scheduling of a natural resources district hearing
on the question of whether to terminate any such stay, the Chief Water Officer
department and the affected natural resources district shall consult with any
irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and irrigation
district, mutual irrigation company, canal company, or municipality that relies
on water from the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach and with other water
users and stakeholders as deemed appropriate by the Chief Water Officer
department or the natural resources district.
(11) Any stay issued pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until
(a) the stay has been terminated pursuant to subsection (5), (7), or (10) of
this section, (b) an integrated management plan for the affected river basin,
subbasin, or reach has been adopted by the Chief Water Officer department and
the affected natural resources districts and has taken effect, (c) an
integrated management plan for the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach has
been adopted by the Interrelated Water Review Board and has taken effect, (d)
the Chief Water Officer department has completed a reevaluation pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 46-713 and has determined that the affected river
basin, subbasin, or reach is not fully appropriated or overappropriated, or (e)
the stay expires pursuant to this subsection. Such stay may be imposed
initially for not more than three years following the Chief Water Officer's
department's designation of the river basin, subbasin, or reach as
overappropriated or the Chief Water Officer's department's final determination
that a river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated and may be
extended thereafter on an annual basis by agreement of the Chief Water Officer
department and the affected natural resources district for not more than two
additional years if necessary to allow the development, adoption, and
implementation of an integrated management plan pursuant to sections 46-715 to
46-719.
(12)(a) For purposes of this subsection, (i) a status change occurs when a
preliminary or final determination that a river basin, subbasin, or reach is
fully appropriated is reversed by the Chief Water Officer department or by
judicial determination and such river basin, subbasin, or reach is determined
not to be fully appropriated and (ii) the hydrologically connected area means
the geographic area within which the Chief Water Officer department considers
surface water and ground water in such river basin, subbasin, or reach to be
hydrologically connected.
(b) If a status change occurs, any stays previously in force by the Chief
Water Officer department or affected natural resources districts shall remain
in force until the stays imposed under this subsection are in place and the
Chief Water Officer department shall place an immediate stay on the issuance of
any new natural-flow, storage, or storage-use appropriations in the river
basin, subbasin, or reach. The Chief Water Officer department shall also
provide prompt notice of the status change in accordance with subsection (1) of
this section. Immediately upon receipt of the notice by the affected natural
resources district, there shall be stays imposed as set forth in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section, subject to the exceptions set forth in subsection
(3) of this section. The stays imposed pursuant to this subsection shall remain
in effect within each affected natural resources district until such district
adopts rules and regulations in accordance with subdivision (c), (d), or (e) of
this subsection.
(c) Upon receipt of notice of a status change, each affected natural
resources district shall adopt rules and regulations within one hundred twenty
days after receipt of such notice for the prioritization and granting of water
well permits within the hydrologically connected area for the four-year period
following the status change. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
supersede the authority provided to natural resources districts under
subsection (2) of section 46-707 and subdivisions (1)(f) and (1)(m) of section
46-739.
(d) The rules and regulations adopted by each affected natural resources
district in accordance with subdivision (c) of this subsection shall (i) allow
a limited number of total new ground water irrigated acres annually, (ii) be
created with the purpose of maintaining the status of not fully appropriated
based on the most recent basin determination, (iii) be for a term of not less
than four years, and (iv) limit the number of new permits so that total new
ground water irrigated acres do not exceed the number set in the rules and
regulations. The Chief Water Officer department shall approve the proposed new
number of ground water irrigated acres within sixty days after approval by the
natural resources district if such district meets the conditions set forth in
subdivision (d)(ii) of this subsection, based on the most recent basin
determination.
(e) If the proposed new number of acres is not approved by the Chief Water
Officer department within the applicable time period as provided in subdivision
(d) of this subsection, the affected natural resources districts shall adopt
rules and regulations that allow water well permits to be issued that will
result in no more than two thousand five hundred irrigated acres or that will
result in an increase of not more than twenty percent of all historically
irrigated acres within the hydrologically connected area of each natural
resources district within the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach,
whichever is less, for each calendar year of the four-year period following the
date of the determination described in this subsection. Each affected natural
resources district may, after the initial four-year period has expired,
-80-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
annually determine whether water well permit limitations should continue and
may enforce such limitations.
(f) During the four-year period following the status change, the Chief
Water Officer department shall ensure that any new appropriation granted will
not cause the basin, subbasin, or reach to be fully appropriated based on the
most recent basin determination. The Chief Water Officer department, pursuant
to its rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Nebraska Ground
Water Management and Protection Act, shall not issue new natural flow surface
water appropriations for irrigation, within the river basin, subbasin, or reach
affected by the status change, that will result in a net increase of more than
eight hundred thirty-four irrigated acres in each natural resources district
during each calendar year of the four-year period following the date of the
determination described in this subsection.
Sec. 214. Section 46-715, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-715 (1)(a) Whenever the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural
Resources has designated a river basin, subbasin, or reach as overappropriated
or has made a final determination that a river basin, subbasin, or reach is
fully appropriated, the natural resources districts encompassing such river
basin, subbasin, or reach and the Chief Water Officer department shall jointly
develop an integrated management plan for such river basin, subbasin, or reach.
The plan shall be completed, adopted, and take effect within three years after
such designation or final determination unless the Chief Water Officer
department and the natural resources districts jointly agree to an extension of
not more than two additional years.
(b) A natural resources district encompassing a river basin, subbasin, or
reach that has not been designated as overappropriated or has not been finally
determined to be fully appropriated may, jointly with the Chief Water Officer
department, develop an integrated management plan for such river basin,
subbasin, or reach located within the district. The district shall notify the
Chief Water Officer department of its intention to develop an integrated
management plan which shall be developed and adopted according to sections
46-715 to 46-717 and subsections (1) and (2) of section 46-718. The objective
of an integrated management plan under this subdivision is to manage such river
basin, subbasin, or reach to achieve and sustain a balance between water uses
and water supplies for the long term. If a district develops an integrated
management plan under this subdivision and the Chief Water Officer department
subsequently determines the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach to be
fully appropriated, the Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural
resources district may amend the integrated management plan.
(2) In developing an integrated management plan, the effects of existing
and potential new water uses on existing surface water appropriators and ground
water users shall be considered. An integrated management plan shall include
the following: (a) Clear goals and objectives with a purpose of sustaining a
balance between water uses and water supplies so that the economic viability,
social and environmental health, safety, and welfare of the river basin,
subbasin, or reach can be achieved and maintained for both the near term and
the long term; (b) a map clearly delineating the geographic area subject to the
integrated management plan; (c) one or more of the ground water controls
authorized for adoption by natural resources districts pursuant to section
46-739; (d) one or more of the surface water controls authorized for adoption
by the Chief Water Officer department pursuant to section 46-716; and (e) a
plan to gather and evaluate data, information, and methodologies that could be
used to implement sections 46-715 to 46-717, increase understanding of the
surface water and hydrologically connected ground water system, and test the
validity of the conclusions and information upon which the integrated
management plan is based. The plan may also provide for utilization of any
applicable incentive programs authorized by law. Nothing in the integrated
management plan for a fully appropriated river basin, subbasin, or reach shall
require a natural resources district to regulate ground water uses in place at
the time of the Chief Water Officer's department's preliminary determination
that the river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated, unless such
regulation is necessary to carry out the goals and objectives of a basin-wide
plan pursuant to section 46-755, but a natural resources district may
voluntarily adopt such regulations. The applicable natural resources district
may decide to include all water users within the district boundary in an
integrated management plan.
(3) In order to provide a process for economic development opportunities
and economic sustainability within a river basin, subbasin, or reach, the
integrated management plan shall include clear and transparent procedures to
track depletions and gains to streamflows resulting from new, retired, or other
changes to uses within the river basin, subbasin, or reach. The procedures
shall:
(a) Utilize generally accepted methodologies based on the best available
information, data, and science;
(b) Include a generally accepted methodology to be utilized to estimate
depletions and gains to streamflows, which methodology includes location,
amount, and time regarding gains to streamflows as offsets to new uses;
(c) Identify means to be utilized so that new uses will not have more than
a de minimis effect upon existing surface water users or ground water users;
(d) Identify procedures the natural resources district and the Chief Water
Officer department will use to report, consult, and otherwise share information
on new uses, changes in uses, or other activities affecting water use in the
-81-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
river basin, subbasin, or reach;
(e) Identify, to the extent feasible, potential water available to
mitigate new uses, including, but not limited to, water rights leases,
interference agreements, augmentation projects, conjunctive use management, and
use retirement;
(f) Develop, to the extent feasible, an outline of plans after
consultation with and an opportunity to provide input from irrigation
districts, public power and irrigation districts, reclamation districts,
municipalities, other political subdivisions, and other water users to make
water available for offset to enhance and encourage economic development
opportunities and economic sustainability in the river basin, subbasin, or
reach; and
(g) Clearly identify procedures that applicants for new uses shall take to
apply for approval of a new water use and corresponding offset.
Nothing in this subsection shall require revision or amendment of an
integrated management plan approved on or before August 30, 2009.
(4) The ground water and surface water controls proposed for adoption in
the integrated management plan pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall, when considered together and with any applicable incentive programs, (a)
be consistent with the goals and objectives of the plan, (b) be sufficient to
ensure that the state will remain in compliance with applicable state and
federal laws and with any applicable interstate water compact or decree or
other formal state contract or agreement pertaining to surface water or ground
water use or supplies, and (c) protect the ground water users whose water wells
are dependent on recharge from the river or stream involved and the surface
water appropriators on such river or stream from streamflow depletion caused by
surface water uses and ground water uses begun, in the case of a river basin,
subbasin, or reach designated as overappropriated or preliminarily determined
to be fully appropriated in accordance with section 46-713, after the date of
such designation or preliminary determination.
(5)(a) In any river basin, subbasin, or reach that is designated as
overappropriated, when the designated area lies within two or more natural
resources districts, the Chief Water Officer department and the affected
natural resources districts shall jointly develop a basin-wide plan for the
area designated as overappropriated. Such plan shall be developed using the
consultation and collaboration process described in subdivision (b) of this
subsection, shall be developed concurrently with the development of the
integrated management plan required pursuant to subsections (1) through (4) of
this section, and shall be designed to achieve, in the incremental manner
described in subdivision (d) of this subsection, the goals and objectives
described in subsection (2) of this section. The basin-wide plan shall be
adopted after hearings by the Chief Water Officer department and the affected
natural resources districts.
(b) In any river basin, subbasin, or reach designated as overappropriated
and subject to this subsection, the Chief Water Officer department and each
natural resources district encompassing such river basin, subbasin, or reach
shall jointly develop an integrated management plan for such river basin,
subbasin, or reach pursuant to subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
Each integrated management plan for a river basin, subbasin, or reach subject
to this subsection shall be consistent with any basin-wide plan developed
pursuant to subdivision (a) of this subsection. Such integrated management plan
shall be developed after consultation and collaboration with irrigation
districts, reclamation districts, public power and irrigation districts, mutual
irrigation companies, canal companies, and municipalities that rely on water
from within the affected area and that, after being notified of the
commencement of the plan development process, indicate in writing their desire
to participate in such process. In addition, the Chief Water Officer department
or the affected natural resources districts may include designated
representatives of other stakeholders. If agreement is reached by all parties
involved in such consultation and collaboration process, the Chief Water
Officer department and each natural resources district shall adopt the agreed-
upon integrated management plan. If agreement cannot be reached by all parties
involved, the integrated management plan shall be developed and adopted by the
Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural resources district
pursuant to sections 46-715 to 46-718 or by the Interrelated Water Review Board
pursuant to section 46-719.
(c) Any integrated management plan developed under this subsection shall
identify the overall difference between the current and fully appropriated
levels of development. Such determination shall take into account cyclical
supply, including drought, identify the portion of the overall difference
between the current and fully appropriated levels of development that is due to
conservation measures, and identify the portions of the overall difference
between the current and fully appropriated levels of development that are due
to water use initiated prior to July 1, 1997, and to water use initiated on or
after such date.
(d) Any integrated management plan developed under this subsection shall
adopt an incremental approach to achieve the goals and objectives identified
under subdivision (2)(a) of this section using the following steps:
(i) The first incremental goals shall be to address the impact of
streamflow depletions to (A) surface water appropriations and (B) water wells
constructed in aquifers dependent upon recharge from streamflow, to the extent
those depletions are due to water use initiated after July 1, 1997, and, unless
an interstate cooperative agreement for such river basin, subbasin, or reach is
-82-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
no longer in effect, to prevent streamflow depletions that would cause
noncompliance by Nebraska with such interstate cooperative agreement. During
the first increment, the Chief Water Officer department and the affected
natural resources districts shall also pursue voluntary efforts, subject to the
availability of funds, to offset any increase in streamflow depletive effects
that occur after July 1, 1997, but are caused by ground water uses initiated
prior to such date. The Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural
resources districts may also use other appropriate and authorized measures for
such purpose;
(ii) The Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural resources
districts may amend an integrated management plan subject to this subsection
(5) as necessary based on an annual review of the progress being made toward
achieving the goals for that increment;
(iii) During the ten years following adoption of an integrated management
plan developed under this subsection (5) or during the ten years after the
adoption of any subsequent increment of the integrated management plan pursuant
to subdivision (d)(iv) of this subsection, the Chief Water Officer department
and the affected natural resources district shall conduct a technical analysis
of the actions taken in such increment to determine the progress towards
meeting the goals and objectives adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section. The analysis shall include an examination of (A) available supplies
and changes in long-term availability, (B) the effects of conservation
practices and natural causes, including, but not limited to, drought, and (C)
the effects of the plan on reducing the overall difference between the current
and fully appropriated levels of development identified in subdivision (5)(c)
of this section. The analysis shall determine whether a subsequent increment is
necessary in the integrated management plan to meet the goals and objectives
adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and reduce the overall
difference between the current and fully appropriated levels of development
identified in subdivision (5)(c) of this section;
(iv) Based on the determination made in subdivision (d)(iii) of this
subsection, the Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural
resources districts, utilizing the consultative and collaborative process
described in subdivision (b) of this subsection, shall if necessary identify
goals for a subsequent increment of the integrated management plan. Subsequent
increments shall be completed, adopted, and take effect not more than ten years
after adoption of the previous increment; and
(v) If necessary, the steps described in subdivisions (d)(ii) through (iv)
of this subsection shall be repeated until the Chief Water Officer department
and the affected natural resources districts agree that the goals and
objectives identified pursuant to subsection (2) of this section have been met
and the overall difference between the current and fully appropriated levels of
development identified in subdivision (5)(c) of this section has been addressed
so that the river basin, subbasin, or reach has returned to a fully
appropriated condition.
(6) In any river basin, subbasin, or reach that is designated as fully
appropriated or overappropriated and whenever necessary to ensure that the
state is in compliance with an interstate compact or decree or a formal state
contract or agreement, the Chief Water Officer department, in consultation with
the affected districts, shall forecast on an annual basis the maximum amount of
water that may be available from streamflow for beneficial use in the short
term and long term in order to comply with the requirement of subdivision (4)
(b) of this section. This forecast shall be made by January 1, 2008, and each
January 1 thereafter.
Sec. 215. Section 46-716, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-716 (1) The surface water controls that may be included in an
integrated management plan and may be adopted by the Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources are: (a) Increased monitoring and enforcement
of surface water diversion rates and amounts diverted annually; (b) the
prohibition or limitation of additional surface water appropriations; (c)
requirements for surface water appropriators to apply or utilize reasonable
conservation measures consistent with good husbandry and other requirements of
section 46-231 and consistent with reasonable reliance by other surface water
or ground water users on return flows or on seepage to the aquifer; and (d)
other reasonable restrictions on surface water use which are consistent with
the intent of section 46-715 and the requirements of section 46-231.
(2) If during the development of the integrated management plan the Chief
Water Officer department determines that surface water appropriators should be
required to apply or utilize conservation measures or that other reasonable
restrictions on surface water use need to be imposed, the Chief Water Officer's
department's portion of the integrated management plan shall allow the affected
surface water appropriators and surface water project sponsors a reasonable
amount of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty days unless extended by the
Chief Water Officer department, to identify the conservation measures to be
applied or utilized, to develop a schedule for such application and
utilization, and to comment on any other proposed restrictions.
Sec. 216. Section 46-717, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-717 (1) In developing an integrated management plan, the Chief Water
Officer Department of Natural Resources and the affected natural resources
districts shall utilize the best scientific data and other information
available and shall review and consider any rules and regulations in effect in
-83-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
any existing ground water management area that encompasses all or part of the
geographic area to be encompassed by the plan. Consideration shall be given to
the applicable scientific data and other information relied upon by the Chief
Water Officer department in preparing the annual report required by section
46-713 and to other types of data and information that may be deemed
appropriate by the Chief Water Officer department. The Chief Water Officer
department, after seeking input from the affected natural resources districts,
shall specify by rule and regulation the types of scientific data and other
information that will be considered in developing an integrated management
plan. The natural resources districts shall adopt similar rules and regulations
specifying the types of scientific data and other information necessary for
purposes of this section. Existing research, data, studies, or any other
relevant information which has been compiled by or is in possession of other
state or federal agencies, other natural resources districts, and other
political subdivisions within the State of Nebraska shall be utilized. State
agencies and political subdivisions shall furnish information or data upon
request of the Chief Water Officer department or any affected natural resources
district. Neither the Chief Water Officer department nor the natural resources
districts shall be required to conduct new research or to develop new computer
models to prepare an integrated management plan, but such new research may be
conducted or new computer models developed within the limits of available
funding if the additional information is desired by the Chief Water Officer
department or the affected natural resources districts.
(2) During preparation of an integrated management plan for a fully
appropriated river basin, subbasin, or reach or of an integrated management
plan under subdivision (1)(b) of section 46-715, the Chief Water Officer
department and the affected natural resources districts shall consult with any
irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and irrigation
district, mutual irrigation company, canal company, or municipality that relies
on water from the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach and with other water
users and stakeholders as deemed appropriate by the Chief Water Officer
department or by the affected natural resources districts. They shall also
actively solicit public comments and opinions through public meetings and other
means.
Sec. 217. Section 46-718, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-718 (1) If the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources and
the affected natural resources districts preparing an integrated management
plan reach agreement on (a) the proposed goals and objectives of the plan for
the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach, (b) the proposed geographic area
to be subject to controls, and (c) the surface water and ground water controls
and any incentive programs that are proposed for adoption and implementation in
the river basin, subbasin, or reach, they shall schedule one or more public
hearings to take testimony on the proposed integrated management plan and the
proposed controls. Such hearings shall be held within forty-five days after
reaching agreement and within or in reasonable proximity to the area to be
affected by implementation of the integrated management plan. Notice of such
hearings shall be published as provided in section 46-743. The costs of
publishing the notice shall be shared between the Chief Water Officer
department and the affected natural resources districts. All interested persons
may appear at the hearings and present testimony or provide other evidence
relevant to the issues being considered.
(2) Within sixty days after the final hearing under this section, the
Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural resources districts
shall jointly decide whether to implement the plan proposed, with or without
modifications, and whether to adopt and implement the surface water and ground
water controls and incentive programs proposed in the plan. If the Chief Water
Officer department and the natural resources districts agree to implement the
plan and to adopt and implement the proposed controls, the natural resources
districts shall by order designate a ground water management area for
integrated management or, if the geographic area subject to the integrated
management plan is already in a ground water management area, the order shall
designate an integrated management subarea for that area. The order shall
include a geographic and stratigraphic definition of the ground water
management area or integrated management subarea and shall adopt the controls
in the integrated management plan that are authorized for adoption by the
natural resources district pursuant to section 46-739. The Chief Water Officer
department shall by order adopt the controls in the integrated management plan
that are authorized for adoption by the Chief Water Officer department pursuant
to section 46-716. Neither the controls adopted by the district nor those
adopted by the Chief Water Officer department shall include controls
substantially different from those set forth in the notice of hearing. The area
designated as a ground water management area or an integrated management
subarea by the natural resources district shall not include any area that was
not identified in the notice of the hearing as within the area proposed to be
subject to the controls in the plan. The Chief Water Officer department and the
natural resources district shall each cause a copy of their respective orders
its order to be published in the manner provided in section 46-744.
(3) If at any time during the development of a basin-wide plan or an
integrated management plan either the Chief Water Officer department or the
affected natural resources districts conclude that the parties will be unable
to reach a timely agreement on the basin-wide plan or on (a) the goals and
objectives of the integrated management plan for the affected river basin,
-84-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
subbasin, or reach, (b) the geographic area to be subject to controls, or (c)
the surface water or ground water controls or any incentive programs to be
proposed for adoption and implementation in the affected river basin, subbasin,
or reach, the Governor shall be notified and the dispute shall be submitted to
the Interrelated Water Review Board as provided in subsection (2) of section
46-719.
Sec. 218. Section 46-719, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-719 (1)(a) The Interrelated Water Review Board is created for the
purposes stated in subsections (2) through (5) of this section. The board shall
consist of five members. The board, when appointed and convened, shall continue
in existence only until it has resolved a dispute referred to it pursuant to
such subsections. The Governor shall appoint and convene the board within
forty-five days of being notified of the need to resolve a dispute. The board
shall be chaired by the Governor or his or her designee, which designee shall
be knowledgeable concerning surface water and ground water issues. The Governor
shall appoint one additional member of his or her choosing and shall appoint
the other three members of the board from a list of no fewer than six nominees
provided by the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission within twenty days after
request by the Governor for a list of nominees.
(b) Not more than two members of the board shall reside in the geographic
area involved in the dispute. A person is not eligible for membership on the
board if the decisions to be made by the board would or could cause financial
benefit or detriment to the person, a member of his or her immediate family, or
a business with which the person is associated, unless such benefit or
detriment is indistinguishable from the effects of such action on the public
generally or a broad segment of the public. The board shall be subject to the
Open Meetings Act.
(c) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, action may be
taken by a vote of three of the board's five members. For purposes of
subsections (4) and (5) of this section, action may be taken only by a vote of
at least four of the board's five members.
(2)(a) If the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources and the
affected natural resources districts cannot resolve disputes over the content
of a basin-wide plan or an integrated management plan by utilizing the process
described in sections 46-715 to 46-718, the Governor shall be notified and the
dispute submitted to the Interrelated Water Review Board. When the board has
been appointed and convened to resolve disputes over a basin-wide plan, the
Chief Water Officer department and each affected district shall present their
proposed basin-wide plans to the board. When the board has been convened to
resolve disputes over an integrated management plan, the Chief Water Officer
department and each affected natural resources district shall present their (i)
proposed goals and objectives for the integrated management plan, (ii) proposed
geographic area to be subject to controls, and (iii) proposed surface water and
ground water controls and any proposed incentive program for adoption and
implementation in the river basin, subbasin, or reach involved. The Chief Water
Officer department and each affected natural resources district shall also be
given adequate opportunity to comment on the proposals made by the other
parties to the dispute.
(b) When the Interrelated Water Review Board concludes that the issues in
dispute have been fully presented and commented upon by the parties to the
dispute, which conclusion shall be made not more than forty-five days after the
board is convened, the board shall select the proposals or portions of
proposals that the board will consider for adoption and shall schedule one or
more public hearings to take testimony on the selected proposals. The hearings
shall be held within forty-five days after the board's selection of proposals
to consider for adoption and shall be within or in reasonable proximity to the
area that would be affected by implementation of any of the proposals to be
considered at the hearings. Notice of the hearings shall be published as
provided in section 46-743. The cost of publishing the notice shall be shared
by the Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural resources
districts. All interested persons may appear at the hearings and present
testimony or provide other evidence relevant to the issues being considered.
(c) Within forty-five days after the final hearing pursuant to subdivision
(b) of this subsection, the Interrelated Water Review Board shall by order, as
applicable, adopt a basin-wide plan or an integrated management plan for the
affected river basin, subbasin, or reach and, in the case of an integrated
management plan, shall designate a ground water management area for integrated
management or an integrated management subarea for such river basin, subbasin,
or reach. An integrated management plan shall be consistent with subsection (2)
of section 46-715, and the surface water and ground water controls and any
applicable incentive programs adopted as part of that plan shall be consistent
with subsection (4) of section 46-715. The controls adopted by the board shall
not be substantially different from those described in the notice of hearing.
The area designated as a ground water management area or an integrated
management subarea shall not include any area that was not identified in the
notice of the hearing as within the area proposed to be subject to the controls
in the plan.
(d) The order adopted under this subsection shall be published in the
manner prescribed in section 46-744.
(e) Surface water controls adopted by the Interrelated Water Review Board
shall be implemented and enforced by the Chief Water Officer department. Ground
water controls adopted by the Interrelated Water Review Board shall be
-85-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
implemented and enforced by the affected natural resources districts.
(3) Whether an integrated management plan is adopted pursuant to section
46-718 or by the Interrelated Water Review Board pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the Chief Water Officer department or a natural resources
district responsible in part for implementation and enforcement of an
integrated management plan may propose modification of the goals or objectives
of that plan, of the area subject to the plan, or of the surface water
controls, ground water controls, or incentive programs adopted to implement the
plan. The Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural resources
districts shall utilize the procedures in sections 46-715 to 46-718 in an
attempt to reach agreement on and to adopt and implement proposed
modifications. If agreement on such modifications cannot be achieved utilizing
those procedures, either the Chief Water Officer department or an affected
natural resources district may notify the Governor of the dispute. The
Interrelated Water Review Board shall be appointed and convened in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section to resolve the dispute and, if applicable,
to adopt any modifications utilizing the procedures in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural resources
districts may also raise objections concerning the implementation or
enforcement of previously adopted surface water or ground water controls. The
Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural resources districts
shall utilize the procedures in sections 46-715 to 46-718 in an attempt to
reach agreement on such implementation or enforcement issues. If agreement on
such issues cannot be achieved utilizing such procedures, either the Chief
Water Officer department or an affected natural resources district may notify
the Governor of the dispute. The Interrelated Water Review Board shall be
appointed and convened in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. After
permitting each party to fully express the its reasons for the its position
taken by each party on the disputed issues, the board may either take no action
or conclude (a) that one or more parties needs to modify the party's its
approach to implementation or enforcement and direct that such modifications
take place or (b) that one or more parties either has not made a good faith
effort to implement or enforce the portion of the plan or controls for which
the party it is responsible or is unable to fully implement and enforce such
portion and that such party's jurisdiction with respect to implementation and
enforcement of the plan and controls shall be terminated and reassigned to one
or more of the other parties responsible for implementation and enforcement. A
decision by the Interrelated Water Review Board to terminate and reassign
jurisdiction of any portion of the plan or controls shall take effect
immediately upon that decision. Notice of such reassignment shall be published
at least once in one or more newspapers as necessary to provide general
circulation in the area affected by such reassignment.
(5) The board may be reconvened in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section at a later date upon request to the Governor by the party for which
jurisdiction for implementation and enforcement was terminated if such party
desires to have the party's its jurisdiction reinstated, but no such request
shall be honored until at least one year after the termination and not more
than once per year thereafter. The board may reinstate jurisdiction to that
party only upon a clear showing by such party that the party it is willing and
able to fully implement and enforce the plan and any applicable controls.
Notice that a party's jurisdiction has been reinstated shall be provided in the
same manner that notice of the earlier termination was given.
Sec. 219. Section 46-720, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-720 (1) The Legislature finds that, prior to July 16, 2004, actions
were taken by the Department of Natural Resources as it existed prior to July
1, 2025, and by one or more natural resources districts pursuant to section
46-656.28, as such section existed immediately prior to July 16, 2004 such
date, for the purpose of addressing circumstances that are, after July 16, 2004
such date, to be addressed in accordance with sections 46-713 to 46-719. It is
the intent of the Legislature that actions taken pursuant to section 46-656.28,
as such section existed immediately prior to July 16, 2004, should not be
negated and that transition from the authorities and responsibilities granted
by such section to those granted by sections 46-713 to 46-719 should occur in
as efficient a manner as possible. Such transition shall be therefor governed
by subsections (2) through (5) of this section, and all references in such
subsections to section 46-656.28 shall be construed to mean section 46-656.28
as such section existed immediately prior to July 16, 2004.
(2) If, prior to July 16, 2004, (a) a natural resources district requested
pursuant to subsection (1) of section 46-656.28 that affected appropriators,
affected surface water project sponsors, and the department consult and that
studies and a hearing be held but (b) the Director of Natural Resources, as
such position existed, had has not made a preliminary determination relative to
that request pursuant to subsection (2) of section 46-656.28, no further action
on the district's request shall be required of the department. If under the
same circumstances a temporary suspension in the drilling of certain water
wells has been imposed by the district pursuant to subsection (16) of section
46-656.28 and remains in effect immediately prior to July 16, 2004, such
temporary suspension shall remain in effect for thirty days after the
department issues its first annual report under section 46-713, except that (i)
such temporary suspension shall not apply to water wells for which a permit has
been obtained pursuant to the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water
-86-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Transfers Permit Act and (ii) to the extent any such temporary suspension is in
effect for all or part of a hydrologically connected area for a river basin,
subbasin, or reach designated as overappropriated by the department, such
temporary suspension shall remain in effect only until it is superseded by the
stays imposed pursuant to subsections (8) and (9) of section 46-714. To the
extent that any such temporary suspension applies to a geographic area
preliminarily considered by the department to have ground water hydrologically
connected to the surface water of a fully appropriated river basin, subbasin,
or reach, such temporary suspension shall be superseded by the stays imposed
pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of section 46-714.
(3)(a) If prior to July 16, 2004, (i) the director has made a preliminary
determination pursuant to subsection (2) of section 46-656.28 that there is
reason to believe that the use of hydrologically connected ground water and
surface water in a specific geographic area is contributing to or is in the
reasonably foreseeable future likely to contribute to any conflict, dispute, or
difficulty listed in such subsection, (ii) the director has not made a
determination pursuant to subsection (4) of section 46-656.28 that a joint
action plan should not be prepared, and (iii) preparation of a joint action
plan pursuant to subsections (5) through (9) of such section has not been
completed, the geographic area involved shall become subject to sections 46-713
to 46-719 on July 16, 2004, and the department need not evaluate such
geographic area in its first annual report issued pursuant to section 46-713.
(b) For purposes of this subsection and section 46-714 and except as
otherwise provided in this section, (i) July 16, 2004, shall result in the
imposition in any geographic area subject to this subsection of the stays
required by subsections (1) and (2) of section 46-714, (ii) such stays shall be
imposed in the manner required by such section, and (iii) July 16, 2004, shall
be treated as if it were the date of a departmental preliminary determination
pursuant to section 46-713 that such area is a geographic area within which
ground water and surface water of a fully appropriated river basin, subbasin,
or reach are hydrologically connected. Notwithstanding the other provisions of
this subsection, if a temporary suspension in the drilling of certain new water
wells has previously been imposed by the affected natural resources district,
(A) the stays on construction of new water wells and on the increase in ground
water irrigated acres shall be limited in geographic extent to only that part
of the affected area within which the temporary suspension was in effect unless
the director determines that inclusion of additional area is necessary because
ground water and surface water are hydrologically connected in such additional
area and (B) the stays on construction of certain new water wells shall not
apply to a water well constructed in accordance with the terms of a water well
construction permit approved by the district prior to July 16, 2004, unless
such well was subject to the district's temporary suspension. If, prior to July
16, 2004, the director has held a hearing on a report issued pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 46-656.28 but has not yet determined whether a joint
action plan should be prepared, no departmental hearing shall be required
pursuant to subsection (4) of section 46-714 before a final determination is
made about whether the river basin, subbasin, or reach involved is fully
appropriated. If, prior to July 16, 2004, the director has determined pursuant
to subsection (4) of section 46-656.28 that a joint action plan should be
prepared, such determination shall have the same effect as a final departmental
determination pursuant to subsection (5) of section 46-714 that the affected
river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated and no separate
determination to that effect shall be required. If, after July 16, 2004, the
department determines that all or part of the area subject to this subsection
is in an overappropriated river basin, subbasin, or reach, that portion of the
area shall thereafter be subject to the provisions of the Nebraska Ground Water
Management and Protection Act applicable to an overappropriated river basin,
subbasin, or reach and stays that have previously taken effect in accordance
with this subsection shall continue in effect as stays for an overappropriated
river basin, subbasin, or reach without additional action or publication of
notice by the department. Any temporary suspension in the drilling of certain
water wells that has been imposed in the geographic area involved by a natural
resources district pursuant to subsection (16) of section 46-656.28 prior to
July 16, 2004, shall remain in effect until superseded by the stays imposed
pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of section 46-714.
(4) If, prior to July 16, 2004, preparation of a joint action plan has
been completed pursuant to subsections (5) through (9) of section 46-656.28 but
the plan has not yet been adopted pursuant to subsection (11) of such section,
the department need not evaluate the affected geographic area in its first
annual report issued pursuant to section 46-713. The department and the
affected natural resources district shall review the completed joint action
plan for its compliance with sections 46-715 to 46-717. If the joint action
plan is determined to be in compliance with sections 46-715 to 46-717 or if
agreement is reached on the revisions necessary to bring it into such
compliance, the department and the district shall adopt the plan and implement
the controls as provided in section 46-718. If the joint action plan is
determined not to be in compliance with sections 46-715 to 46-717 and agreement
on the proposed plan or the proposed controls cannot be reached pursuant to
section 46-718, section 46-719 shall apply. Except to the extent that any
portion of the affected area is designated as all or part of an
overappropriated river basin, subbasin, or reach, any temporary suspension in
the drilling of certain water wells imposed in the affected geographic area by
a natural resources district pursuant to subsection (16) of section 46-656.28
-87-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
shall remain in effect until (a) the department and the affected district have
jointly decided to implement the plan, with or without modifications, and
controls have been adopted and taken effect or (b) the Interrelated Water
Review Board, pursuant to section 46-719, has adopted an integrated management
plan for the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach and the controls adopted
by the board have taken effect. To the extent that any portion of the affected
area is designated as all or part of an overappropriated river basin, subbasin,
or reach, any temporary suspension in the drilling of water wells shall be
superseded by the stays imposed pursuant to subsections (8) and (9) of section
46-714.
(5) If, before July 16, 2004, a joint action plan has been adopted and
implemented pursuant to subsections (10) through (12) of section 46-656.28 and
is in effect immediately prior to such date, the department need not evaluate
the geographic area subject to the plan in the department's first annual report
issued pursuant to section 46-713. For purposes of the Nebraska Ground Water
Management and Protection Act, (a) the plan adopted shall be considered an
integrated management plan adopted pursuant to section 46-718, (b) the
management area designated shall be considered an integrated management area or
subarea designated pursuant to section 46-718, and (c) the controls adopted
shall be considered controls adopted pursuant to section 46-718 and shall
remain in effect until amended or repealed pursuant to section 46-718 or
46-719.
Sec. 220. Section 46-721, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-721 Each state agency and political subdivision shall promptly report
to the department Department of Environment and Energy any information which
indicates that contamination is occurring.
Sec. 221. Section 46-722, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-722 If, as a result of information provided pursuant to section 46-721
or studies conducted by or otherwise available to the department Department of
Environment and Energy and following preliminary investigation, the Director of
Water, Energy, and Environment Director of Environment and Energy makes a
preliminary determination (1) that there is reason to believe that
contamination of ground water is occurring or likely to occur in an area of the
state in the reasonably foreseeable future and (2) that the natural resources
district or districts in which the area is located have not designated a
management area or have not implemented adequate controls to prevent such
contamination from occurring, the department shall, in cooperation with any
appropriate state agency and district, conduct a study to determine the source
or sources of the contamination and the area affected by such contamination and
shall issue a written report within one year of the initiation of the study.
During the study, the department shall consider the relevant water quality
portions of the management plan developed by each district pursuant to sections
46-709 to 46-711, whether the district has designated a management area
encompassing the area studied, and whether the district has adopted any
controls for the area.
Sec. 222. Section 46-723, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-723 If the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Director of
Environment and Energy determines from the study conducted pursuant to section
46-722 that one or more sources of contamination are point sources, he or she
shall expeditiously use the procedures authorized in the Environmental
Protection Act to stabilize or reduce the level and prevent the increase or
spread of such contamination.
Sec. 223. Section 46-724, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-724 If the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Director of
Environment and Energy determines from the study conducted pursuant to section
46-722 that one or more sources of contamination are not point sources and if a
management area, a purpose of which is protection of water quality, has been
established which includes the affected area, the director Director of
Environment and Energy shall consider whether to require the district which
established the management area to adopt an action plan as provided in sections
46-725 to 46-729.
If the director Director of Environment and Energy determines that one or
more of the sources are not point sources and if such a management area has not
been established or does not include all the affected area, he or she shall,
within thirty days after completion of the report required by section 46-722,
consult with the district within whose boundaries the area affected by such
contamination is located and fix a time and place for a public hearing to
consider the report, hear any other evidence, and secure testimony on whether a
management area should be designated or whether an existing area should be
modified. The hearing shall be held within one hundred twenty days after
completion of the report. Notice of the hearing shall be given as provided in
section 46-743, and the hearing shall be conducted in accordance with such
section.
At the hearing, all interested persons shall be allowed to appear and
present testimony. The Conservation and Survey Division of the University of
Nebraska, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of
Natural Resources, and the appropriate district may offer as evidence any
information in their possession which they deem relevant to the purpose of the
hearing. After the hearing and after any studies or investigations conducted by
-88-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
or on behalf of the director Director of Environment and Energy as he or she
deems necessary, the director shall determine whether a management area shall
be designated.
Sec. 224. Section 46-725, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-725 (1) When determining whether to designate or modify the boundaries
of a management area or to require a district which has established a
management area, a purpose of which is protection of water quality, to adopt an
action plan for the affected area, the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Director of Environment and Energy shall consider:
(a) Whether contamination of ground water has occurred or is likely to
occur in the reasonably foreseeable future;
(b) Whether ground water users, including, but not limited to, domestic,
municipal, industrial, and agricultural users, are experiencing or will
experience within the foreseeable future substantial economic hardships as a
direct result of current or reasonably anticipated activities which cause or
contribute to contamination of ground water;
(c) Whether methods are available to stabilize or reduce the level of
contamination;
(d) Whether, if a management area has been established which includes the
affected area, the controls adopted by the district pursuant to section 46-739
as administered and enforced by the district are sufficient to address the
ground water quality issues in the management area; and
(e) Administrative factors directly affecting the ability to implement and
carry out regulatory activities.
(2) If the director Director of Environment and Energy determines that no
such area should be established, he or she shall issue an order declaring that
no management area shall be designated.
(3) If the director Director of Environment and Energy determines that a
management area shall be established, that the boundaries of an existing
management area shall be modified, or that the district shall be required to
adopt an action plan, he or she shall consult with relevant state agencies and
with the district or districts affected and determine the boundaries of the
area, taking into account the effect on political subdivisions and the
socioeconomic and administrative factors directly affecting the ability to
implement and carry out local ground water management, control, and protection.
The report by the director Director of Environment and Energy shall include the
specific reasons for the creation of the management area or the requirement of
such an action plan and a full disclosure of the possible causes.
(4) When the boundaries of an area have been determined or modified, the
director Director of Environment and Energy shall issue an order designating
the area as a management area, specifying the modified boundaries of the
management area, or requiring such an action plan. Such an order shall include
a geographic and stratigraphic definition of the area. Such order shall be
published in the manner provided in section 46-744.
Sec. 225. Section 46-726, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-726 (1) Within one hundred eighty days after the designation of a
management area or the requiring of an action plan for a management area, a
purpose of which is protection of water quality, the district or districts
within whose boundaries the area is located shall prepare an action plan
designed to stabilize or reduce the level and prevent the increase or spread of
ground water contamination. Whenever a management area or the affected area of
such a management area encompasses portions of two or more districts, the
responsibilities and authorities delegated in this section shall be exercised
jointly and uniformly by agreement of the respective boards of all districts so
affected.
(2) Within thirty days after an action plan has been prepared, a public
hearing on such plan shall be held by the district. Notice of the hearing shall
be given as provided in section 46-743, and the hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with such section.
(3) Within thirty days after the hearing, the district shall adopt and
submit an action plan to the department Department of Environment and Energy.
Notice of the district's order adopting an action plan shall be published as
required by section 46-744.
Sec. 226. Section 46-728, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-728 (1) In adopting or amending an action plan authorized by subsection
(2) of this section, the district's considerations shall include, but not be
limited to, whether it reasonably appears that such action will mitigate or
eliminate the condition which led to designation of the management area or the
requirement of an action plan for a management area or will improve the
administration of the area.
(2) The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Director of Environment
and Energy shall approve or deny the adoption or amendment of an action plan
within one hundred twenty days after the date the plan is submitted by the
district. He or she may hold a public hearing to consider testimony regarding
the action plan prior to the issuance of an order approving or disapproving the
adoption or amendment. In approving the adoption or amendment of the plan in
such an area, considerations shall include, but not be limited to, those
enumerated in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) If the director denies approval of an action plan by the district, the
order shall list the reason the action plan was not approved. A district may
-89-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
submit a revised action plan within sixty days after denial of its original
action plan to the director for approval subject to section 46-731.
Sec. 227. Section 46-729, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-729 Following approval of the action plan by the Director of Water,
Energy, and Environment Director of Environment and Energy, the district shall
cause a copy of the order adopted pursuant to section 46-728 to be published in
the manner provided in section 46-744.
Sec. 228. Section 46-730, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-730 Each district in which a management area has been designated or an
action plan for a management area has been required pursuant to section 46-725
shall, in cooperation with the department Department of Environment and Energy,
establish a program to monitor the quality of the ground water in the area and
shall if appropriate provide each landowner or operator of an irrigation system
with current information available with respect to fertilizer and chemical
usage for the specific soil types present and cropping patterns used.
Sec. 229. Section 46-731, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-731 (1) The power to specify controls authorized by section 46-739
shall vest in the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Director of
Environment and Energy if (a) at the end of one hundred eighty days following
the designation of a management area or the requiring of an action plan for a
management area pursuant to section 46-725, a district encompassed in whole or
in part by the management area has not completed and adopted an action plan,
(b) a district does not submit a revised action plan within sixty days after
denial of its original action plan, or (c) the district submits a revised
action plan which is not approved by the director.
(2) If the power to specify controls in such a management area is vested
in the director Director of Environment and Energy, he or she shall within
ninety days adopt and promulgate by rule and regulation such measures as he or
she deems necessary for carrying out the intent of the Nebraska Ground Water
Management and Protection Act. He or she shall conduct one or more public
hearings prior to the adoption of controls. Notice of any such additional
hearings shall be given in the manner provided in section 46-743. The
enforcement of controls adopted pursuant to this section shall be the
responsibility of the department Department of Environment and Energy.
Sec. 230. Section 46-732, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-732 The controls in the action plan approved by the Director of Water,
Energy, and Environment Director of Environment and Energy pursuant to section
46-728 shall be exercised by the district for the period of time necessary to
stabilize or reduce the level of contamination and prevent the increase or
spread of ground water contamination. An action plan may be amended by the same
method utilized in the adoption of the action plan.
Sec. 231. Section 46-733, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-733 A district may petition the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Director of Environment and Energy to remove the director's
designation of the area as a management area or the requirement of an action
plan for a management area or to modify the boundaries of a management area
designated pursuant to section 46-725. If the director determines that the
level of contamination in a management area has stabilized at or been reduced
to a level which is not detrimental to beneficial uses of ground water, he or
she may remove the designation or action plan requirement or modify the
boundaries of the management area.
Sec. 232. Section 46-736, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-736 An application for a permit or late permit for a water well in a
management area shall be denied only if the district in which the water well is
to be located finds (1) that the location or operation of the proposed water
well or other work would conflict with any regulations or controls adopted by
the district, (2) that the proposed use would not be a beneficial use of water,
or (3) in the case of a late permit only, that the applicant did not act in
good faith in failing to obtain a timely permit.
If the district finds that the application is incomplete or defective, it
shall return the application for correction. If the correction is not made
within sixty days, the application shall be canceled. All permits shall be
issued with or without conditions attached or denied not later than thirty days
after receipt by the district of a complete and properly prepared application.
A permit issued shall specify all regulations and controls adopted by a
district relevant to the construction or utilization of the proposed water
well. No refund of any application fees shall be made regardless of whether the
permit is issued, canceled, or denied. The district shall transmit one copy of
each permit issued to the department Director of Natural Resources.
Sec. 233. Section 46-737, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-737 The issuance by the district of a permit pursuant to section 46-736
or registration of a water well by the department Director of Natural Resources
pursuant to section 46-602 shall not vest in any person the right to violate
any district rule, regulation, or control in effect on the date of issuance of
the permit or the registration of the water well or to violate any rule,
regulation, or control properly adopted after such date.
-90-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Sec. 234. Section 46-739, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-739 (1) A district in which a management area has been designated shall
by order adopt one or more of the following controls for the management area:
(a) It may allocate the amount of ground water that may be withdrawn by
ground water users;
(b) It may adopt a system of rotation for use of ground water;
(c) It may adopt well-spacing requirements more restrictive than those
found in sections 46-609 and 46-651;
(d) It may require the installation of devices for measuring ground water
withdrawals from water wells;
(e) It may adopt a system which requires reduction of irrigated acres
pursuant to subsection (2) of section 46-740;
(f) It may limit or prevent the expansion of irrigated acres or otherwise
limit or prevent increases in the consumptive use of ground water withdrawals
from water wells used for irrigation or other beneficial purposes;
(g) It may require the use of best management practices;
(h) It may require the analysis of water or deep soils for fertilizer and
chemical content;
(i) It may impose mandatory educational requirements designed to protect
water quality or to stabilize or reduce the incidence of ground water
depletion, conflicts between ground water users and surface water
appropriators, disputes over interstate compacts or decrees, or difficulties
fulfilling the provisions of other formal state contracts or agreements;
(j) It may require water quality monitoring and reporting of results to
the district for all water wells within all or part of the management area;
(k) It may require district approval of (i) transfers of ground water off
the land where the water is withdrawn, (ii) transfers of rights to use ground
water that result from district allocations imposed pursuant to subdivision (1)
(a) of this section or from other restrictions on use that are imposed by the
district in accordance with this section, (iii) transfers of certified water
uses or certified irrigated acres between landowners or other persons, or (iv)
transfers of certified water uses or certified irrigated acres between parcels
or tracts under the control of a common landowner or other person. Such
approval may be required whether the transfer is within the management area,
from inside to outside the management area, or from outside to inside the
management area, except that transfers for which permits have been obtained
from the Department of Natural Resources, as it existed, prior to July 16,
2004, or pursuant to the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers
Permit Act shall not be subject to district approval pursuant to this
subdivision. If the district adopts rules and regulations pursuant to this
subdivision, such regulations shall require that the district deny or condition
the approval of any such transfer when and to the extent such action is
necessary to (A) ensure the consistency of the transfer with the purpose or
purposes for which the management area was designated, (B) prevent adverse
effects on other ground water users or on surface water appropriators, (C)
prevent adverse effects on the state's ability to comply with an interstate
compact or decree or to fulfill the provisions of any other formal state
contract or agreement, and (D) otherwise protect the public interest and
prevent detriment to the public welfare. Approval of any transfer of certified
water uses or certified irrigated acres under subdivision (1)(k)(iii) or (iv)
of this section shall further be subject to the district having complied with
the requirements of section 46-739.01;
(l) It may require, when conditions so permit, that new or replacement
water wells to be used for domestic or other purposes shall be constructed to
such a depth that they are less likely to be affected by seasonal water level
declines caused by other water wells in the same area;
(m) It may close all or a portion of the management area to the issuance
of additional permits or may condition the issuance of additional permits on
compliance with other rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
district to achieve the purpose or purposes for which the management area was
designated; and
(n) It may adopt and promulgate such other reasonable rules and
regulations as are necessary to carry out the purpose for which a management
area was designated.
(2) In adopting, amending, or repealing any control authorized by
subsection (1) of this section or sections 46-740 and 46-741, the district's
considerations shall include, but not be limited to, whether it reasonably
appears that such action will mitigate or eliminate the condition which led to
designation of the management area or will improve the administration of the
area.
(3) Upon request by the district or when any of the controls being
proposed are for the purpose of integrated management of hydrologically
connected ground water and surface water, the Chief Water Officer Director of
Natural Resources shall review and comment on the adoption, amendment, or
repeal of any authorized control in a management area. The Chief Water Officer
director may hold a public hearing to consider testimony regarding the control
prior to commenting on the adoption, amendment, or repeal of the control. The
Chief Water Officer director shall consult with the district and fix a time,
place, and date for such hearing. In reviewing and commenting on an authorized
control in a management area, the Chief Water Officer's director's
considerations shall include, but not be limited to, those enumerated in
subsection (2) of this section.
-91-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(4) If because of varying ground water uses, varying surface water uses,
different irrigation distribution systems, or varying climatic, hydrologic,
geologic, or soil conditions existing within a management area the uniform
application throughout such area of one or more controls would fail to carry
out the intent of the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act in a
reasonably effective and equitable manner, the controls adopted by the district
pursuant to this section may contain different provisions for different
categories of ground water use or portions of the management area which differ
from each other because of varying climatic, hydrologic, geologic, or soil
conditions. Any differences in such provisions shall recognize and be directed
toward such varying ground water uses or varying conditions. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, if the district adopts different controls
for different categories of ground water use, those controls shall be
consistent with section 46-613 and shall, for each such category, be uniform
for all portions of the area which have substantially similar climatic,
hydrologic, geologic, and soil conditions.
(5) The district may establish different water allocations for different
irrigation distribution systems.
(6)(a) The district may establish different provisions for different
hydrologic relationships between ground water and surface water.
(b) For management areas a purpose of which is the integrated management
of hydrologically connected ground water and surface water, the district may
establish different provisions for water wells either permitted or constructed
before the designation of a management area for integrated management of
hydrologically connected ground water and surface water and for water wells
either permitted or constructed on or after the designation date or any other
later date or dates established by the district. Permits for construction of
new wells not completed by the date of the determination of fully appropriated
shall be subject to any conditions imposed by the applicable natural resources
district.
(c) For a management area in a river basin or part of a river basin that
is or was the subject of litigation over an interstate water compact or decree
in which the State of Nebraska is a named defendant, the district may establish
different provisions for restriction of water wells constructed after January
1, 2001, if such litigation was commenced before or on May 22, 2001. If such
litigation is commenced after May 22, 2001, the district may establish
different provisions for restriction of water wells constructed after the date
on which such litigation is commenced in federal court. An appeal from a
decision of the district under this subdivision shall be in accordance with the
hearing procedures established in the Nebraska Ground Water Management and
Protection Act.
(d) Except as otherwise authorized by law, the district shall make a
replacement water well as defined in section 46-602, or as further defined in
district rules and regulations, subject to the same provisions as the water
well it replaces.
(7) If the district has included controls delineated in subdivision (1)(m)
of this section in its management plan, but has not implemented such controls
within two years after the initial public hearing on the controls, the district
shall hold a public hearing, as provided in section 46-712, regarding the
controls before implementing them.
(8) In addition to the controls listed in subsection (1) of this section,
a district in which a management area has been designated may also adopt and
implement one or more of the following measures if it determines that any such
measures would help the district and water users achieve the goals and
objectives of the management area: (a) It may sponsor nonmandatory educational
programs; and (b) it may establish and implement financial or other incentive
programs. As a condition for participation in an incentive program, the
district may require water users or landowners to enter into and perform such
agreements or covenants concerning the use of land or water as are necessary to
produce the benefits for which the incentive program is established and shall
further condition participation upon satisfaction of the requirements of
section 46-739.01.
Sec. 235. Section 46-740, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-740 (1) If allocation is adopted for use of ground water for irrigation
purposes in a management area, the permissible withdrawal of ground water shall
be allocated equally per irrigated acre except as permitted by subsections (4)
through (6) of section 46-739. Such allocation shall specify the total number
of acre-inches that are allocated per irrigated acre per year, except that the
district may allow a ground water user to average his or her allocation over
any reasonable period of time. A ground water user may use his or her
allocation on all or any part of the irrigated acres to which the allocation
applies or in any other manner approved by the district.
(2) Except as permitted pursuant to subsections (4) through (6) of section
46-739, if annual rotation or reduction of irrigated acres is adopted for use
of ground water for irrigation purposes in a management area, the nonuse of
irrigated acres shall be a uniform percentage reduction of each landowner's
irrigated acres within the management area or a subarea of the management area.
Such uniform reduction may be adjusted for each landowner based upon crops
grown on his or her land to reflect the varying consumptive requirements
between crops.
(3) Unless an integrated management plan, a rule, or an order is
established, adopted, or issued prior to November 1, 2005, no integrated
-92-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
management plan, rule, or order shall limit the use of ground water by a
municipality, within an area determined by the Chief Water Officer Department
of Natural Resources to be fully appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 or
designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713, until January 1,
2026, except that:
(a) Any allocations to a municipality that have been made as of November
1, 2005, shall remain in full force and effect unless changed by the
appropriate natural resources district;
(b)(i) For any municipality that has not received an allocation as of
November 1, 2005, the minimum annual allocation may be the greater of either
the amount of ground water authorized by a permit issued pursuant to the
Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act or the
governmental, commercial, and industrial uses of the municipality plus a per
capita allowance. Water for commercial and industrial uses may be limited as
specified in subdivision (b)(iii) of this subsection.
(ii) The per capita allowance shall be based on the location of the
municipality, increasing in equal increments from east to west, and shall not
be less than two hundred gallons per person per day at 95 degrees, 19 minutes,
00 seconds longitude and not less than two hundred fifty gallons per person per
day at 104 degrees, 04 minutes, 00 seconds longitude. Persons served by a
municipality outside of its corporate limits shall be considered part of the
municipality's population if such service begins prior to January 1, 2026.
(iii) Prior to January 1, 2026, any new or expanded single commercial or
single industrial development served by any municipality within the fully
appropriated or overappropriated area which, after July 14, 2006, commences
water use resulting in the consumptive use of water in amounts greater than
twenty-five million gallons annually may be subject to controls adopted
pursuant to section 46-715;
(c) Prior to January 1, 2026, increases in the consumptive use of water by
a municipality that result in a decrease in streamflow shall be addressed by
the integrated management plan pursuant to controls or incentive programs
adopted pursuant to section 46-715 and shall not affect the municipal
allocations outlined in subdivisions (3)(a) and (b) of this section. Any
permanent reduction in consumptive use of water associated with municipal
growth, including governmental, industrial, and commercial growth, during the
period between July 14, 2006, and January 1, 2026, shall accrue to the benefit
of the natural resources district within which such municipality is located;
and
(d) To qualify for the exemption specified in subsection (3) of this
section, any city of the metropolitan class, city of the primary class, city of
the first class, or city of the second class shall file a conservation plan
with the natural resources district, if required by the integrated management
plan. Villages and other municipalities smaller than a city of the second class
shall not be required to submit a conservation plan to qualify for such
exemption.
(4) On and after January 1, 2026, the base amount for an annual allocation
to a municipality shall be determined as the greater of either (a) the amount
of water authorized by a permit issued pursuant to the Municipal and Rural
Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act or (b) the greatest annual use prior
to January 1, 2026, for uses specified in subdivision (3)(b) of this section
plus the per capita allowance described in subdivision (3)(b)(ii) of this
section. On and after January 1, 2026, increases in the consumptive use of
water by a municipality that result in a decrease in streamflow shall be
addressed by the integrated management plan pursuant to controls or incentive
programs adopted pursuant to section 46-715. Each municipality may be subject
to controls adopted pursuant to such section for amounts in excess of the
allocations.
(5) Unless an integrated management plan, rule, or order is established,
adopted, or issued prior to November 1, 2005, no integrated management plan,
rule, or order shall limit the use of ground water by a nonmunicipal commercial
or industrial water user within an area determined by the Department of Natural
Resources as it existed prior to July 1, 2025, or the Chief Water Officer
department to be fully appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 or designated as
overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713, until January 1, 2026, except
that:
(a) Prior to January 1, 2026, the minimum annual allocation for a
nonmunicipal commercial or industrial user shall be the greater of either (i)
the amount specified in a permit issued pursuant to the Industrial Ground Water
Regulatory Act or (ii) the amount necessary to achieve the commercial or
industrial use, including all new or expanded uses that consume less than
twenty-five million gallons annually. Any increases in the consumptive use of
water by a nonmunicipal commercial or industrial water user that result in a
decrease in streamflow shall be addressed by the integrated management plan
pursuant to controls or incentive programs adopted pursuant to section 46-715;
(b) Prior to January 1, 2026, any new or expanded single commercial or
industrial development served by a nonmunicipal well within an area determined
by the Department of Natural Resources as it existed prior to July 1, 2025, or
the Chief Water Officer department to be fully appropriated pursuant to section
46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713 which,
after July 14, 2006, commences water use resulting in the consumptive use of
water in amounts greater than twenty-five million gallons annually may be
subject to controls adopted pursuant to section 46-715. This subdivision does
not apply to a water user described in this subdivision that is regulated by
-93-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act and the United States Nuclear
Regulatory Commission;
(c) On and after January 1, 2026, the base amount for an annual allocation
to a nonmunicipal commercial or industrial user within an area determined by
the Chief Water Officer department to be fully appropriated pursuant to section
46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713 shall be
the amount specified in subdivision (5)(a) or (b) of this section;
(d) On and after January 1, 2026, increases in the consumptive use of
water by a nonmunicipal commercial or industrial water user that result in a
decrease in streamflow shall be addressed by the integrated management plan
pursuant to controls or incentive programs adopted pursuant to section 46-715;
and
(e) Any reduction in consumptive use associated with new nonmunicipal
industrial or commercial uses of less than twenty-five million gallons, during
the period between July 14, 2006, and January 1, 2026, shall accrue to the
benefit of the natural resources district within which such nonmunicipal
industrial or commercial user is located.
Sec. 236. Section 46-742, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-742 (1) Whenever the drilling of new wells has been stayed pursuant to
section 46-714, ground water withdrawn outside the affected area shall not be
transported for use inside such area unless (a) such withdrawal and transport
began before the stay took effect, (b) the water is used solely for domestic
purposes, or (c) such withdrawal and transport is approved in advance by the
district in which the stay is in effect and, if the water is withdrawn in
another natural resources district, by the other district.
(2) Whenever a natural resources district pursuant to subdivision (1)(m)
of section 46-739 has closed all or part of the district to the issuance of
additional well permits, ground water withdrawn outside the affected area shall
not be transported for use inside such area unless (a) such withdrawal and
transport began before the affected area was closed to the issuance of
additional well permits, (b) the water is used solely for domestic purposes, or
(c) such withdrawal and transport is approved in advance by the district that
closed the affected area to additional well permits and, if the water is
withdrawn in another natural resources district, by the other district.
(3) If a proposed withdrawal and transport of water under subsection (1)
or (2) of this section is intended for municipal purposes, the natural
resources district shall approve the withdrawal and transport of ground water
into the affected area when a public water supplier providing water for
municipal purposes receives a permit from the Chief Water Officer Department of
Natural Resources pursuant to the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water
Transfers Permit Act.
Sec. 237. Section 46-743, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-743 Any public hearing required under the Nebraska Ground Water
Management and Protection Act shall comply with the following requirements:
(1) The hearing shall be located within or in reasonable proximity to the
area proposed for designation as a management area or affected by the proposed
rule or regulation;
(2) Notice of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper published or
of general circulation in the affected area at least once each week for three
consecutive weeks, the last publication of which shall be not less than seven
days prior to the hearing;
(3) As to the designation of a management area, adoption or amendment of
an action plan or integrated management plan, or adoption or amendment of
controls, the notice shall provide, as applicable, a general description of (a)
the contents of the plan, (b) the geographic area which will be considered for
inclusion in the management area, and (c) a general description of all controls
proposed for adoption or amendment and shall identify all locations where a
copy of the full text of the proposed plan or controls may be obtained;
(4) For all other rules and regulations, the notice shall provide a
general description of the contents of the rules and regulations proposed for
adoption or amendment and shall identify all locations where a copy of the full
text of the proposed rules and regulations may be obtained;
(5) The full text of all controls, rules, or regulations shall be
available to the public upon request not later than the date of first
publication;
(6) All interested persons shall be allowed to appear and present
testimony; and
(7) The hearing shall include testimony of a representative of the
department Department of Natural Resources and, if the primary purpose of the
proposed management area is protection of water quality, testimony of a
representative of the Department of Environment and Energy and shall include
the results of any relevant water quality studies or investigations conducted
by the district.
Sec. 238. Section 46-744, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-744 Any order adopted pursuant to section 46-712, 46-718, 46-719,
46-725, or 46-726 shall be published once each week for three consecutive weeks
in a local newspaper published or of general circulation in the area involved,
the last publication of which shall be not less than seven days prior to the
date set for the effective date of the order. The publication shall provide a
general description of the text of all controls adopted or amended and shall
-94-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
identify all locations where a copy of the full text of the proposed controls
may be obtained. The full text of all controls adopted shall be available to
the public upon request at least thirty days prior to the effective date of the
controls.
Such order shall become effective on the date specified by the adopting
district, Chief Water Officer, department, or board, as applicable.
Sec. 239. Section 46-745, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-745 (1) Any person who violates a cease and desist order issued by a
district pursuant to section 46-707 shall be subject to a civil penalty of not
less than one thousand dollars and not more than five thousand dollars for each
day an intentional violation occurs. In assessing the amount of the civil
penalty, the court shall consider the degree and extent of the violation, the
size of the operation, whether the violator has been previously convicted or
subjected to a civil penalty under this section, and any economic benefit
derived from noncompliance. Any civil penalty assessed and unpaid shall
constitute a debt to the state which may be collected in the manner of a lien
foreclosure or sued for and recovered in a proper form of action in the name of
the state in the district court of the county in which the violator resides or
owns property. The court shall remit the civil penalty to the State Treasurer,
within thirty days after receipt, for distribution in accordance with Article
VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska The court shall, within thirty
days after receipt, remit the civil penalty to the State Treasurer for credit
to the permanent school fund.
(2)(a) Prior to issuing a cease and desist order against a public water
supplier as defined in section 46-638, the district shall consult with the
Attorney General. If the Attorney General determines that the district does not
have sufficient grounds to issue a cease and desist order, the district shall
abide by such determination and shall not issue a cease and desist order. The
Attorney General shall have exclusive authority to enforce actions under this
subsection.
(b) Any determination as to whether a water well is properly registered
under sections 46-602 to 46-604 shall be made by the department. Any
determination as to or whether a water well is properly permitted under the
Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act shall be made by
the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources.
(3) When the Attorney General, a county attorney, or a private attorney
brings an action on behalf of a district to recover a civil penalty under this
section, the district shall recover the costs of the action if a civil penalty
is awarded. Any recovered costs of the action shall be: (a) Remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Justice Natural Resources
Enforcement Fund if the action is brought by the Attorney General; (b) credited
to the applicable county fund if the action is brought by the county attorney;
and (c) remitted to the district if the action is brought by the district's
private attorney.
(4) The Department of Justice Natural Resources Enforcement Fund is
created. The fund shall consist of money credited pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section. Money in the fund shall be used to reimburse the office of the
Attorney General for the costs incurred in enforcing this section. Any money in
the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 240. Section 46-746, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-746 (1) Any person who violates any cease and desist order issued by a
district pursuant to section 46-707 or any controls, rules, or regulations
adopted by a natural resources district relating to a management area shall be
subject to the imposition of penalties imposed through the controls adopted by
the district, including, but not limited to, having any allocation of water
granted or irrigated acres certified by the district reduced in whole or in
part. Before a district takes any action, notice and hearing shall be provided
to such person.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of sections 46-721 to
46-733 for which a penalty is not otherwise provided, other than the
requirements imposed on a district, the Chief Water Officer of the Department
of Water, Energy, and Environment, the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Director of Natural Resources, or the department Department of
Natural Resources, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five
hundred dollars. Each day of continued violation shall constitute a separate
offense.
Sec. 241. Section 46-748, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-748 The Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources shall adopt
and promulgate, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, such rules
and regulations as are necessary to the discharge of duties assigned to the
Chief Water Officer director or the Department of Natural Resources by the
Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act.
Sec. 242. Section 46-749, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-749 In the administration of the Nebraska Ground Water Management and
Protection Act, all actions of the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment,
the Chief Water Officer, Director of Environment and Energy, the Director of
Natural Resources, and the districts shall be consistent with the provisions of
-95-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
section 46-613.
Sec. 243. Section 46-750, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-750 Any person aggrieved by any order of the district, the Chief Water
Officer, or , the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Director of
Environment and Energy, or the Director of Natural Resources issued pursuant to
the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act may appeal the order.
The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 244. Section 46-751, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-751 All fees paid to the Chief Water Officer Director of Natural
Resources pursuant to the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Ground Water
Management Fund which is hereby created and which shall be administered by the
Chief Water Officer director. Any money credited to the fund may be utilized by
the Chief Water Officer director for payments of expenses incurred in the
administration of the act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 245. Section 46-753, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-753 (1) The Water Resources Trust Fund is created. The State Treasurer
shall credit to the fund such money as is specifically appropriated thereto by
the Legislature, transfers authorized by the Legislature, and such funds, fees,
donations, gifts, or bequests received by the department Department of Natural
Resources from any federal, state, public, or private source for expenditure
for the purposes described in the Nebraska Ground Water Management and
Protection Act. Money in the fund shall not be subject to any fiscal-year
limitation or lapse provision of unexpended balance at the end of any fiscal
year or biennium. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the Chief Water Officer department.
The Chief Water Officer department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations regarding the allocation and expenditure of money from the fund.
(3) Money in the fund may be expended by the Chief Water Officer
department for costs incurred by the Chief Water Officer department, by natural
resources districts, or by other political subdivisions in (a) determining
whether river basins, subbasins, or reaches are fully appropriated in
accordance with section 46-713, (b) developing or implementing integrated
management plans for such fully appropriated river basins, subbasins, or
reaches or for river basins, subbasins, or reaches designated as
overappropriated in accordance with section 46-713, (c) developing or
implementing integrated management plans in river basins, subbasins, or reaches
which have not yet become either fully appropriated or overappropriated, or (d)
attaining state compliance with an interstate water compact or decree or other
formal state contract or agreement.
(4) Except for funds paid to a political subdivision for forgoing or
reducing its own water use or for implementing projects or programs intended to
aid the state in complying with an interstate water compact or decree or other
formal state contract or agreement, a political subdivision that receives funds
from the fund shall provide, or cause to be provided, matching funds in an
amount at least equal to twenty percent of the amount received from the fund by
that natural resources district or political subdivision. The Chief Water
Officer department shall monitor programs and activities funded by the fund to
ensure that the required match is being provided.
Sec. 246. Section 46-754, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-754 The Interrelated Water Management Plan Program is created for the
purpose of facilitating and funding the duties of districts arising under the
Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act. The program shall function
as a grant program administered by the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission
and the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources upon
recommendations of the commission using funds appropriated for the program. The
commission shall develop guidelines and limitations for grant requests for
funding such district's duties, including studies required to carry out those
duties. Grant requests shall be made to the commission for review in a manner
and form prescribed by the commission. The amounts requested and approved shall
be supported by a minimum local revenue match comprising twenty percent of the
total project cost. The Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources shall
expend funds to implement the commission's recommendations for fiscal support
under the program only upon the commission's approval.
Sec. 247. Section 46-755, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-755 This section shall apply notwithstanding any other provision of the
Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act.
(1) If a river basin as described in subdivision (2)(a) of section 2-1504
includes three or more natural resources districts that, pursuant to
subdivision (1)(a) of section 46-715, have been or are required to develop an
integrated management plan for all or substantially all (eighty-five percent)
of the district, such natural resources districts shall, jointly with the Chief
Water Officer department and the natural resources districts within the same
basin, develop and adopt a basin-wide plan for the areas of a basin, subbasin,
-96-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
or reach determined by the department to have hydrologically connected water
supplies, except that any natural resources district that has developed and
implemented a basin-wide plan pursuant to subsection (5) of section 46-715
shall not be affected by this section. If deemed appropriate by the Chief Water
Officer department and the affected natural resources districts, the basin-wide
plan may combine two or more river basins.
(2) An integrated management plan developed under subdivision (1)(a) or
(b) of section 46-715 shall ensure such integrated management plan is
consistent with any basin-wide plan developed pursuant to this section.
However, an integrated management plan may implement additional incentive
programs or controls pursuant to section 46-739 if the programs and controls
are consistent with the basin-wide plan.
(3) A basin-wide plan shall be completed, adopted, and take effect within
three years after April 17, 2014, unless the Chief Water Officer department and
the natural resources districts jointly agree to an extension of not more than
an additional two years.
(4) A basin-wide plan shall (a) have clear goals and objectives with a
purpose of sustaining a balance between water uses and water supplies so that
the economic viability, social and environmental health, safety, and welfare of
the river basin, subbasin, or reach can be achieved and maintained for both the
near term and the long term, (b) ensure that compliance with any interstate
compact or decree or other formal state contract or agreement or applicable
state or federal law is maintained, and (c) set forth a timeline to meet the
goals and objectives as required under this subdivision, but in no case shall a
timeline exceed thirty years after April 17, 2014.
(5)(a) A basin-wide plan developed under this section shall utilize the
best generally-accepted methodologies and available information, data, and
science to evaluate the effect of existing uses of hydrologically connected
water on existing surface water and ground water users. The plan shall include
a process to gather and evaluate data, information, and methodologies to
increase understanding of the surface water and hydrologically connected ground
water system within the basin, subbasin, or reach and test the validity of the
conclusions, information, and assumptions upon which the plan is based.
(b) A basin-wide plan developed under this section shall include a
schedule indicating the end date by which the stated goals and objectives are
to be achieved and the management actions to be taken to achieve the goals and
objectives. To ensure that reasonable progress is being made toward achieving
the final goals and objectives of the plan, the schedule shall also include
measurable hydrologic objectives and intermediate dates by which the objectives
are expected to be met and monitoring plans to measure the extent to which the
objectives are being achieved. Such intermediate objectives shall be
established in a manner that, if achieved on schedule, will provide a
reasonable expectation that the goals of the plan will be achieved by the
established end date.
(c) A basin-wide plan shall be developed using a consultation and
collaboration process involving representatives from irrigation districts,
reclamation districts, public power and irrigation districts, mutual irrigation
companies, canal companies, ground water users, range livestock owners, the
Game and Parks Commission, and municipalities that rely on water from within
the affected area and that, after being notified of the commencement of the
plan development process, indicate in writing their desire to become an
official participant in such process. The Chief Water Officer department and
affected natural resources districts shall involve official participants in
formulating, evaluating, and recommending plans and management actions and work
to reach an agreement among all official participants involved in a basin-wide
plan. In addition, the Chief Water Officer department or the affected natural
resources districts may include designated representatives of other
stakeholders. If agreement is reached by all parties involved in such
consultation and collaboration process, the Chief Water Officer department and
the affected natural resources districts shall adopt the agreed-upon basin-wide
plan. If agreement cannot be reached by all parties involved, the basin-wide
plan shall be developed and adopted by the Chief Water Officer department and
the affected natural resources districts or by the Interrelated Water Review
Board pursuant to section 46-719.
(d) Within five years after the adoption of the basin-wide plan, and every
five years thereafter, the Chief Water Officer department and affected natural
resources districts shall conduct a technical analysis of the actions taken in
a river basin to determine the progress towards meeting the goals and
objectives of the plan. The analysis shall include an examination of (i)
available supplies, current uses, and changes in long-term water availability,
(ii) the effects of conservation practices and natural causes, including, but
not limited to, drought, and (iii) the effects of the plan in meeting the goal
of sustaining a balance between water uses and water supplies. The analysis
shall determine if changes or modifications to the basin-wide plan are needed
to meet the goals and objectives pursuant to subdivision (4)(a) of this
section. The Chief Water Officer department and affected natural resources
districts shall present the results of the analysis and any recommended
modifications to the plan at a public meeting and shall provide for at least a
thirty-day public comment period before holding a public hearing on the
recommended modifications. The Chief Water Officer department shall submit a
report to the Legislature of the results of this analysis and the progress made
under the basin-wide plan. The report shall be submitted electronically. Any
official participant or stakeholder may submit comments to the Chief Water
-97-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Officer department and affected natural resources districts on the final basin-
wide plan adopted by the Chief Water Officer department and affected natural
resources districts, which shall be made a part of the report to the
Legislature.
(e) Before adoption of a basin-wide plan, the Chief Water Officer
department and affected natural resources districts shall schedule at least one
public hearing to take testimony on the proposed plan. Any such hearings shall
be held in reasonable proximity to the area affected by the plan. Notice of
hearings shall be published as provided in section 46-743. All interested
persons may appear at any hearings and present testimony or provide other
evidence relevant to the issues under consideration. Within sixty days after
the final hearing, the Chief Water Officer department and affected natural
resources districts shall jointly determine whether to adopt the plan.
(f) The Chief Water Officer department and the affected natural resources
districts may utilize, when necessary, the Interrelated Water Review Board
process provided in section 46-719 for disputes arising from developing,
implementing, and enforcing a basin-wide plan developed under this section.
Sec. 248. Section 46-801, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-801 No person shall drain, lower, or in any manner reduce or divert the
water supply of any natural or perennial lake, if the area exceeds twenty acres
at low water stage or if the lake is of such depth and character as to have
more economic importance for aquaculture, hunting, or other purpose than the
bed of such lake would have for agricultural purposes. Any person intending to
drain, lower, divert, or in any way reduce the waters or water supply of any
natural or perennial lake shall, before commencing the construction of any such
work for drainage or diversion, make application to the Chief Water Officer of
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources for a permit
to do so.
Sec. 249. Section 46-802, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-802 On the receipt of such application in the form prescribed by the
Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources, the Chief Water Officer
department shall cause the same to be recorded in the Chief Water Officer's its
office. The Chief Water Officer department shall make a careful examination to
ascertain whether it sets forth all the facts necessary to enable the Chief
Water Officer department to determine the nature and extent of the proposed
work of drainage and diversion. If such an examination shows the application to
be in any way defective, the Chief Water Officer it shall return the same to
the applicant for correction.
Sec. 250. Section 46-803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-803 If the proposed work of drainage or diversion will not result in
injury or damage to any person and will not be otherwise detrimental to the
public welfare but will result in economic benefit to the state, the Chief
Water Officer Department of Natural Resources shall approve the same by
endorsement thereon. The Chief Water Officer It shall make a record of such
endorsement thereon in some proper manner in the Chief Water Officer's its
office. The Chief Water Officer It shall also return the same so endorsed to
the applicant. Such applicant shall, upon receipt thereof, be authorized to
proceed with the work and to take such measures as may be necessary to its
completion.
Sec. 251. Section 46-804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
46-804 If it appears to the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural
Resources that the proposed works of drainage or diversion will result in
injury or damage to any person or will be detrimental to the public welfare and
not result in economic benefit to the state, the Chief Water Officer department
shall refuse to approve the application. The party making such application
shall not prosecute such work so long as such refusal shall continue in force.
Sec. 252. Section 46-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1001 As used in sections 46-1001 to 46-1020, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) District means a rural water district organized pursuant to sections
46-1001 to 46-1020;
(2) Board means the governing body of a district;
(3) The terms county board and county clerk mean, respectively, the county
board and county clerk of the county in which the greatest portion of the
territory of any existing or proposed rural water district is located;
(4) Participating member means an individual, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, association, or corporation which owns land located within a
district and which has subscribed to one or more benefit units of such
district; and
(5) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Director means the Director of Natural
Resources.
Sec. 253. Section 46-1004, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1004 Whenever a petition as provided in section 46-1003 is filed with
the county clerk, the county clerk shall thereupon give notice to the county
board of the filing and pendency of such petition and the county board shall
forthwith fix a time and place within thirty days after the date of filing of
-98-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
the petition for a hearing of the same, and the county clerk shall, at least
seven days before the date fixed for such hearing, give or send by registered
or certified mail written notice thereof to each of the petitioners and shall
transmit to the Chief Water Officer director one copy of the petition and
notice of the time and place the same is set for consideration. The county
clerk shall also, at least seven days before the date fixed for such hearing,
cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a
notice of the hearing. The published notice shall (1) define the boundaries of
the proposed district; (2) state the time and place of hearing; (3) state that
all owners of land within such boundaries may appear and be heard; and (4)
state that a rural water district, if incorporated, shall have no power or
authority to levy any taxes whatsoever.
Sec. 254. Section 46-1005, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1005 At the time and place set for the hearing and consideration of the
petition, it shall be the duty of the county board to ascertain (1) whether
proper notice of the hearing has been given to the signers of the petition, the
Chief Water Officer director, and the landowners in the district as required by
section 46-1004; (2) whether lands within the area defined in the petition are
without an adequate water supply; (3) whether the construction and maintenance
of ponds, reservoirs, pipelines, wells, check dams, pumping installations, or
any other facility for the storage, transportation, or utilization of water or
the construction and maintenance of any combination of such proposed projects
are necessary for the improvement of the area. The county board shall make no
affirmative finding that any proposed project is necessary if the construction
and maintenance of such project would encourage the cultivation of lands which
are submarginal and which should be devoted to other uses in the public
interest. The county board shall make no affirmative finding that any proposed
project is necessary unless the Chief Water Officer director has approved such
project; (4) whether such improvement or works will be conducive to and will
tend to promote the public health, convenience, and welfare; and (5) whether
the boundaries of the proposed district lie within five miles of any
incorporated city or village and whether approval for incorporation of the
district has been given by the governing body of such city or village. If upon
such consideration it is found that such petition is in conformity with the
requirements of sections 46-1001 to 46-1020, the county board shall thereupon
immediately declare the district within the boundaries defined in the petition
to constitute a public corporation and to be incorporated as a rural water
district under the name of Rural Water District No. ......, .......... County,
Nebraska (inserting number in order of incorporation and name of county) and
thereupon shall enter upon its records full minutes of such hearing, together
with a declaration that thenceforth such district shall constitute a body
politic and corporate under such corporate name for the purposes of sections
46-1001 to 46-1020.
Sec. 255. Section 46-1011, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1011 Plans and specifications for any proposed improvement authorized
by sections 46-1001 to 46-1020 shall be filed with the Chief Water Officer
director, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy, and the secretary of the district. No construction of any such
improvement shall begin until the plans and specifications for such improvement
have been approved by the director and the Chief Water Officer Department of
Environment and Energy, except that if the improvement involves a public water
system as defined in section 71-5301, only the department Department of
Environment and Energy shall be required to review the plans and specifications
for such improvement and approve the same if in compliance with the Nebraska
Safe Drinking Water Act and departmental regulations adopted thereunder.
The total benefits of any such improvement shall be divided into a
suitable number of benefit units. Each landowner within the district shall
subscribe to a number of such units in proportion to the extent he or she
desires to participate in the benefits of the improvements. As long as the
capacity of the district's facilities permits, participating members of the
district may subscribe to additional units upon payment of a unit fee for each
such unit. Owners of land located within the district who are not participating
members may subscribe to such units as the board in its discretion may grant,
and upon payment of the unit fee for each such unit shall be entitled to the
same rights as original participating members. If the capacity of the
district's facilities permits, the district may sell water to persons engaged
in hauling water and to any political subdivision organized under the laws of
the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 256. Section 46-1023, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1023 Whenever a petition as provided in section 46-1022 is filed with
the county clerk, the county clerk shall thereupon give notice to the county
board of the filing and pendency of such petition and the county board shall
forthwith fix a time and place within thirty days after the date of filing of
the petition for a hearing of the same, and the county clerk shall, at least
seven days before the date fixed for such hearing, give or send by registered
or certified mail written notice thereof to the chairperson of each district
seeking consolidation and shall transmit to the Chief Water Officer director
one copy of the petition and notice of the time and place the same is set for
hearing. The county clerk shall also, at least seven days before the date fixed
for such hearing, cause a notice of the hearing to be published in a newspaper
-99-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
of general circulation in the county. The published notice shall (1) identify
by name the districts seeking consolidation; (2) state the time and place of
the hearing; (3) state that all interested persons may appear and be heard; and
(4) state that a consolidated water district shall have no power or authority
to levy any taxes whatsoever.
Sec. 257. Section 46-1102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1102 The Legislature finds that the use of chemigation throughout the
state is increasing and that, although chemigation provides a viable
alternative to other means of chemical application, if an irrigation
distribution system is not properly equipped or if a chemical is not used with
proper precautions, there exists a potential to contaminate the water.
The Legislature also finds that complete information as to the occurrences
and use of chemigation in this state is essential to the development of a sound
state water management policy.
For these reasons, the Legislature deems it necessary to provide the
natural resources districts and the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy with the authority to document, monitor,
regulate, and enforce chemigation practices in Nebraska.
Sec. 258. Section 46-1108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1108 Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy.
Sec. 259. Section 46-1109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1109 Director shall mean the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy.
Sec. 260. Section 46-1204.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1204.01 Abandoned water well means any water well (1) the use of which
has been accomplished or permanently discontinued, (2) which has been
decommissioned as described in the rules and regulations of the department
Department of Environment and Energy, and (3) for which the notice of
abandonment required by subsection (2) of section 46-602 has been filed with
the department Department of Natural Resources by the licensed water well
contractor or licensed pump installation contractor who decommissioned the
water well or by the water well owner if the owner decommissioned the water
well.
Sec. 261. Section 46-1207, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1207 Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy.
Sec. 262. Section 46-1217, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1217 (1) There is hereby created a Water Well Standards and
Contractors' Licensing Board. The board shall be composed of ten members, six
of whom shall be appointed by the Governor as follows: (a) A licensed water
well contractor representing irrigation water well contractors, (b) a licensed
water well contractor representing domestic water well contractors, (c) a
licensed water well contractor representing municipal and industrial water well
contractors, (d) a licensed pump installation contractor, (e) a manufacturer or
supplier of water well or pumping equipment, and (f) a holder of a license
issued under the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act employed by
a natural resources district. The chief executive officer of the Department of
Health and Human Services or his or her designated representative, the Director
of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy or his or her
designated representative, the Director of Natural Resources or his or her
designated representative, and the director of the Conservation and Survey
Division of the University of Nebraska or his or her designated representative
shall also serve as members of the board.
(2) Each member shall be a resident of the state. Each industry
representative shall have had at least five years of experience in the business
of his or her category prior to appointment and shall be actively engaged in
such business at the time of appointment and while serving on the board. Each
member representing a category subject to licensing under the Water Well
Standards and Contractors' Practice Act shall be licensed by the department
pursuant to such act. In making appointments, the Governor may consider
recommendations made by the trade associations of each category.
Sec. 263. Section 46-1222, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1222 No board member shall take any action or make any decision in the
discharge of the duties of a member of the board that may constitute a conflict
of interest. As soon as a member is aware of a potential conflict or should
reasonably be aware of such potential conflict, whichever is sooner, the member
shall submit a written statement to the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy describing the matter requiring action or
decision and the nature of the potential conflict. The member shall take such
action as the director shall advise or prescribe to remove the member from
influence over the action or decision on the matter. For purposes of this
section, conflict of interest includes financial, professional, or personal
obligations that may compromise or present the appearance of compromising the
judgment of a member in the performance of the duties of a member of the board.
The director may establish a definition of conflicts of interest for members of
-100-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
the board and may establish procedures in case such a conflict arises.
Sec. 264. Section 46-1224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1224 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section, the board shall set reasonable fees in an amount calculated to
recover the costs incurred by the department and the board in administering and
carrying out the purposes of the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice
Act. Such fees shall be paid to the department and remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Licensing
Fund, which fund is hereby created. Such fund shall be used by the department
and the board for the purpose of administering the Water Well Standards and
Contractors' Practice Act. Additionally, such fund shall be used to pay any
required fee to a contractor which provides the online services for
registration of water wells. Any discount in the amount paid the state by a
credit card, charge card, or debit card company or a third-party merchant bank
for such registration fees shall be deducted from the portion of the
registration fee collected pursuant to this section. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(2) The board shall set fees for licensing individuals under the Water
Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act for application for, issuance of,
and renewal of licenses. The fees shall be waived for initial licenses for low-
income individuals, military families, and young workers as those terms are
defined in the Uniform Credentialing Act.
(3) The board shall set a fee of not less than twenty-five dollars and not
more than forty dollars for each water well which is required to be registered
and which is designed and constructed to pump fifty gallons per minute or less
and each monitoring and observation well and a fee of not less than forty
dollars and not more than eighty dollars for each water well which is required
to be registered and which is designed and constructed to pump more than fifty
gallons per minute. For water wells permitted pursuant to the Industrial Ground
Water Regulatory Act, the fee set pursuant to this subsection shall be
collected for each of the first ten such water wells registered, and for each
group of ten or fewer such water wells registered thereafter, the fee shall be
collected as if only one water well was being registered. For a series of two
or more water wells completed and pumped into a common carrier, as defined in
section 46-601.01, as part of a single site plan for irrigation purposes, the
fee set pursuant to this subsection shall be collected for each of the first
two such water wells registered. For a series of water wells completed for
purposes of installation of a ground heat exchanger for a structure for
utilizing the geothermal properties of the ground, the fee set pursuant to this
subsection shall be collected as if only one water well was being registered.
For water wells constructed as part of a single site plan for monitoring ground
water, obtaining hydrogeologic information, or extracting contaminants from the
ground and for water wells constructed as part of remedial action approved by
the department Department of Environment and Energy pursuant to section
66-1525, 66-1529.02, or 81-15,124, the fee set pursuant to this subsection
shall be collected for each of the first five such water wells registered, and
for each group of five or fewer such water wells registered thereafter, the fee
shall be collected as if only one water well was being registered. The fees
shall be remitted to the department Director of Natural Resources with the
registration form required by section 46-602 and shall be in addition to the
fee in section 46-606. The department director shall remit the fee to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Licensing
Fund.
(4) The board shall set an application fee for a declaratory ruling or
variance of not less than fifty dollars and not more than one hundred dollars.
The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Water Well
Standards and Contractors' Licensing Fund.
Sec. 265. Section 46-1235, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1235 In cases other than those relating to failure to meet the
requirements for an initial license, the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy may deny, refuse renewal of, suspend, or
revoke licenses or may take other disciplinary action following notice and an
opportunity for a hearing for any of the following acts or offenses:
(1) Violation of the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act or
any standards, rules, or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such
act;
(2) Fraud or deception by the applicant or licensee;
(3) Failure to exercise reasonable care in the practice of the trade;
(4) Inability to properly perform the practice of the trade;
(5) Failure to comply with continuing education requirements for licensure
under the act;
(6) Conduct or practices detrimental to the health or safety of persons
hiring the services of the licensee or of members of the general public;
(7) Practice of the trade while the license to do so is suspended or
practice of the trade in contravention of any limitation placed upon the
license;
(8) Failing to file a water well registration required by subsection (1),
(2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 46-602 or failing to file a notice required by
subsection (7) of such section; or
-101-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(9) Failing to file a properly completed notice of abandonment of a water
well required by subsection (8) of section 46-602.
Sec. 266. Section 46-1301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1301 The Legislature finds that (1) existing monitoring of ground water
quality performed by natural resources districts is excellent and deserves
recognition, (2) substantial efforts have been undertaken by the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy to monitor surface water
quality, and (3) it is within the state's capacity to develop a comprehensive,
integrated statewide water quality monitoring system.
Sec. 267. Section 46-1304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1304 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy shall prepare a report outlining the extent of ground water quality
monitoring conducted by natural resources districts during the preceding
calendar year. The department shall analyze the data collected for the purpose
of determining whether or not ground water quality is degrading or improving
and shall present the results electronically to the Natural Resources Committee
of the Legislature beginning December 1, 2001, and each year thereafter. The
districts shall submit in a timely manner all ground water quality monitoring
data collected to the department or its designee. The department shall use the
data submitted by the districts in conjunction with all other readily available
and compatible data for the purposes of the annual ground water quality trend
analysis.
Sec. 268. Section 46-1403, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1403 There is hereby created the Water Well Decommissioning Fund. The
State Treasurer shall credit to the fund for the uses and purposes of sections
46-1401 to 46-1405 such money as is specifically appropriated and such funds,
fees, donations, gifts, services, or devises or bequests of real or personal
property received by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources from any source, federal, state, public, or private, to be used by
the department for the purpose of accelerating the decommissioning of illegal
water wells. The department shall allocate money from the fund for purposes of
sections 46-1401 to 46-1405. The fund shall be exempt from provisions relating
to lapsing of appropriations. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Water Well
Decommissioning Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 269. Section 46-1404, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1404 The Water Well Decommissioning Fund shall be allocated by
contractual agreement with natural resources districts for the purpose of
accelerating the decommissioning of illegal water wells throughout the state.
The allocations each fiscal year shall be made by the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources to natural resources districts in a
proportion based on the number of illegal water wells decommissioned in each
district in the previous fiscal year which were part of the district's cost-
share program to the total number of illegal water wells decommissioned in the
state in the previous fiscal year which were part of a district cost-share
program. Subsequent allocations for any district which has had a cost-share
program for three or more consecutive years shall be based upon the previous
three-year average. The allocations may be adjusted on or after March 1 of any
year if the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
determines that one or more districts cannot reasonably be expected to use
their full allocation for that fiscal year. Actual disbursement to each
district shall be on a reimbursement basis and shall not exceed the amount
expended by the district consistent with sections 46-1401 to 46-1405. The
Nebraska Natural Resources Commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out such sections.
Sec. 270. Section 46-1502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1502 For purposes of the Wellhead Protection Area Act:
(1) Controlling entity means a city, a village, a natural resources
district, a rural water district, any other entity, including, but not limited
to, a privately owned public water supply system, or any combination thereof
operating under an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the
Joint Public Agency Act that operates a public water supply system;
(2) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(3) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy; and
(4) Wellhead protection area means the surface and subsurface area
surrounding a water well or well field, supplying a public water system,
through which contaminants are reasonably likely to move toward and reach such
water well or well field.
Sec. 271. Section 46-1605, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1605 Alterations means alterations to an existing dam that directly
affect the safety of the dam or reservoir, as determined by the Chief Water
Officer department, but does not include maintenance and repair of the dam to
retain its initial structural integrity.
-102-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Sec. 272. Section 46-1606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1606 Application approval means authorization in writing issued by the
Chief Water Officer department to an owner who has applied to the Chief Water
Officer department for permission to construct, reconstruct, enlarge, alter,
breach, remove, or abandon a dam and which specifies the conditions or
limitations under which work is to be performed by the owner or under which
approval is granted.
Sec. 273. Section 46-1607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1607 Approval to operate means authorization in writing issued by the
Chief Water Officer department to an owner who has completed construction,
reconstruction, enlargement, or alteration of a dam.
Sec. 274. Section 46-1611, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1611 (1) Dam means any artificial barrier, including appurtenant works,
with the ability to impound water, wastewater, or liquid-borne materials and
which (a) is twenty-five feet or more in height from the natural bed of the
stream or watercourse measured at the downstream toe of the barrier, or from
the lowest elevation of the outside limit of the barrier if it is not across a
stream channel or watercourse, to the maximum storage elevation or (b) has an
impounding capacity at maximum storage elevation of fifty acre-feet or more,
except that any barrier described in this subsection which is not in excess of
six feet in height or which has an impounding capacity at maximum storage
elevation of not greater than fifteen acre-feet shall be exempt, unless such
barrier, due to its location or other physical characteristics, is classified
as a high hazard potential dam.
(2) Dam does not include:
(a) An obstruction in a canal used to raise or lower water;
(b) A fill or structure for highway or railroad use, but if such structure
serves, either primarily or secondarily, additional purposes commonly
associated with dams it shall be subject to review by the Chief Water Officer
department;
(c) Canals, including the diversion structure, and levees; or
(d) Water storage or evaporation ponds regulated by the United States
Nuclear Regulatory Commission.
Sec. 275. Section 46-1613, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1613 Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources.
Sec. 276. Section 46-1614, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1614 Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Director means the Director of
Natural Resources.
Sec. 277. Section 46-1636, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1636 The Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act does not relieve the owner
or operator of a dam or reservoir from obtaining any necessary approvals from
the Chief Water Officer department under sections 46-233 to 46-241 or from any
other local, state, or federal regulatory authority.
Sec. 278. Section 46-1637, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1637 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section,
no city, village, or county may, by ordinance or resolution enacted by the
legislative body thereof or adopted by the people, (a) regulate, supervise, or
provide for the regulation or supervision of any dams and associated reservoirs
or the construction, reconstruction, enlargement, repair, alteration,
operation, breach, removal, or abandonment thereof or (b) limit the size or the
impounding capacity of a dam if such action would conflict with the power and
authority vested in the Chief Water Officer department pursuant to the Safety
of Dams and Reservoirs Act.
(2) A city, village, or county may adopt ordinances or resolutions (a)
regulating, supervising, or providing for the regulation or supervision of dams
and reservoirs that are not within the state's jurisdiction and are not subject
to regulation, owned, or operated by another public agency or body or (b) which
apply only to adjacent structures not germane to the safety of the dam, such
as, but not limited to, roads and fences.
(3) A city, village, or county may institute overlay zoning precluding
construction of structures downstream of a state-permitted dam that is
classified as having other than a high hazard potential if a breach-inundation
study performed by an engineer, in accordance with generally accepted
engineering practice, determines that construction of such structures would
require that such dam be reclassified as having a high hazard potential. The
owners of such dam shall provide such engineering study as a condition to
requesting such overlay zoning.
(4) The Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act does not preempt or supersede
any local zoning ordinances, resolutions, rules, or regulations regarding
special use permits enacted by a political subdivision with respect to permit
applications for livestock waste control facilities.
Sec. 279. Section 46-1639, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1639 (1) No action shall be brought against the state, the Chief Water
-103-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Officer, the department, or its agents or employees for the recovery of damages
caused by the partial or total failure of any dam by reason of control and
regulation thereof pursuant to the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act,
including, but not limited to, any of the following:
(a) Design and construction application approval of the dam or approval of
interim flood routing plans during construction, reconstruction, enlargement,
alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment;
(b) The issuance or enforcement of orders relative to maintenance or
operation of the dam;
(c) Control and regulation of the dam;
(d) Measures taken to protect against failure of the dam during an
emergency, except for negligent acts of the department or the Chief Water
Officer in assuming control of a dam during an emergency; or
(e) Failure to act.
(2) The Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act does not relieve an owner or
operator of a dam of the legal duties, obligations, or liabilities incident to
the ownership or operation of the dam.
Sec. 280. Section 46-1640, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1640 The findings and orders of the Chief Water Officer department, an
application approval, and an approval to operate any dam issued by the Chief
Water Officer department are final, conclusive, and binding upon all owners and
state agencies, regulatory or otherwise, as to the safety of design,
construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or
abandonment of any dam.
The Chief Water Officer department may report all dam incidents as defined
by the National Performance of Dams Program to the National Performance of Dams
Program archive.
Sec. 281. Section 46-1641, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1641 The owner of any dam subject to the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs
Act shall notify the Chief Water Officer department of any change in the
ownership of the dam. Notification shall be in such form and include such
evidence of ownership as the Chief Water Officer director may by rule and
regulation require.
Sec. 282. Section 46-1642, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1642 An applicant for a permit for a livestock waste control facility
which includes a dam, holding pond, or lagoon for which approval by the Chief
Water Officer Department of Natural Resources is not otherwise required but for
which approval by the Department of Environment and Energy under section
54-2429 is required shall submit an application for approval along with plans,
drawings, and specifications to the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural
Resources and obtain approval from the Chief Water Officer Department of
Natural Resources before beginning construction. The Chief Water Officer
Department of Natural Resources shall approve or deny the dam, holding pond, or
lagoon pursuant to this section within sixty days after such application is
submitted.
Sec. 283. Section 46-1645, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1645 When the safety and technical considerations pertaining to an
application approval, an approval to operate, or the plans and specifications
of a dam require it, or when requested in writing by the owner, the Chief Water
Officer department shall appoint a consulting board of three or more
consultants to report to the Chief Water Officer department on the safety
features involved. The cost and expense of a consulting board, if appointed at
the request of an owner, shall be paid by the owner.
Sec. 284. Section 46-1646, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1646 (1) The Chief Water Officer department shall review and approve
the design, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach,
removal, or abandonment of all dams in the state for the protection of life and
property as provided in the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act.
(2) No person shall construct, reconstruct, enlarge, alter, breach,
remove, or abandon any dam without approval by the Chief Water Officer
department.
(3) An owner of a dam who has entered into a cooperative agreement with
the Chief Water Officer department pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of section
46-1663 shall be deemed to be in compliance with the act.
Sec. 285. Section 46-1647, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1647 (1) In order to protect life and property, the owner of every high
hazard potential dam shall develop and periodically test and update an
emergency action plan to be implemented in the event of an emergency involving
such dam. In order to protect life and property, the Chief Water Officer
department may require the owners of any significant hazard potential dam to
develop and periodically test and update an emergency action plan to be
implemented in the event of an emergency involving such dams.
(2) Such emergency action plan shall include, but not be limited to, the
following elements:
(a) Emergency notification plan with flowchart;
(b) A statement of purpose;
(c) A project description;
-104-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(d) Emergency detection, evaluation, and classification;
(e) General responsibilities;
(f) Preparedness;
(g) Inundation maps or other acceptable description of the inundated area;
and
(h) Appendices.
(3) For purposes of evaluating the adequacy of an emergency action plan,
the Chief Water Officer department shall review, evaluate for adequacy, and
approve or disapprove each emergency action plan submitted under this section.
The Chief Water Officer department shall accept emergency action plans
developed for dams under a federal dam safety program.
(4) If the Chief Water Officer department determines that a dam
constitutes an immediate risk to life or property, the Chief Water Officer
department shall order the owner to take such action as is necessary to remove
such risk.
Sec. 286. Section 46-1648, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1648 In making any investigation or inspection necessary to enforce or
implement the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act, the Chief Water Officer or the
Chief Water Officer's representatives department or its representatives, upon
reasonable notice, may enter upon private property of the dam and reservoir
owner as necessary. Such right of entry shall extend to all employees,
surveyors, or other agents of the department in the official performance of
their duties, and such persons shall not be liable for prosecution for trespass
when performing their official duties.
Sec. 287. Section 46-1649, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1649 (1) The Chief Water Officer department may investigate and gather
or cause the owner to gather such data, including advances made in safety
practices elsewhere, as may be needed for a proper review and study of the
various features of the design, construction, reconstruction, enlargement,
alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of dams.
(2) The Chief Water Officer department may make or cause the owner to make
such watershed investigations and studies as are necessary to keep abreast of
developments affecting runoff and peak storm discharges in the vicinity of a
dam.
(3) The Chief Water Officer department may make or cause the owner to make
such seismic investigations and studies as may be necessary to keep abreast of
developments affecting seismic stability of a dam.
Sec. 288. Section 46-1650, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1650 (1) The Chief Water Officer department may take any administrative
or legal action necessary for the enforcement of the Safety of Dams and
Reservoirs Act.
(2) An action or proceeding under this section may be initiated whenever
any owner or any person acting as an agent of any owner:
(a) Fails to comply with the requirements imposed by the act or by any
application approval, approval to operate, order, rule, regulation, or
requirement of the Chief Water Officer department under the act; or
(b) Commits or allows the commission of violations of the act or of any
application approval, approval to operate, order, rule, regulation, or
requirement of the Chief Water Officer department under the act.
(3) Any action or proceeding under this section shall be initiated either
administratively or in a court in a jurisdiction in which:
(a) The dam, area of hazard potential, or some part thereof exists;
(b) The person named in the complaint has its principal place of business;
or
(c) The person named in the complaint resides.
Sec. 289. Section 46-1651, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1651 (1) The Chief Water Officer department may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations containing standards for the design, inspection,
construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal,
abandonment, and periodic testing of emergency action plans of dams to carry
out the purposes of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act. Such rules and
regulations may also include, but are not limited to, establishing:
(a) Standards and criteria for the siting and design of dams, considering
both existing and projected conditions which may affect the safety of a project
during its construction and operational life;
(b) Requirements for operation of dams, including operational plans to be
prepared and implemented by owners;
(c) Requirements for monitoring, inspection, and reporting of conditions
affecting the safety of dams; and
(d) Requirements for emergency action plans to be prepared and implemented
by owners in cooperation with emergency management authorities.
(2) In adopting rules and regulations applicable to dams which may have a
high hazard potential or a significant hazard potential, the Chief Water
Officer department may consider:
(a) The state of scientific and technological knowledge and good
engineering practices relating to various types of dams;
(b) The economic impact of a failure of a structure upon the state and its
citizens; and
(c) The relationship of dams in hydrologic management in the watershed as
-105-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
a whole.
Sec. 290. Section 46-1652, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1652 (1) Construction of any new dam or the enlargement of any dam
shall not commence until the owner has applied for and obtained from the Chief
Water Officer department written application approval of plans and
specifications.
(2) A separate application for each dam shall be filed with the Chief
Water Officer department upon forms provided by the Chief Water Officer
department. Plans and specifications signed and sealed by the design engineer
shall accompany the application.
(3) The application shall provide the following information:
(a) The name and address of the owner;
(b) The name and address of the applicant, if different from the owner;
(c) The name and address of the operator or other person to be contacted
regarding arrangements for inspections or other matters associated with the
dam;
(d) The location, type, size, purpose, and height of the proposed dam;
(e) The reservoir surface areas and associated storage capacity at
elevation intervals not exceeding two feet;
(f) Plans for proposed permanent instrument installations in the dam;
(g) The area of the drainage basin, rainfall records, streamflow records,
and flood flow records and estimates, if available;
(h) Maps and design drawings showing plans, elevations, and sections of
all principal structures and appurtenant works with other features of the
project in sufficient detail, including design analyses, to determine safety,
adequacy, and suitability of design;
(i) The estimated construction cost of the dam; and
(j) Such other pertinent information as the Chief Water Officer department
requires.
(4) The Chief Water Officer department may, when in the Chief Water
Officer's its judgment it is necessary, also require the following:
(a) Data concerning subsoil and rock foundation conditions and the
materials involved in the construction of the dam;
(b) Investigations of, and reports on, subsurface conditions, exploratory
pits, trenches and adits, drilling, coring, and geophysical tests to measure in
place and in the laboratory the properties and behavior of foundation materials
at the dam site;
(c) Investigations and reports on the geology of the dam site, possible
geologic hazards, seismic activity, faults, weak seams and joints, availability
and quality of construction materials, and other pertinent features; and
(d) Other appropriate information.
(5) If an application is incomplete or defective, it shall be returned to
the applicant to complete or to correct the defects. The application shall be
corrected and returned to the Chief Water Officer department within ninety days
after it is returned to the applicant or within such additional time as may be
allowed by the Chief Water Officer department. If the application is returned
to the Chief Water Officer department after expiration of such time period, it
shall be dismissed.
Sec. 291. Section 46-1653, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1653 (1) Before commencing the reconstruction or alteration of a dam or
the abandonment, breach, or removal of a dam so that it no longer constitutes a
dam, the owner shall file an application and secure the written application
approval of the Chief Water Officer department.
(2) The application shall give such pertinent information or data
concerning the dam as may be required by the Chief Water Officer department.
(3) The application shall give the name and address of the applicant and
shall adequately detail, with appropriate references to the existing dam, the
proposed reconstruction, alteration, abandonment, breach, or removal of the
dam. The application shall be accompanied by plans and specifications signed
and sealed by the design engineer. The Chief Water Officer department may waive
any of the requirements of this section if the requirements are unnecessary for
the application approval.
(4) If an application is incomplete or defective, it shall be returned to
the applicant to complete or to correct the defects. The application shall be
corrected and returned to the Chief Water Officer department within ninety days
after it is returned to the applicant or within such additional time as may be
allowed by the Chief Water Officer department. If the application is returned
to the Chief Water Officer department after expiration of such time period, it
shall be dismissed.
(5) In case of an emergency in which the Chief Water Officer department
declares that repairs or breaching of the dam are necessary to safeguard life
and property, repairs or breaching shall be started immediately by the owner or
by the Chief Water Officer department at the owner's expense. The Chief Water
Officer department shall be notified within twenty-four hours of emergency
repairs or breaching when instituted by the owner.
(6) The proposed repairs or breaching shall conform to any orders issued
by the Chief Water Officer department.
Sec. 292. Section 46-1654, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1654 (1) Approval of applications for which approval under sections
46-233 to 46-242 is not required shall be issued within ninety days after
-106-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
receipt of the completed application plus any extensions of time required to
resolve matters diligently pursued by the applicant. At the discretion of the
Chief Water Officer department, one or more public hearings may be held on an
application.
(2) Approval of applications under the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act,
for which approval under sections 46-233 to 46-242 is required, shall not be
issued until all pending matters before the Chief Water Officer department
under the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act or such sections have been resolved
and approved.
(3) Application approval shall be granted with terms, conditions, and
limitations necessary to safeguard life and property.
(4) If actual construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration,
breach, removal, or abandonment of the dam is not commenced within the time
established by the Chief Water Officer department, the application approval
becomes void, except that the Chief Water Officer department may, upon written
application and for good cause shown, extend the time for commencing
construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or
abandonment. If approval under sections 46-233 to 46-242 is also required, the
Chief Water Officer department may not extend the time for commencing
construction without following the procedures and granting a similar extension
under subsection (2) of section 46-238.
(5) Written notice shall be provided to the Chief Water Officer department
at least ten days before construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration,
breach, removal, or abandonment is to begin and such other notices shall be
given to the Chief Water Officer department as the Chief Water Officer it may
require.
Sec. 293. Section 46-1655, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1655 (1) The application for approval of construction, reconstruction,
enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of a dam shall be
accompanied by a filing fee as established by rule and regulation of the Chief
Water Officer department but not to exceed (a) two hundred dollars for a dam
less than twenty-five feet in height, (b) three hundred dollars for a dam
twenty-five feet in height to not more than fifty feet in height, and (c) four
hundred dollars for a dam in excess of fifty feet in height.
(2) Only one filing fee shall be collected for an enlargement by
flashboards, sandbags, earthen levees, gates, or other works, devices, or
obstructions which are from time to time to be removed and replaced or opened
and shut and thereby operated so as to vary the surface elevation of the
reservoir.
(3) A dam subject to the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act and for which
plans and specifications have been approved prior to September 4, 2005, shall
not be required to pay any additional fee or submit an additional application
for approval unless such dam requires reconstruction, enlargement, alteration,
breach, removal, or abandonment.
(4) An application shall not be considered by the Chief Water Officer
department until the filing fee is received.
(5) Fees collected by the department under this section shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Dam Safety Cash Fund.
Sec. 294. Section 46-1656, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1656 The Dam Safety Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of
fees credited pursuant to section 46-1655 and any money specifically
appropriated to the fund by the Legislature. Money in the fund shall not be
subject to any fiscal-year limitation or provision for lapse of unexpended
balance at the end of any fiscal year or biennium. The fund shall be
administered by the department. Money in the fund may be expended by the
department for costs incurred by the department or the Chief Water Officer in
the administration of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 295. Section 46-1657, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1657 (1) Upon completion of a new or reconstructed dam and reservoir or
of the enlargement of a dam and reservoir, the owner shall file with the Chief
Water Officer department, without a filing fee, a completion certification
accompanied by supplementary drawings or descriptive matter signed and sealed
by the design engineer, showing or describing the work as actually completed.
Such supplementary materials may include, but need not be limited to, the
following as determined by the Chief Water Officer department:
(a) A record of all geological boreholes and grout holes and grouting;
(b) A record of permanent location points, benchmarks, and instruments
embedded in the structure;
(c) A record of tests of concrete or other material used in the
construction, reconstruction, or enlargement of the dam; and
(d) A record of initial seepage flows and embedded instrument readings.
(2) In connection with the enlargement of a dam, the supplementary
drawings and descriptive matter need apply only to the new work.
(3) An approval to operate shall be issued by the Chief Water Officer
department upon a finding by the Chief Water Officer department that the dam is
safe to impound within the limitations prescribed in the application approval.
No impoundment by the structure shall occur prior to issuance of the approval
-107-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
to operate.
Sec. 296. Section 46-1658, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1658 (1) Upon completion of the alteration of any dam, the owner shall
file with the Chief Water Officer department a completion certification
accompanied by supplementary drawings or descriptive matter, as determined by
the Chief Water Officer department, signed and sealed by the design engineer,
showing or describing the work as actually completed.
(2) An approval to operate shall be issued upon a finding by the Chief
Water Officer department that the dam is safe to impound within the limitations
prescribed in the application approval. Pending issuance of a new or revised
approval to operate, the owner of the dam shall not cause the dam to impound
beyond the limitations prescribed in the existing application approval.
Sec. 297. Section 46-1659, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1659 (1) Upon completion of the removal, breach, or abandonment of a
dam, the design engineer shall file with the Chief Water Officer department a
completion certification.
(2) Before final approval of the removal of a dam is issued, the Chief
Water Officer department may inspect the site of the work and determine that
all work was accomplished in substantial conformance with the application
approval.
(3) Following the removal of a dam, the Chief Water Officer department may
report such removal to the National Performance of Dams Program and to the
National Inventory of Dams.
Sec. 298. Section 46-1660, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1660 (1) Each approval to operate issued by the Chief Water Officer
department under the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act shall contain such terms
and conditions as the Chief Water Officer department may prescribe.
(2) The Chief Water Officer department shall revoke, suspend, or amend any
approval to operate whenever it determines that the dam constitutes a danger to
life and property.
(3) Before any approval to operate is revoked by the Chief Water Officer
department, the Chief Water Officer department shall hold a public hearing.
Written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be mailed to the
owner at least thirty days before the date set for the hearing. Any interested
persons may appear at the hearing and present their views and objections to the
proposed action.
Sec. 299. Section 46-1661, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1661 (1) Upon receipt of a written complaint alleging that the person
or property of the complainant is endangered by the construction,
reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of any
dam, the Chief Water Officer department shall cause an inspection and
investigation to be made unless the data, records, and inspection reports on
file are found adequate to make a determination whether the complaint is valid.
The complainant shall be provided with a copy of the official report of the
inspection and investigation.
(2) If it is found that an unsafe condition exists, the Chief Water
Officer department shall notify the owner of the dam to take such action as is
necessary to correct the condition, including breaching or removal of any dam
found to be beyond repair.
Sec. 300. Section 46-1662, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1662 (1) During the construction, reconstruction, enlargement,
alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of any dam, the Chief Water Officer
department may make periodic inspections for the purpose of ascertaining
compliance with the approved plans and specifications. The Chief Water Officer
department shall require the owner to direct the design engineer to provide
adequate supervision during construction, reconstruction, enlargement,
alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment and to provide sufficient
information to enable the Chief Water Officer department to determine that
conformity with the approved plans and specifications is being attained.
(2) If, after any inspection or investigation, during the construction,
reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of a
dam or at any time prior to issuance of an approval to operate, it is found by
the Chief Water Officer department that modifications or changes are necessary
to ensure the safety of the dam, the Chief Water Officer department shall order
the owner to revise his or her plans and specifications. The owner may,
pursuant to section 46-1645, request an independent consulting board to review
the order of the Chief Water Officer department.
(3) If at any time during construction, reconstruction, enlargement,
alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of any dam, the Chief Water Officer
department finds that the work is not being done in accordance with the
approved plans and specifications, the Chief Water Officer department shall
deliver a written notice of noncompliance to the owner. The notice shall be
delivered by registered mail or by personal service to the owner, shall state
the particulars in which the approved plans and specifications are not being or
have not been complied with, and shall order immediate compliance with the
approved plans and specifications. The Chief Water Officer department may order
that no further work be done until such compliance has been effected and
approved by the department.
-108-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(4) Failure to comply with the notice delivered under subsection (3) of
this section may cause revocation of application approval by the Chief Water
Officer department. If compliance with the notice has not occurred within sixty
days after the date of the notice, the Chief Water Officer department shall
order the incomplete structure removed sufficiently to eliminate any safety
hazard to life.
Sec. 301. Section 46-1663, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1663 (1) The Chief Water Officer department shall require owners to
keep original records and any modifications to construction available and in
good order.
(2) The Chief Water Officer department may:
(a) Adopt such rules and regulations and issue such orders as necessary to
secure adequate maintenance, operation, and inspection by owners;
(b) Require engineering and geologic investigations to safeguard life and
property;
(c) Accept approvals and reports of equivalent inspections prepared for
dams under a federal dam safety program; and
(d) Enter into cooperative agreements with the owners of dams which are
required to comply with a federal dam safety program that has objectives,
standards, and requirements that meet or exceed the purposes of the Safety of
Dams and Reservoirs Act.
Sec. 302. Section 46-1664, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1664 (1) The Chief Water Officer department shall inspect dams for the
purpose of determining their safety. The normal inspection frequency shall be
annually for high hazard potential dams, biennially for significant hazard
potential dams, and every five years for low hazard potential dams and every
five years or more for minimal hazard potential dams. The Chief Water Officer
department may vary the inspection frequency of some sites based on an
evaluation of the site performance history. The Chief Water Officer department
may conduct additional inspections at any time. If serious safety concerns are
found by the Chief Water Officer department during the inspections, the Chief
Water Officer department shall require the owner to conduct tests and
investigations sufficient for the Chief Water Officer department to determine
the condition of the dam. After review of the tests or investigations, the
Chief Water Officer department may require modification, removal, or breach of
the dam or alteration of operating procedures to restore or improve the safety
of the dam and may require installation of instrumentation to monitor the
performance of the dam.
(2) The Chief Water Officer department may report the results of dam
inspections that determine unsafe conditions or noncompliance to the National
Performance of Dams Program.
Sec. 303. Section 46-1665, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1665 (1) The owner of a dam has the primary responsibility for
determining when an emergency exists. When the owner of a dam determines that
an emergency exists involving a dam, the owner shall immediately implement the
emergency action plan as required pursuant to section 46-1647. The owner shall
immediately notify any persons who may be endangered if the dam should fail,
notify emergency management organizations in the area, take necessary remedial
action to prevent or mitigate the consequences of failure, and notify the Chief
Water Officer department. The Chief Water Officer department shall take any
remedial action necessary to protect life and property if, in the Chief Water
Officer's its judgment, either:
(a) The condition of any dam is so dangerous to the safety of life or
property as not to permit time for the issuance and enforcement of an order
relative to maintenance or operation; or
(b) Passing or imminent floods or any other condition threatens the safety
of any dam.
(2) In applying the remedial means provided for in this section, the Chief
Water Officer department may in an emergency, with the Chief Water Officer's
its own forces or by other means at the Chief Water Officer's its disposal, do
any or all of the following:
(a) Take full charge and control of any dam;
(b) Lower the water level by releasing water from the reservoir;
(c) Completely drain the reservoir;
(d) Perform any necessary remedial or protective work at the site; or
(e) Take such other steps as may be essential to safeguard life and
property.
(3) The Chief Water Officer department shall continue in full charge and
control of such dam and its appurtenant works until they are rendered safe or
the emergency occasioning the action has ceased and the owner is able to take
back full charge and control. The Chief Water Officer's department's taking
full charge and control under this section does not relieve the owner of such
dam of liability for any negligent acts of such owner.
(4) The Chief Water Officer department may report emergency actions
involving the safety of a dam to the National Performance of Dams Program in a
timely manner.
Sec. 304. Section 46-1666, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1666 (1) Violation of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act or of any
application approval, approval to operate, order, rule, regulation, or
-109-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
requirement of the Chief Water Officer department under the act is a Class V
misdemeanor. Each day that the violation continues constitutes a separate and
distinct offense.
(2) Any person who willfully obstructs, hinders, or prevents the Chief
Water Officer department from performing the duties imposed by the act commits
a Class IV misdemeanor.
(3) Any owner or any person who engages in the construction,
reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of any
dam or who knowingly does work on or permits work to be done on the dam without
the approval of the Chief Water Officer department or in violation of the act
and who fails to immediately notify the Chief Water Officer department thereof
commits a Class V misdemeanor.
Sec. 305. Section 46-1667, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1667 (1) If the Chief Water Officer department has reason to believe
that an owner or other person is violating or has violated the Safety of Dams
and Reservoirs Act, an application approval, an approval to operate, a rule, a
regulation, an order, or a requirement of the Chief Water Officer department
issued or adopted pursuant to the act, the Chief Water Officer department shall
give the owner or person written notice by certified mail that the owner or
person appears to be in violation of the act. The owner or other person shall
have thirty days from the mailing of such notice to respond or to request a
hearing before the Chief Water Officer department as to why the owner or other
person should not be ordered to cease and desist from the violation. The notice
shall inform the owner or other person how to request the hearing and the
consequences of failure to request a hearing.
(2) If the Chief Water Officer department finds that an owner or person is
constructing, reconstructing, enlarging, altering, breaching, removing, or
abandoning a dam without having first obtained the required application
approval, the Chief Water Officer department shall issue a temporary order for
the owner or person to cease and desist the construction, reconstruction,
enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment pending final action
by the Chief Water Officer department pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section. The temporary order shall include written notice by certified mail to
the owner or person of the time and date set by the Chief Water Officer
department for a hearing to show cause why the temporary order should be
vacated.
(3) After a response to a notice or a hearing pursuant to subsection (1)
or (2) of this section or after the expiration of time to request a hearing,
the Chief Water Officer department shall issue a decision and final order. The
decision and final order may take such form as the Chief Water Officer
department determines to be reasonable and appropriate and may include a
determination of violation, a cease and desist order, the recommendation of a
civil penalty, and an order directing that positive steps be taken to abate or
ameliorate any harm or damage arising from the violation. The owner or person
affected may appeal the hearing decision as provided in section 61-207.
(4) If the owner or person continues the violation after the Chief Water
Officer department has issued a final decision and order pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section or a temporary order pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, the Chief Water Officer department may apply for a temporary
restraining order or preliminary or permanent injunction from a court of
competent jurisdiction. A decision to seek injunctive relief does not preclude
other forms of relief or enforcement against the violator.
Sec. 306. Section 46-1668, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1668 (1) Any person who violates the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act
or an application approval, an approval to operate, a rule, a regulation, an
order, or a requirement of the Chief Water Officer department under the act may
be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars per
day for each day the violation continues.
(2) The Chief Water Officer department shall bring an action to recover a
penalty imposed under this section in a court in the jurisdiction in which the
violation occurred.
(3) In determining the amount of the penalty, the court shall consider the
degree of harm to the public, whether the violation was knowing or willful, the
past conduct of the defendant, whether the defendant has taken steps to cease,
remove, or mitigate the violation, and any other relevant information.
Sec. 307. Section 46-1669, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1669 Any affected person aggrieved by any final order or decision made
by the Chief Water Officer director pursuant to the Safety of Dams and
Reservoirs Act may appeal the order as provided in section 61-207. For purposes
of this section, affected person means the applicant or holder of any approvals
under the act and any owner of an estate or interest in or concerning land or
water whose interest is or may be impacted in a direct and significant manner
by such final order or decision.
Sec. 308. Section 46-1670, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1670 (1) Every owner of a dam subject to the Safety of Dams and
Reservoirs Act that was completed prior to September 4, 2005, and not
previously approved by the department when departmental approval was otherwise
required shall file an application with the Chief Water Officer department for
approval of such dam.
-110-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(2) A separate application for each dam shall be filed with the Chief
Water Officer department upon forms supplied by the Chief Water Officer
department and shall include such appropriate information concerning the dam as
the Chief Water Officer department requires.
(3) The Chief Water Officer department may give notice, by certified mail
to the owner's last address of record in the office of the county assessor of
the county in which the dam is located, to the owner of dams required under
this section to file an application who or which have failed to do so, and a
failure to file within sixty days after receipt of such notice shall be
punishable as provided in the act.
(4) The Chief Water Officer department may make inspections of such dams
and may require owners of such dams and reservoirs to perform, at the owner's
expense, such work or tests as may reasonably be required to disclose
information sufficient to enable the Chief Water Officer department to
determine whether to issue an approval to operate or to issue orders directing
further work at the owner's expense necessary to safeguard life and property.
For this purpose, the Chief Water Officer department may require an owner to
lower the water level of or to drain the reservoir.
(5) If, upon inspection or upon completion to the satisfaction of the
Chief Water Officer department of all work ordered, the Chief Water Officer
department finds that the dam is safe to impound, an approval to operate shall
be issued.
(6) If at any time the Chief Water Officer department finds that the dam
is not safe to impound, the Chief Water Officer department shall notify the
owner in writing and shall set a time and place for hearing on the matter. The
owner of such dam shall ensure that such dam does not impound following receipt
of such notice. Written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be
mailed, at least thirty days prior to the date set for the hearing, to the
owner. Any interested person may appear at the hearing and present his or her
views and objections to the proposed action.
Sec. 309. Section 49-506, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
49-506 After the Secretary of State has made the distribution provided by
section 49-503, he or she shall deliver additional copies of the session laws
and the journal of the Legislature pursuant to this section in print or
electronic format as he or she determines, upon recommendation by the Clerk of
the Legislature and approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.
One copy of the session laws shall be delivered to the Lieutenant
Governor, the State Treasurer, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Reporter of
Decisions, the State Court Administrator, the State Fire Marshal, the
Department of Administrative Services, the Department of Agriculture, the
Department of Banking and Finance, the State Department of Education, the
Department of Environment and Energy, the Department of Insurance, the
Department of Labor, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of
Revenue, the Department of Transportation, the Department of Veterans' Affairs,
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources, the
Military Department, the Nebraska State Patrol, the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice, each of the Nebraska state colleges, the Game
and Parks Commission, the Nebraska Library Commission, the Nebraska Liquor
Control Commission, the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission, the
Public Service Commission, the State Real Estate Commission, the Nebraska State
Historical Society, the Public Employees Retirement Board, the Risk Manager,
the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, the Public Counsel, the materiel division of
the Department of Administrative Services, the State Records Administrator, the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services, the Tax
Equalization and Review Commission, the inmate library at all state penal and
correctional institutions, the Commission on Public Advocacy, and the Library
of Congress; two copies to the Governor, the Secretary of State, the Commission
of Industrial Relations, and the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education, one of which shall be for use by the community colleges; three
copies to the Department of Health and Human Services; four copies to the
Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse; five copies to the Attorney General; nine
copies to the Revisor of Statutes; sixteen copies to the Supreme Court and the
Legislative Council; and thirty-five copies to the University of Nebraska
College of Law.
One copy of the journal of the Legislature shall be delivered to the
Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the State Treasurer, the Auditor of Public
Accounts, the Reporter of Decisions, the State Court Administrator, the
Nebraska State Historical Society, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, the Tax
Equalization and Review Commission, the Commission on Public Advocacy, and the
Library of Congress; two copies to the Secretary of State and the Commission of
Industrial Relations; four copies to the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse;
five copies to the Attorney General and the Revisor of Statutes; eight copies
to the Clerk of the Legislature; thirteen copies to the Supreme Court and the
Legislative Council; and thirty-five copies to the University of Nebraska
College of Law. The remaining copies shall be delivered to the State Librarian
who shall use the same, so far as required for exchange purposes, in building
up the State Library and in the manner specified in sections 49-507 to 49-509.
Sec. 310. Section 49-617, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
49-617 The Revisor of Statutes shall cause the statutes to be printed. The
printer shall deliver all completed copies to the Supreme Court. These copies
shall be held and disposed of by the court as follows: Sixty copies to the
-111-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
State Library to exchange for statutes of other states; five copies to the
State Library to keep for daily use; not to exceed twenty-five copies to the
Legislative Council for bill drafting and related services to the Legislature
and executive state officers; as many copies to the Attorney General as he or
she has attorneys on his or her staff; as many copies to the Commission on
Public Advocacy as it has attorneys on its staff; up to sixteen copies to the
State Court Administrator; thirteen copies to the Tax Commissioner; eight
copies to the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse; six copies to the Public
Service Commission; four copies to the Secretary of State; three copies to the
Tax Equalization and Review Commission; four copies to the Clerk of the
Legislature for use in his or her office and three copies to be maintained in
the legislative chamber, one copy on each side of the chamber and one copy at
the desk of the Clerk of the Legislature, under control of the sergeant at
arms; three copies to the Department of Health and Human Services; two copies
each to the Governor of the state, the Chief Justice and each judge of the
Supreme Court, each judge of the Court of Appeals, the Clerk of the Supreme
Court, the Reporter of Decisions, the Commissioner of Labor, the Auditor of
Public Accounts, and the Revisor of Statutes; one copy each to the Secretary of
State of the United States, each Indian tribal court located in the State of
Nebraska, the library of the Supreme Court of the United States, the Adjutant
General, the Air National Guard, the Commissioner of Education, the State
Treasurer, the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, the Director of
Agriculture, the Director of Administrative Services, the Director of Economic
Development, the director of the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems,
the Director-State Engineer, the Director of Banking and Finance, the Director
of Insurance, the Director of Motor Vehicles, the Director of Veterans'
Affairs, the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources, the
Director of Correctional Services, the Nebraska Emergency Operating Center,
each judge of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, each commissioner of
the Commission of Industrial Relations, the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission,
the State Real Estate Commission, the secretary of the Game and Parks
Commission, the Board of Pardons, each state institution under the Department
of Health and Human Services, each state institution under the State Department
of Education, the State Surveyor, the Nebraska State Patrol, the materiel
division of the Department of Administrative Services, the personnel division
of the Department of Administrative Services, the Nebraska Motor Vehicle
Industry Licensing Board, the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges,
each of the Nebraska state colleges, each district judge of the State of
Nebraska, each judge of the county court, each judge of a separate juvenile
court, the Lieutenant Governor, each United States Senator from Nebraska, each
United States Representative from Nebraska, each clerk of the district court
for the use of the district court, the clerk of the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court, each clerk of the county court, each county attorney, each
county public defender, each county law library, and the inmate library at all
state penal and correctional institutions, and each member of the Legislature
shall be entitled to two complete sets, and two complete sets of such volumes
as are necessary to update previously issued volumes, but each member of the
Legislature and each judge of any court referred to in this section shall be
entitled, on request, to an additional complete set. Copies of the statutes
distributed without charge, as listed in this section, shall be the property of
the state or governmental subdivision of the state and not the personal
property of the particular person receiving a copy. Distribution of statutes to
the library of the College of Law of the University of Nebraska shall be as
provided in sections 85-176 and 85-177.
Sec. 311. Section 54-2417, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2417 For purposes of the Livestock Waste Management Act:
(1) Animal feeding operation means a location where beef cattle, dairy
cattle, horses, swine, sheep, poultry, or other livestock have been, are, or
will be stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period and crops, vegetation, forage growth,
or post-harvest residues are not sustained in the normal growing season over
any portion of the location. Two or more animal feeding operations under common
ownership are deemed to be a single animal feeding operation if they are
adjacent to each other or if they utilize a common area or system for the
disposal of livestock waste. Animal feeding operation does not include
aquaculture as defined in section 2-3804.01;
(2) Best management practices means schedules of activities, prohibitions,
maintenance procedures, and other management practices found to be the most
effective methods based on the best available technology achievable for
specific sites to prevent or reduce the discharge of pollutants to waters of
the state and control odor where appropriate. Best management practices also
includes operating procedures and practices to control site runoff, spillage,
leaks, sludge or waste disposal, or drainage from raw material storage;
(3) Construct means the initiation of physical onsite activities;
(4) Construction and operating permit means the state permit to construct
and operate a livestock waste control facility, including conditions imposed on
the livestock waste control facility and the associated animal feeding
operation;
(5) Construction approval means an approval issued prior to December 1,
2006, by the department allowing construction of a livestock waste control
facility;
(6) Council means the Environmental Quality Council;
-112-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(7) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(8) Discharge means the spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting,
emptying, or dumping of pollutants into any waters of the state or in a place
which will likely reach waters of the state;
(9) Existing livestock waste control facility means a livestock waste
control facility in existence prior to April 15, 1998, that does not hold a
permit and which has requested an inspection prior to January 1, 2000;
(10) Livestock waste control facility means any structure or combination
of structures utilized to control livestock waste at an animal feeding
operation until it can be used, recycled, or disposed of in an environmentally
acceptable manner. Such structures include, but are not limited to, diversion
terraces, holding ponds, debris basins, liquid manure storage pits, lagoons,
and other such devices utilized to control livestock waste;
(11) Major modification means an expansion or increase to the lot area or
feeding area; change in the location of the animal feeding operation; change in
the methods of waste treatment, waste storage, or land application of waste;
increase in the number of animals; change in animal species; or change in the
size or location of the livestock waste control facility;
(12) National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit means either a
general permit or an individual permit issued by the department pursuant to
subsection (11) of section 81-1505. A general permit authorizes categories of
disposal practices or livestock waste control facilities and covers a
geographic area corresponding to existing geographic or political boundaries,
though it may exclude specified areas from coverage. General permits are
limited to the same or similar types of animal feeding operations or livestock
waste control facilities which require the same or similar monitoring and, in
the opinion of the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy, are more appropriately controlled under a general permit than under an
individual permit;
(13) New animal feeding operation means an animal feeding operation
constructed after July 16, 2004;
(14) New livestock waste control facility means any livestock waste
control facility for which a construction permit, an operating permit, a
National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, a construction
approval, or a construction and operating permit, or an application therefor,
is submitted on or after April 15, 1998;
(15) Operating permit means a permit issued prior to December 1, 2006, by
the department after the completion of the livestock waste control facility in
accordance with the construction approval and the submittal of a completed
certification form to the department;
(16) Person has the same meaning as in section 81-1502; and
(17) Waters of the state has the same meaning as in section 81-1502.
Sec. 312. Section 54-2421, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2421 A map delineating segments and watershed boundaries for cold water
class A streams, as designated prior to May 25, 1999, and prepared by the
department Department of Environment and Energy and the Department of Natural
Resources, shall be maintained by the department Department of Environment and
Energy and used by the department for determinations made concerning cold water
class A streams and stream watersheds under the Livestock Waste Management Act
unless changed by the council. Beginning on May 25, 1999, the council may
designate and may redesignate previously designated waters of this state as
cold water class A streams for purposes of the act based on the determination
by the council that the waters provide or could provide habitat of sufficient
water volume or flow, water quality, substrate composition, and water
temperature capable of maintaining year-round populations of cold water biota,
including reproduction of a salmonoid (trout) population. The council shall not
designate or redesignate a stream as a cold water class A stream unless the
stream has supported the reproduction of a salmonoid (trout) population within
the previous five years. The department shall revise and maintain the cold
water class A stream and stream watershed map to incorporate all designations
and redesignations of the council.
Sec. 313. Section 54-2429, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2429 (1) An applicant for a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination
System permit or a construction and operating permit under the Environmental
Protection Act or the Livestock Waste Management Act shall not be issued a
permit until the applicant has obtained , before issuance by the Department of
Environment and Energy, obtain any necessary approvals from the Chief Water
Officer Department of Natural Resources under the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs
Act and certify such approvals to the Department of Environment and Energy. The
department Department of Environment and Energy, with the concurrence of the
Department of Natural Resources, may require the applicant to obtain approval
from the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources for any dam,
holding pond, or lagoon structure which would not otherwise require approval
under the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act but which in the event of a failure
could result in a significant discharge into waters of the state and have a
significant impact on the environment. The Department of Environment and Energy
may provide for the payment of such costs of the Department of Natural
Resources with revenue generated under section 54-2428.
(2) An applicant required to obtain a National Pollutant Discharge
Elimination System permit is subject to the requirements of the Engineers and
-113-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Architects Regulation Act.
(3) An applicant who has a large concentrated animal feeding operation, as
defined in 40 C.F.R. 122 and 123, as such regulations existed on January 1,
2004, and who is required to obtain a construction and operating permit is
subject to the requirements of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act.
(4) An applicant who has a small or medium animal feeding operation, as
defined in 40 C.F.R. 122 and 123, as such regulations existed on January 1,
2004, and who is required to obtain a construction and operating permit, but
not required to obtain a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System
permit, is exempt from the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act.
(5) The department may require an engineering evaluation or assessment
performed by a licensed professional engineer for a livestock waste control
facility if after an inspection: (a) The department determines that the
facility has (i) visible signs of structural breakage below the permanent pool,
(ii) signs of discharge or proven discharge due to structural weakness, (iii)
improper maintenance, or (iv) inadequate capacity; or (b) the department has
reason to believe that an animal feeding operation with a livestock waste
control facility has violated or threatens to violate the Environmental
Protection Act, the Livestock Waste Management Act, or any rules or regulations
adopted and promulgated under such acts. Animal feeding operations not required
to have a permit under the Environmental Protection Act, the Livestock Waste
Management Act, or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant
to such acts are exempt from the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act.
Sec. 314. Section 54-2430, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2430 (1) Except as provided in this section, no new livestock waste
control facility shall be constructed and no physical onsite activities
specific to a new livestock waste control facility, except the use of a borrow
site for construction of other components of the animal feeding operation,
shall be initiated unless surface water runoff from the upstream area, except
incidental runoff, is adequately diverted around the structure and is not
permitted to enter the reservoir area. For purposes of this section, incidental
runoff means the runoff that drains from the slope of the embankments, the top
of the dam, the reservoir area, the feedlots, the associated roadways, and up
to twenty-five acres of additional area that cannot be diverted. Incidental
runoff capacity from a twenty-five-year frequency, twenty-four-hour storm shall
be provided for in the waste reservoir in addition to the capacity required for
the waste effluent or stored materials.
(2) The department Department of Natural Resources shall permit a
requested increase in the twenty-five-acre limitation for a new livestock waste
control facility for an animal feeding operation for which an inspection was
requested prior to January 1, 2000, unless the department determines that the
detriment to existing water users that would result from permitting the acreage
increase would outweigh the detriment to the operator of the animal feeding
operation if the increase were not permitted.
(3) For other new livestock waste control facilities, the department
Department of Natural Resources may permit an increase in the twenty-five-acre
limitation if it determines that (a) the applicant has no reasonable way to
limit the amount of the additional runoff acreage to twenty-five acres or less
at the proposed location of the livestock waste control facility, (b) the
applicant has no reasonable alternative for relocating the livestock waste
control facility so that the additional runoff acreage would not exceed twenty-
five acres, and (c) either (i) an increase in the permitted runoff acreage
would not reduce water supplies to the detriment of existing water users or
(ii)(A) the requested facility is for a proposed expansion of an animal feeding
operation in existence and in compliance with the Livestock Waste Management
Act as of January 1, 2003, (B) the amount of the runoff acreage permitted in
excess of the twenty-five-acre limitation is not more than fifteen percent of
total permitted feedlot area, and (C) any detriment to existing water users
that would result from permitting the acreage increase would be outweighed by
the detriment to the operator of the animal feeding operation if the increase
were not permitted.
Sec. 315. Section 54-2940, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
54-2940 In carrying out its duties to prevent, suppress, control, and
eradicate dangerous diseases the department may:
(1) Issue quarantines to any person or public or private premises within
the state where an affected animal, suspected affected animal, or regulated
article is or was located, and upon any animal imported into Nebraska in
violation of the Animal Health and Disease Control Act, the Exotic Animal
Auction or Exchange Venue Act, and any importation rules or regulations until
such quarantine is released by the State Veterinarian. Whenever additional
animals are placed within a quarantined premises or area, such quarantine may
be amended accordingly by the department. Births and death loss shall be
included on inventory documentation pursuant to the quarantine;
(2) Regulate or prohibit animal or regulated article movement into,
within, or through the state through quarantines, controlled movement orders,
importation orders, or embargoes as deemed necessary by the State Veterinarian;
(3) Require an affected animal or suspected affected animal to be (a)
euthanized, detained, slaughtered, or sold for immediate slaughter at a
federally inspected slaughter establishment or (b) inspected, tested, treated,
subjected to an epidemiological investigation, monitored, or vaccinated. The
department may require tested animals to be identified by an official
-114-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
identification eartag. Costs for confinement, restraint, and furnishing the
necessary assistance and facilities for such activities shall be the
responsibility of the owner or custodian of the animal;
(4) Seek an emergency proclamation by the Governor in accordance with
section 81-829.40 when deemed appropriate. All state agencies and political
subdivisions of the state shall cooperate with the implementation of any
emergency procedures and measures developed pursuant to such proclamation;
(5)(a) Access records or animals and enter any premises related to the
purposes of the Animal Health and Disease Control Act or the Exotic Animal
Auction or Exchange Venue Act without being subject to any action for trespass
or reasonable damages if reasonable care is exercised; and
(b) Obtain an inspection warrant in the manner prescribed in sections
29-830 to 29-835 if any person refuses to allow the department access or entry
as authorized under this subdivision;
(6) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to enforce and effectuate
the general purpose and provisions of the Animal Health and Disease Control
Act, the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, and any other provisions
the department deems necessary for carrying out its duties under such acts
including:
(a) Standards for program diseases to align with USDA/APHIS/VS program
standards;
(b) Provisions for maintaining a livestock disease reporting system;
(c) Procedures for establishing and maintaining accredited, certified,
validated, or designated disease-free animals, herds, or flocks;
(d) In consultation with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy and the Department of Health and Human Services, best
management practices for the disposal of carcasses of dead livestock;
(e) In consultation with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy and the University of Nebraska, operating procedures
governing composting of livestock carcasses;
(f) Recommendations of where and how any available federal funds and state
personnel and materials are to be allocated for the purpose of program disease
activities; and
(g) Provisions for secure food supply plans to ensure the continuity of
business is maintained during a foreign animal or transboundary disease
outbreak;
(7) When funds are available, develop a livestock emergency response
system capable of coordinating and executing a rapid response to the incursion
or potential incursion of a dangerous livestock disease episode which poses a
threat to the health of the state's livestock and could cause a serious
economic impact on the state, international trade, or both;
(8) When funds are available, support planning for and assistance with
catastrophic livestock mortality disposal, including the acquisition of
equipment and supplies and securing of services, to augment preparedness for
and response to a disease, natural disaster, or other emergency event resulting
in catastrophic livestock mortality or euthanization;
(9) Allow animals intended for direct slaughter to move to a controlled
feedlot for qualified purposes; and
(10) Approve qualified commuter herd agreements and livestock producer
plans and, when appropriate, allow for exceptions to requirements by written
compliance agreements.
Sec. 316. Section 57-1407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1407 (1) After receipt of an application under section 57-1405, the
commission shall:
(a) Within sixty days, schedule a public hearing;
(b) Notify the pipeline carrier of the time, place, and purpose of the
public hearing;
(c) Publish a notice of the time, place, and purpose of the public hearing
in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the
major oil pipeline is to be constructed; and
(d) Serve notice of the public hearing upon the governing bodies of the
counties and municipalities through which the proposed route of the major oil
pipeline would be located as specified in subdivision (2)(d) of section
57-1405.
(2) The commission may hold additional public meetings for the purpose of
receiving input from the public at locations as close as practicable to the
proposed route of the major oil pipeline. The commission shall make the public
input part of the record.
(3) If requested by the commission, the following agencies shall file a
report with the commission, prior to the hearing on the application, regarding
information within the respective agencies' area of expertise relating to the
impact of the major oil pipeline on any area within the respective agencies'
jurisdiction, including in such report opinions regarding the advisability of
approving, denying, or modifying the location of the proposed route of the
major oil pipeline: The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of
Revenue, the Department of Transportation, the Game and Parks Commission, the
Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, the Nebraska State Historical
Society, the State Fire Marshal, and the Board of Educational Lands and Funds.
The agencies may submit a request for reimbursement of reasonable and necessary
expenses incurred for any consultants hired pursuant to this subsection.
(4) An application under the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act shall be
-115-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
approved if the proposed route of the major oil pipeline is determined by the
Public Service Commission to be in the public interest. The pipeline carrier
shall have the burden to establish that the proposed route of the major oil
pipeline would serve the public interest. In determining whether the pipeline
carrier has met its burden, the commission shall not evaluate safety
considerations, including the risk or impact of spills or leaks from the major
oil pipeline, but the commission shall evaluate:
(a) Whether the pipeline carrier has demonstrated compliance with all
applicable state statutes, rules, and regulations and local ordinances;
(b) Evidence of the impact due to intrusion upon natural resources and not
due to safety of the proposed route of the major oil pipeline to the natural
resources of Nebraska, including evidence regarding the irreversible and
irretrievable commitments of land areas and connected natural resources and the
depletion of beneficial uses of the natural resources;
(c) Evidence of methods to minimize or mitigate the potential impacts of
the major oil pipeline to natural resources;
(d) Evidence regarding the economic and social impacts of the major oil
pipeline;
(e) Whether any other utility corridor exists that could feasibly and
beneficially be used for the route of the major oil pipeline;
(f) The impact of the major oil pipeline on the orderly development of the
area around the proposed route of the major oil pipeline;
(g) The reports of the agencies filed pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section; and
(h) The views of the governing bodies of the counties and municipalities
in the area around the proposed route of the major oil pipeline.
Sec. 317. Section 57-1502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1502 For purposes of sections 57-1501 to 57-1503:
(1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(2) Oil pipeline means a pipeline which is larger than eight inches in
inside diameter and which is constructed in Nebraska for the transportation of
petroleum, or petroleum components, products, or wastes, including crude oil or
any fraction of crude oil, within, through, or across Nebraska, but does not
include in-field and gathering lines; and
(3) Pipeline carrier means an individual, a company, a corporation, an
association, or any other legal entity that engages in owning, operating, or
managing an oil pipeline.
Sec. 318. Section 57-1609, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1609 Before issuing a permit, the commission shall consult with the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy and the
Underground Injection Control program permitting authority.
Sec. 319. Section 57-1614, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1614 (1) The commission shall take action to ensure that a storage
facility does not cause pollution or create a nuisance. For the purposes of
this provision and in applying other laws, carbon dioxide streams stored, and
which remain in storage under a commission permit, are not a pollutant and do
not constitute a nuisance.
(2) The commission's authority in subsection (1) of this section does not
limit the jurisdiction held by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy. Nothing else in the Nebraska Geologic Storage of Carbon
Dioxide Act limits the jurisdiction held by the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Environment and Energy.
(3) The commission shall take action to ensure that substances that
compromise the objectives of the act or the integrity of a storage reservoir do
not enter a storage reservoir.
(4) The commission shall take action to ensure that carbon dioxide does
not escape from a storage facility.
Sec. 320. Section 57-1619, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1619 (1) After carbon dioxide injections into a reservoir end and upon
application by the storage operator, the commission shall consider issuing a
certificate of project completion.
(2) The certificate may only be issued after public notice and hearing.
The commission shall establish notice requirements for such hearing.
(3) The certificate may only be issued after the commission has consulted
with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy
and the Underground Injection Control program permitting authority.
(4) The certificate may only be issued if the storage operator:
(a) Is in full compliance with all laws governing the storage facility;
(b) Shows that it has addressed all pending claims regarding the storage
facility's operation;
(c) Shows that it has received an authorization of site closure from the
applicable underground injection control program permitting authority for each
storage facility injection well; and
(d) Shows that any wells, equipment, and facilities to be used in the
post-closure period are in good condition and retain mechanical integrity.
(5) Once a certificate is issued:
(a) Title to the storage facility and to the stored carbon dioxide
transfers, without payment of any compensation, to the State of Nebraska;
-116-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(b) Title acquired by the state includes all rights and interests in, and
all responsibilities associated with, the stored carbon dioxide;
(c) The storage operator and all persons who generated any injected carbon
dioxide streams are released from all regulatory requirements associated with
the storage facility;
(d) Any financial assurance provided by the storage operator shall be
released; and
(e) Monitoring and managing the storage facility is the state's
responsibility to be overseen by the commission.
Sec. 321. Section 58-202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
58-202 (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) The high cost of agricultural loans and the general unavailability of
such loans at favorable rates and terms for farmers, particularly beginning
farmers, and other agricultural enterprises have resulted in decreased crop,
livestock, and business productivity and prevented farmers and other
agricultural enterprises from acquiring modern agricultural equipment and
processes. These problems have made it difficult for farmers and other
agricultural enterprises to maintain or increase their present number of
employees and have decreased the supply of agricultural commodities available
to fulfill the needs of the citizens of this state; and
(b) There exists in this state an inadequate supply of and a pressing need
for farm credit and agricultural loan financing at interest rates and terms
which are consistent with the needs of farmers, particularly beginning farmers,
and other agricultural enterprises.
(2) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) From time to time the high rates of interest charged by mortgage
lenders seriously restrict existing housing transfers and new housing starts
and the resultant reduction in residential construction starts causes a
condition of substantial unemployment and underemployment in the construction
industry;
(b) Such conditions generally result in and contribute to the creation of
slums and blighted areas in the urban and rural areas of this state and a
deterioration of the quality of living conditions within this state and
necessitate excessive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds for
crime prevention and punishment, public health and safety, fire and accident
prevention, and other public services and facilities; and
(c) There exists in the urban and rural areas of this state an inadequate
supply of and a pressing need for sanitary, safe, and uncrowded housing at
prices at which low-income and moderate-income persons, particularly first-time
homebuyers, can afford to purchase, construct, or rent and as a result such
persons are forced to occupy unsanitary, unsafe, and overcrowded housing.
(3) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) Adequate and reliable energy supplies are a basic necessity of life
and sufficient energy supplies are essential to supplying adequate food and
shelter;
(b) The cost and availability of energy supplies has been and will
continue to be a matter of state and national concern;
(c) The increasing cost and decreasing availability of energy supplies for
purposes of residential heating will limit the ability of many of Nebraska's
citizens to provide the basic necessities of life and will result in a
deterioration in living conditions and a threat to the health and welfare of
the citizens of this state;
(d) Energy conservation through building modifications including, but not
limited to, insulation, weatherization, and the installation of alternative
energy devices has been shown to be a prudent means of reducing energy
consumption costs and the need for additional costly facilities to produce and
supply energy;
(e) Because of the high cost of available capital, the purchase of energy
conservation devices is not possible for many Nebraskans. The prohibitively
high interest rates for private capital create a situation in which the
necessary capital cannot be obtained solely from private enterprise sources and
there is a need for the stimulation of investment of private capital, thereby
encouraging the purchase of energy conservation devices and energy conserving
building modifications;
(f) The increased cost per capita of supplying adequate life-sustaining
energy needs has reduced the amount of funds, both public and private,
available for providing other necessities of life, including food, health care,
and safe, sanitary housing; and
(g) The continuing purchase of energy supplies results in the transfer of
ever-increasing amounts of capital to out-of-state energy suppliers.
(4) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) There exist within this state unemployment and underemployment
especially in areas of basic economic activity, caused by economic decline and
need for diversification of the economic base, needlessly increasing public
expenditures for unemployment compensation and welfare, decreasing the tax
base, reducing tax revenue, and resulting in economic and social liabilities to
the entire state;
(b) Such unemployment and underemployment cause areas of the state to
deteriorate and become substandard and blighted and such conditions result in
making such areas economic or social liabilities harmful to the economic and
social well-being of the entire state and the communities in which they exist,
needlessly increasing public expenditures, imposing onerous state and municipal
-117-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
burdens, decreasing the tax base, reducing tax revenue, substantially impairing
or arresting the sound growth of the state and the municipalities, depreciating
general state and community-wide values, and contributing to the spread of
disease and crime which necessitate excessive and disproportionate expenditures
of public funds for the preservation of the public health and safety, for crime
prevention, correction, prosecution, and punishment, for the treatment of
juvenile delinquency, for the maintenance of adequate police, fire, and
accident protection, and for other public services and facilities;
(c) There exist within this state conditions resulting from the
concentration of population of various counties, cities, and villages which
require the construction, maintenance, and operation of adequate hospital and
nursing facilities for the care of the public health. Since these conditions
cannot be remedied by the ordinary operations of private enterprises and since
provision of adequate hospital, nursing, and medical care is a public use, it
is in the public interest that adequate hospital and medical facilities and
care be provided in order to care for and protect the public health and
welfare;
(d) Creation of basic economic jobs in the private sector and the
promotion of health and welfare by the means provided under the Nebraska
Investment Finance Authority Act and the resulting reduction of needless public
expenditures, expansion of the tax base, provision of hospitals and health care
and related facilities, and increase of tax revenue are needed within this
state; and
(e) Stimulation of economic development throughout the state and the
provision of health care at affordable prices are matters of state policy,
public interest, and statewide concern and within the powers and authority
inherent in and reserved to the state in order that the state and its
municipalities shall not continue to be endangered by areas which consume an
excessive proportion of their revenue, in order that the economic base of the
state may be broadened and stabilized thereby providing jobs and necessary tax
base, and in order that adequate health care services be provided to all
residents of this state.
(5) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) There is a need within this state for financing to assist
municipalities, as defined in section 81-15,149, in providing wastewater
treatment facilities and safe drinking water facilities. The federal funding
provided for wastewater treatment facilities is extremely limited while the
need to provide and improve wastewater treatment facilities and safe drinking
water facilities is great;
(b) The construction, development, rehabilitation, and improvement of
modern and efficient sewer systems and wastewater treatment facilities are
essential to protecting and improving the state's water quality, the provision
of adequate wastewater treatment facilities and safe drinking water facilities
is essential to economic growth and development, and new sources of financing
for such projects are needed;
(c) The federal government has acted to end the system of federal
construction grants for clean water projects and has instead provided for
capitalization grants to capitalize state revolving funds for wastewater
treatment projects and will soon expand that to include safe drinking water
facilities, and the state has created or is expected to create appropriate
funds or accounts for such purpose. The state is required or expected to be
required to provide matching funds for deposit into such funds or accounts, and
there is a need for financing in excess of the amount which can be provided by
the federal money and the state match; and
(d) Additional assistance can be provided to municipalities as defined in
section 81-15,149 to alleviate the problems of water pollution or the provision
of safe drinking water by providing for the issuance of revenue bonds, the
proceeds of which shall be deposited into the Wastewater Treatment Facilities
Construction Loan Fund or the comparable state fund to finance safe drinking
water facilities. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the provision of
loans , including loans made pursuant to the Conservation Corporation Act, to a
municipality as defined in section 81-15,149 for the construction, development,
rehabilitation, operation, maintenance, and improvement of wastewater treatment
facilities or safe drinking water facilities.
(6) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) There is a need within this state for financing to assist public
school boards and school districts and private for-profit or not-for-profit
schools in connection with removal of materials determined to be hazardous to
the health and well-being of the residents of the state and the reduction or
elimination of accessibility barriers and that the federal funding provided for
such projects is extremely limited and the need and requirement to remove such
materials and to reduce or eliminate accessibility barriers from school
buildings is great;
(b) The financing of the removal of such environmental hazards and the
reduction or elimination of accessibility barriers is essential to protecting
and improving the facilities in the state which provide educational benefits
and services;
(c) The federal government has directed schools to remove such hazardous
materials and to reduce or eliminate accessibility barriers; and
(d) The problems enumerated in this subsection cannot be remedied through
the operation of private enterprise or individual communities or both but may
be alleviated through the assistance of the authority to encourage the
investment of private capital and assist in the financing of the removal of
-118-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
environmental hazards and the reduction or elimination of accessibility
barriers in educational facilities in this state in order to provide for a
clean, safe, and accessible environment to protect the health and welfare of
the citizens and residents of this state.
(7) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) The rapidly rising volume of waste deposited by society threatens the
capacity of existing and future landfills. The nature of waste disposal means
that unknown quantities of potentially toxic and hazardous materials are being
buried and pose a constant threat to the ground water supply. In addition, the
nature of the waste and the disposal methods utilized allow the waste to remain
basically inert for decades, if not centuries, without decomposition;
(b) Wastes filling Nebraska's landfills may at best represent a potential
resource, but without proper management wastes are hazards to the environment
and to the public health and welfare;
(c) The growing concern with ground water protection and the desire to
avoid financial risks inherent in ground water contamination have caused many
smaller landfills to close in favor of using higher-volume facilities. Larger
operations allow for better ground water protection at a relatively lower and
more manageable cost;
(d) The reduction of solid waste at the source and the recycling of
reusable waste materials will reduce the flow of waste to landfills and
increase the supply of reusable materials for the use of the public;
(e) There is a need within this state for financing to assist counties,
cities, villages, entities created under the Interlocal Cooperation Act and the
Joint Public Agency Act, and private persons with the construction and
operation of new solid waste disposal areas or facilities and with the closure,
monitoring, and remediation of existing solid waste disposal areas and
facilities;
(f) Financing the construction and operation of new solid waste disposal
areas and facilities and financing the closure, monitoring, and remediation of
existing and former solid waste disposal areas and facilities in the state is
essential to protect the environment and the public health and welfare;
(g) The federal government has directed that effective October 1, 1993,
all solid waste disposal areas and facilities shall be upgraded to meet
stringent siting, design, construction, operation, closure, monitoring, and
remediation requirements; and
(h) The problems enumerated in this subsection cannot be remedied through
the operation of private enterprise or individual communities or both but may
be alleviated through the assistance of the authority to encourage the
investment of private capital and to assist in the financing of solid waste
disposal areas and facilities and in the removal of environmental hazards in
solid waste disposal areas and facilities in this state in order to provide for
a clean environment to protect the health and welfare of the citizens and
residents of this state.
(8) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) During emergencies the resources of political subdivisions must be
effectively directed and coordinated to public safety agencies to save lives,
to protect property, and to meet the needs of citizens;
(b) There exists a need for public safety communication systems for use by
Nebraska's public safety agencies as defined in the Nebraska Public Safety
Communication System Act;
(c) Investment in the public safety communication infrastructure is
required to ensure the effectiveness of such public safety agencies. Since the
maintenance of public safety is a paramount concern but the cost of purchasing
and operating multiple communication infrastructures is prohibitive, it is
imperative that political subdivisions cooperate in their efforts to obtain
real and personal property to establish, operate, maintain, and manage public
safety communication systems; and
(d) There is a need within this state for financing to assist political
subdivisions and any entities created under the Interlocal Cooperation Act and
the Joint Public Agency Act with the acquisition, construction, and operation
of real and personal property of public safety communication systems.
(9) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, as of May 27, 2005,
and in connection with the financing of agricultural projects, there is a need
to increase both the limit on individual net worth and the limit on the
aggregate loan amount that may be provided by the authority. Such adjustments
are necessary to address the inadequate supply of and pressing need for farm
credit and agricultural loan financing at interest rates and terms that are
consistent with the needs of farmers, particularly beginning farmers, and other
agricultural enterprises.
(10) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) The amount of funding and other resources available to remedy the
problems identified in this section has been, and continues to be,
insufficient. Accordingly, the authority must be provided with additional
powers to adequately address the problems identified in this section with
funding derived from public and private sources and state and federal sources;
(b) Carrying out the purposes of the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority
Act may necessitate innovative agreements with public agencies and private
entities and it is the policy of this state to encourage such public-private
and intergovernmental cooperation; and
(c) Better, more broad-based sources of financing must be made available
to the authority and by the authority to the private sector of the economy to
enable the authority to address the problems identified in this section.
-119-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Sec. 322. Section 58-221, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
58-221 Residential energy conservation device shall mean any prudent means
of reducing the demands for conventional fuels or increasing the supply or
efficiency of these fuels in residential housing and shall include, but not be
limited to:
(1) Caulking and weather stripping of doors and windows;
(2) Furnace efficiency modifications, including:
(a) Replacement burners, furnaces, heat pumps, or boilers or any
combination thereof which, as determined by the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy, substantially increases the energy
efficiency of the heating system;
(b) Any device for modifying flue openings which will increase the energy
efficiency of the heating system; and
(c) Any electrical or mechanical furnace ignition system which replaces a
standing gas pilot light;
(3) A clock thermostat;
(4) Ceiling, attic, wall, and floor insulation;
(5) Water heater insulation;
(6) Storm windows and doors, multiglazed windows and doors, and heat-
absorbed or heat-reflective glazed window and door materials;
(7) Any device which controls demand of appliances and aids load
management;
(8) Any device to utilize solar energy, biomass, geothermal, or wind power
for any residential energy conservation purpose including heating of water and
space heating or cooling; and
(9) Any other conservation device, renewable energy technology, and
specific home improvement necessary to insure the effectiveness of the energy
conservation measures as the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy by rule or regulation identifies.
Sec. 323. Section 60-6,363, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,363 For purposes of sections 60-6,363 to 60-6,374:
(1) Diesel-powered motor vehicle shall mean a self-propelled vehicle which
is designed primarily for transporting persons or property on a highway and
which is powered by an internal combustion engine of the compression ignition
type;
(2) Motor vehicle shall mean a self-propelled vehicle with a gross
unloaded vehicle weight of ten thousand pounds or more or any combination of
vehicles of a type subject to registration which is towed by such a vehicle;
(3) Smoke shall mean the solid or liquid matter, except water, discharged
from a motor vehicle engine which obscures the transmission of light;
(4) Smokemeter shall mean a full-flow, light-extinction smokemeter of a
type approved by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy and operating on the principles described in the federal standards;
(5) Opacity shall mean the degree to which a smoke plume emitted from a
diesel-powered motor vehicle engine will block the passage of a beam of light
expressed as a percentage; and
(6) Smoke control system shall mean a system consisting of one or more
devices and adjustments designed to control the discharge of smoke from diesel-
powered motor vehicles.
Sec. 324. Section 60-6,364, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,364 Sections 60-6,363 to 60-6,374 shall apply to all diesel-powered
motor vehicles operated within this state with the exception of the following:
(1) Emergency vehicles operated by federal, state, and local governmental
authorities;
(2) Vehicles which are not required to be registered in accordance with
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act;
(3) Vehicles used for research and development which have been approved by
the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy;
(4) Vehicles being operated while undergoing maintenance;
(5) Vehicles operated under emergency conditions;
(6) Vehicles being operated in the course of training programs which have
been approved by the director; and
(7) Other vehicles expressly exempted by the director.
Sec. 325. Section 60-6,367, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,367 (1) Officials of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy and local enforcement officials shall have the authority
to issue citations to suspected violators of sections 60-6,363 to 60-6,374 on
the basis of their visual evaluation of the smoke emitted from a diesel-powered
motor vehicle. A citation shall give the suspected violator a reasonable time
to furnish evidence to the department that such alleged violation has been
corrected or else such suspected violator shall be subject to the penalties set
out in section 60-6,373. A suspected violator may demand that the suspected
vehicle be tested by an approved smokemeter prior to a trial on the alleged
violation.
(2) Smokemeter tests shall be conducted (a) by or under the supervision of
a person or testing facility authorized by the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy to conduct such tests and (b) by installing
an approved smokemeter on the exhaust pipe and operating the suspected vehicle
at engine revolutions per minute equivalent to the engine revolutions per
-120-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
minute at the time of the alleged violation.
(3) The results of smokemeter tests run in accordance with this section
and after the alleged violation shall be admissible as evidence in legal
proceedings.
Sec. 326. Section 60-6,368, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,368 (1) The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy shall have the power, after public hearings on due notice, to adopt
and promulgate, consistent with and in furtherance of the provisions of
sections 60-6,363 to 60-6,374, rules and regulations in accordance with which
he or she will carry out his or her responsibilities and obligations under such
sections.
(2) Any rules or regulations promulgated by the director shall be
consistent with the provisions of the federal standards, if any, relating to
control of emissions from the diesel-powered motor vehicles affected by such
rules and regulations. The director shall not require, as a condition for the
sale of any diesel-powered motor vehicle covered by sections 60-6,363 to
60-6,374, the inspection, certification, or other approval of any feature or
equipment designed for the control of noise or emissions from such diesel-
powered motor vehicles if such feature or equipment has been certified,
approved, or otherwise authorized pursuant to laws or regulations of any
federal governmental body as sufficient to make lawful the sale of any diesel-
powered motor vehicle covered by such sections.
Sec. 327. Section 61-201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-201 The Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Director of Natural Resources shall be qualified by training and
business experience to manage and supervise the Division of Water of the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Department of Natural Resources.
The Division of Water of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall
assist the Chief Water Officer in carrying out the Chief Water Officer's
duties. The Chief Water Officer director shall (1) be a professional engineer
as provided in the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act or a professional
geologist as provided in the Geologists Regulation Act and (2) have had at
least five years' experience in a position of responsibility in irrigation
work. The Chief Water Officer shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to
confirmation by the Legislature. The Chief Water Officer shall report directly
to the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment. The Chief Water Officer
shall, before assuming the duties of the office, take and subscribe an oath,
such as is required by state officers.
Sec. 328. Section 61-202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-202 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Director of
Natural Resources may employ such personnel, including legal and technical
advisors, as necessary to carry out the duties required of the department,
including the duties required of the Chief Water Officer director.
Sec. 329. Section 61-203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-203 The Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources shall adopt a
seal. Copies of all records or other instruments related to the duties of the
Chief Water Officer in the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources when certified by the Chief Water Officer department as true copies
and bearing the seal thereof shall be received in any court as prima facie
evidence of the original record or instruments.
Sec. 330. Section 61-204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-204 (1) The Chief Water Officer of the Department Director of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the duties of the Chief Water Officer for the
Department of Natural Resources except to the extent such power is statutorily
granted to the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission. The Chief Water Officer
director shall administer rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
commission.
(2) The rules, regulations, and orders of the Director of Water Resources,
the Department of Water Resources, and the Nebraska Natural Resources
Commission, the Director of Natural Resources, and the Department of Natural
Resources shall remain in effect unless changed or eliminated by the Chief
Water Officer or the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, as
determined by their respective duties Director of Natural Resources or the
Department of Natural Resources or by the commission to the extent such power
is statutorily granted to the commission.
Sec. 331. Section 61-205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-205 The Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment shall exercise the powers and perform the duties assigned to the
Department of Natural Resources prior to July 1, 2025, except those duties
assigned to the Director of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment or
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment. The Department of Natural
Resources shall exercise the powers and perform the duties assigned to the
Department of Water Resources prior to July 1, 2000. The Department of Natural
Resources shall exercise the powers and perform the duties assigned to the
Nebraska Natural Resources Commission prior to July 1, 2000, except as
otherwise specifically provided.
-121-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
The Chief Water Officer Director of Natural Resources and his or her duly
authorized assistants shall have access at all reasonable times to all dams,
reservoirs, hydroelectric plants, water measuring devices, and headgates, and
other devices for diverting water, for the purpose of performing the duties
assigned to the Chief Water Officer department.
Sec. 332. Section 61-206, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-206 (1) The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources is
given jurisdiction over all matters pertaining to water rights for irrigation,
power, or other useful purposes except as such jurisdiction is specifically
limited by statute. The Chief Water Officer department may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations governing matters coming before the Chief Water Officer
it. The Chief Water Officer It may refuse to allow any water to be used by
claimants until their rights have been determined and made of record. The Chief
Water Officer It may request information relative to irrigation and water power
works from any county, irrigation, or power officers and from any other
persons. The Chief Water Officer It may have hearings on complaints, petitions,
or applications in connection with any of such matters. Such hearings shall be
had at the time and place designated by the Chief Water Officer department. The
Chief Water Officer department shall have power to certify official acts,
compel attendance of witnesses, take testimony by deposition as in suits at
law, and examine books, papers, documents, and records of any county, party, or
parties interested in any of the matters mentioned in this section or have such
examinations made by its qualified representative and shall make and preserve a
true and complete transcript of its proceedings and hearings. If a final
decision is made without a hearing, a hearing shall be held at the request of
any party to the proceeding if the request is made within thirty days after the
decision is rendered. If a hearing is held at the request of one or more
parties, the Chief Water Officer department may require each such requesting
party and each person who requests to be made a party to such hearing to pay
the proportional share of the cost of such transcript. Upon any hearing, the
Chief Water Officer department shall receive any evidence relevant to the
matter under investigation and the burden of proof shall be upon the person
making the complaint, petition, and application. After such hearing and
investigation, the Chief Water Officer department shall render a decision in
the premises in writing and shall issue such order or orders duly certified as
the Chief Water Officer it may deem necessary.
(2) The Chief Water Officer department shall serve as the official officer
agency of the state in connection with water resources development, soil and
water conservation, flood prevention, watershed protection, and flood control.
(3) The Chief Water Officer or the Chief Water Officer's authorized
representatives department shall:
(a) Offer assistance as appropriate to the supervisors or directors of any
subdivision of government with responsibilities in the area of natural
resources conservation, development, and use in the carrying out of any of
their powers and programs;
(b) Keep the supervisors or directors of each such subdivision informed of
the activities and experience of all other such subdivisions and facilitate
cooperation and an interchange of advice and experience between such
subdivisions;
(c) Coordinate the programs of such subdivisions so far as this may be
done by advice and consultation;
(d) Secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States, any of its
agencies, and agencies of this state in the work of such subdivisions;
(e) Disseminate information throughout the state concerning the activities
and programs of such subdivisions;
(f) Plan, develop, and promote the implementation of a comprehensive
program of resource development, conservation, and utilization for the soil and
water resources of this state in cooperation with other local, state, and
federal agencies and organizations;
(g) When necessary for the proper administration of the functions of the
department, rent or lease space outside the State Capitol; and
(h) Assist such local governmental organizations as villages, cities,
counties, and natural resources districts in securing, planning, and developing
information on flood plains to be used in developing regulations and ordinances
on proper use of these flood plains.
Sec. 333. Section 61-207, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-207 If any county, party, or parties interested in irrigation or water
power work affected thereby are dissatisfied with the decision or with any
order adopted by the Chief Water Officer, such dissatisfied county, party, or
parties may appeal to the Court of Appeals to reverse, vacate, or modify the
order complained of. The procedure to obtain such reversal, modification, or
vacation of any such decision or order upon which a hearing has been had before
the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources shall be governed by
the same provisions in force with reference to appeals and error proceedings
from the district court. The evidence presented before the Chief Water Officer
department as reported by the Chief Water Officer's its official stenographer
and reduced to writing, together with a transcript of the record and pleadings
upon which the decision is based, duly certified in such case under the seal of
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment department, shall constitute
the complete record and the evidence upon which the case shall be presented to
the appellate court. The time for perfecting such appeal shall be limited to
-122-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
thirty days after the rendition of such decision or order, and the appellate
court shall advance such appeal to the head of its docket.
Sec. 334. Section 61-208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-208 The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources may make
surveys of streams showing location of possible water power developments and
irrigation projects.
Sec. 335. Section 61-209, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-209 The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources may conduct
special projects for water data collection on behalf of other state agencies,
political subdivisions, or federal agencies. Such data shall be public
information. The Chief Water Officer department may charge a fee to cover in
whole or in part the costs of collecting, analyzing, and publishing the data
and such fees shall be deposited in the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources Cash Fund.
Sec. 336. Section 61-210, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-210 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
Cash Fund is created. The State Treasurer shall credit to such fund such money
as is specifically appropriated or reappropriated by the Legislature. The State
Treasurer shall also credit such fund with payments, if any, accepted for
services rendered by the department, including the Chief Water Officer, and
fees collected pursuant to subsection (6) of section 46-606 and section 61-209.
The funds made available to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources by the United States, through the Natural Resources
Conservation Service of the Department of Agriculture or through any other
agencies, shall be credited to the fund by the State Treasurer. Any money in
the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act. The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources shall allocate money from the fund to pay costs of the programs or
activities of the department, including the programs or activities of the Chief
Water Officer. The Director of Administrative Services, upon receipt of proper
vouchers approved by the department, shall issue warrants on the fund, and the
State Treasurer shall countersign and pay from, but never in excess of, the
amounts to the credit of the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Sec. 337. Section 61-211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-211 The Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources may direct
managers or operators of interstate ditches to construct and maintain suitable
measuring devices at or near the state line in Nebraska. A manager or operator
shall within thirty days after receipt of notice from the Chief Water Officer
department construct and complete installation of such a measuring device and
shall furnish daily gauge height reports to the Chief Water Officer department
from the beginning to the end of the irrigation season, in such form and manner
as recommended by the Chief Water Officer department. Failure of any manager or
operator of an interstate ditch to comply with this section shall be a Class V
misdemeanor.
Sec. 338. Section 61-215, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-215 There shall be one or more division supervisors acting for the
Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources to administer the public
water of the state in water division No. 1 and water division No. 2, as the
water divisions created by section 61-212. Such a division supervisor, acting
for the Chief Water Officer department, shall have the immediate direction and
control of the distribution of water in such manner as directed by the Chief
Water Officer department.
Sec. 339. Section 61-216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
61-216 The division supervisor or supervisors shall, under the direction
of the Chief Water Officer Department of Natural Resources, see that the laws
relative to the distribution of water are executed in accordance with the
rights of priority of appropriation.
Sec. 340. Section 61-218, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-218 (1) The Water Resources Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund such money as is (a)
transferred to the fund by the Legislature, (b) paid to the state as fees,
deposits, payments, and repayments relating to the fund, both principal and
interest, (c) donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund
from public or private entities, (d) made available by any department or agency
of the United States if so directed by such department or agency, (e) allocated
pursuant to section 81-15,175, and (f) received by the state for settlement of
claims relating to interstate river compacts or decrees.
(3)(a) The fund shall be expended by the department in any area that has
adopted an integrated management plan as provided in section 46-715.
(b) The fund shall be used in any such area:
-123-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(i) To aid management actions taken to reduce consumptive uses of water;
(ii) To enhance streamflows or ground water recharge;
(iii) For any other activity deemed necessary by the department in the
development and implementation of an integrated management plan;
(iv) For purposes of the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act; or
(v) For purposes of projects or proposals described in the grant
application as set forth in subdivision (2)(h) of section 81-15,175.
(c) To the extent funds are not expended pursuant to subdivision (b) of
this subsection, the department may conduct a statewide assessment of short-
term and long-term water management activities and funding needs to meet
statutory requirements in sections 46-713 to 46-718 and 46-739 and any
requirements of an interstate compact or decree or formal state contract or
agreement.
(d) The fund shall not be used to pay for administrative expenses or any
salaries for any political subdivision.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that three million three hundred
thousand dollars be transferred each fiscal year from the General Fund to the
Water Resources Cash Fund for FY2011-12 through FY2022-23, except that for
FY2012-13 it is the intent of the Legislature that four million seven hundred
thousand dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the Water Resources
Cash Fund. It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Treasurer credit
any money received from any Republican River Compact settlement to the Water
Resources Cash Fund in the fiscal year in which it is received.
(5)(a) Expenditures from the Water Resources Cash Fund may be made to
natural resources districts eligible under subsection (3) of this section for
activities to either achieve a sustainable balance of consumptive water uses or
assure compliance with an interstate compact or decree or a formal state
contract or agreement and shall require a match of local funding in an amount
equal to or greater than forty percent of the total cost of carrying out the
eligible activity. The department shall, no later than August 1 of each year,
beginning in 2007, determine the amount of funding that will be made available
to natural resources districts from the Water Resources Cash Fund and notify
natural resources districts of this determination. The department shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations governing application for and use of the
Water Resources Cash Fund by natural resources districts. Such rules and
regulations shall, at a minimum, include the following components:
(i) Require an explanation of how the planned activity will achieve a
sustainable balance of consumptive water uses or will assure compliance with an
interstate compact or decree or a formal state contract or agreement as
required by section 46-715 and the controls, rules, and regulations designed to
carry out the activity; and
(ii) A schedule of implementation of the activity or its components,
including the local match as set forth in subdivision (5)(a) of this section.
(b) Any natural resources district that fails to implement and enforce its
controls, rules, and regulations as required by section 46-715 shall not be
eligible for funding from the Water Resources Cash Fund until it is determined
by the department that compliance with the provisions required by section
46-715 has been established.
(6) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
shall submit electronically an annual report to the Legislature no later than
October 1 of each year , beginning in the year 2007, that shall detail the use
of the Water Resources Cash Fund in the previous year. The report shall
provide:
(a) Details regarding the use and cost of activities carried out by the
department; and
(b) Details regarding the use and cost of activities carried out by each
natural resources district that received funds from the Water Resources Cash
Fund.
(7)(a) Prior to the application deadline for fiscal year 2011-12, the
Department of Natural Resources shall apply for a grant of nine million nine
hundred thousand dollars from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund, to be paid
out in three annual installments of three million three hundred thousand
dollars. The purposes listed in the grant application shall be consistent with
the uses of the Water Resources Cash Fund provided in this section and shall be
used to aid management actions taken to reduce consumptive uses of water, to
enhance streamflows, to recharge ground water, or to support wildlife habitat
in any river basin determined to be fully appropriated pursuant to section
46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713.
(b) If the application is granted, funds received from such grant shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Water Resources Cash Fund for
the purpose of supporting the projects set forth in the grant application. The
department shall include in its grant application documentation that the
Legislature has authorized a transfer of three million three hundred thousand
dollars from the General Fund into the Water Resources Cash Fund for each of
fiscal years 2011-12 and 2012-13 and has stated its intent to transfer three
million three hundred thousand dollars to the Water Resources Cash Fund for
fiscal year 2013-14.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department apply for an
additional three-year grant that would begin in fiscal year 2014-15, an
additional three-year grant from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund that
would begin in fiscal year 2017-18, and an additional three-year grant from the
Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund that would begin in fiscal year 2020-21 if
the criteria established in subsection (4) of section 81-15,175 are achieved.
-124-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(8) The department shall establish a subaccount within the Water Resources
Cash Fund for the accounting of all money received as a grant from the Nebraska
Environmental Trust Fund as the result of an application made pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section. At the end of each calendar month, the
department shall calculate the amount of interest earnings accruing to the
subaccount and shall notify the State Treasurer who shall then transfer a like
amount from the Water Resources Cash Fund to the Nebraska Environmental Trust
Fund.
(9) Any funds transferred from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund to
the Water Resources Cash Fund shall be expended in accordance with section
81-15,168.
(10) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million dollars from the Water
Resources Cash Fund to the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund as soon as
administratively possible after July 19, 2024, but before June 30, 2025, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 341. Section 61-222, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-222 The Water Sustainability Fund is created in the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources. The fund shall be used in
accordance with the provisions established in sections 2-1506 to 2-1513 and for
costs directly related to the administration of the fund. The Legislature shall
not appropriate or transfer money from the Water Sustainability Fund for any
other purpose, except that transfers may be made from the Water Sustainability
Fund to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources Cash
Fund and as a one-time transfer to the General Fund as described in this
section.
The Water Sustainability Fund shall consist of money transferred to the
fund by the Legislature, other funds as appropriated by the Legislature, and
money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private
entities. Funds made available by any department or agency of the United States
may also be credited to the fund if so directed by such department or agency.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Prior to October 1, 2024, investment
earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in
the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
It is the intent of the Legislature that twenty-one million dollars be
transferred from the General Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund in fiscal
year 2014-15 and that eleven million dollars be transferred from the General
Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund each fiscal year beginning in fiscal year
2015-16.
The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Natural Resources Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2021, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Natural Resources Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2021, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
The State Treasurer shall transfer five hundred thousand dollars from the
Water Sustainability Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2021, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Natural Resources Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2022, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars from the Water Sustainability Fund to the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Natural Resources Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2023, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 342. Section 61-224, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-224 There is hereby created the Critical Infrastructure Facilities Cash
Fund in the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources. The
fund shall consist of funds appropriated or transferred by the Legislature. The
fund shall be used by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources (1) to provide a grant to a natural resources district to offset
costs related to soil and water improvements intended to protect critical
infrastructure facilities within the district which includes military
installations, transportation routes, and wastewater treatment facilities, (2)
to provide a grant to an irrigation district for reimbursement of costs related
to temporary repairs to the main canal and tunnels of an interstate irrigation
system which experienced a failure, and (3) to provide a grant to an entity
within a county with a population exceeding one hundred thousand inhabitants
formed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act for the purpose of funding a
portion of the cost of a wastewater system. Any funds remaining after all such
-125-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
project costs have been completely funded shall be transferred to the General
Fund. Transfers may be made from the Critical Infrastructure Facilities Cash
Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Critical Infrastructure Facilities Cash Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, and any interest
earned by the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 343. Section 61-226, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-226 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
shall develop a state flood mitigation plan as a stand-alone document to be
annexed into the state hazard mitigation plan maintained by the Nebraska
Emergency Management Agency. Such plan shall be structured in accordance with
Federal Emergency Management Agency guidelines, and shall be comprehensive,
collaborative, and statewide in scope with opportunities for input from diverse
stakeholders.
Sec. 344. Section 61-227, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-227 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
shall convene a plan development group which shall be housed and staffed for
administrative purposes within such department. The Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources shall engage with federal, state, and
local agency and community stakeholders in the development of the state flood
mitigation plan, including, but not limited to, the Department of
Transportation, the Department of Environment and Energy, the Department of
Economic Development, the Department of Agriculture, the Nebraska Emergency
Management Agency, natural resources districts, the United States Department of
Agriculture, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the United States
Geological Survey, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the University of
Nebraska, representatives of counties, municipalities, and other political
subdivisions, and the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature. The
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources may engage other
sources to provide technical expertise as needed.
Sec. 345. Section 61-228, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-228 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
shall:
(1) Evaluate the flood issues that occurred in 2019, and identify cost-
effective flood mitigation strategies that should be adopted to reduce the
disruption of lives and livelihoods and prioritize making Nebraska communities
more resilient;
(2) Identify opportunities to implement flood hazard mitigation strategies
with the intent to reduce the impact of flood events;
(3) Work to improve knowledge and understanding of available recovery
resources while identifying potential gaps in current disaster program
delivery;
(4) Identify potential available funding sources that can be accessed to
improve the resilience of the state through flood mitigation and post-flood
disaster recovery. The funding sources shall include, but not be limited to,
assistance from (a) the Federal Emergency Management Agency's Flood Mitigation
Assistance Grant Program, Building Resilient Infrastructure and Communities
Grant Program, Hazard Mitigation Grant Program, Public Assistance Program, and
Individual Assistance Program, (b) the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development's Community Development Block Grant Program and Community
Development Block Grant Disaster Recovery Program, and (c) programs of the
United States Department of Agriculture's Natural Resources Conservation
Service. Identification of such funding sources shall be in addition to grants
and cost-sharing programs available through other agencies that support flood
hazard mitigation planning in communities;
(5) Compile a centralized list of critical infrastructure and state-owned
facilities and identify those with the highest risk of flooding. In compiling
such list, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
shall consult and collaborate with other state and local agencies that have
information that identifies vulnerable facilities;
(6) Evaluate state laws, rules, regulations, policies, and programs
related to flood hazard mitigation and development in flood hazard-prone areas
to support the state's administration of the Federal Emergency Management
Agency's National Flood Insurance Program, Community Rating System, and Risk
Mapping, Assessment, and Planning Program;
(7) Examine existing law and, if necessary, recommend statutory or
administrative changes to help ensure collaboration and coordination between
state and local entities in statewide flood mitigation planning; and
(8) Hold two public hearings, one prior to the first state flood
mitigation plan development meeting and one prior to the completion of such
plan. Notice of each hearing shall be published at least thirty days prior to
the hearing date.
Sec. 346. Section 61-303, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-303 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
shall have the necessary authority to develop, construct, manage, and operate
the Perkins County Canal Project consistent with the terms of the South Platte
River Compact and pursuant to the Perkins County Canal Project Act. The
department's powers under the act shall include: (a) Contracting for services,
-126-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(b) acquiring permits, (c) acquiring and owning real property, (d) acquiring,
holding, and exercising water rights, (e) employing personnel, (f) accepting
grants, loans, donations, gifts, bequests, or other contributions from any
person or entity, public or private, including any funds made available by any
department or agency of the United States, (g) managing and expending such
funds as are made available to it from the Perkins County Canal Project Fund,
and (h) any other necessary functions consistent with the compact and pursuant
to the act in protecting Nebraska's full entitlement to flows of the South
Platte River. For purposes of the Perkins County Canal Project Act, the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources is authorized to
acquire real estate or access thereto in the name of the State of Nebraska by
the use of eminent domain as provided under section 76-725. The department is
also authorized to resolve all disputes that may arise, including the
initiation or defense of legal actions of any kind, as necessary to achieve the
purposes of the act.
Sec. 347. Section 61-305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-305 (1) The Perkins County Canal Project Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources. The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund any money
transferred by the Legislature and such grants, loans, donations, gifts,
bequests, or other money received from any federal or state agency or public or
private source for use by the department for the canal project. Any fees
collected for water delivery may be credited to the fund. Any money in the
Perkins County Canal Project Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any investment earnings from
investment of money in the Perkins County Canal Project Fund shall be credited
to such fund, except that for fiscal years 2023-24, 2024-25, and 2025-26, such
investment earnings shall be credited as provided in section 84-622.
(2)(a) The department shall use the Perkins County Canal Project Fund to
identify the optimal route and purchase land for and develop, construct,
manage, and operate the Perkins County Canal as outlined by the South Platte
River Compact and to contract with an independent firm for the purposes of
completing a study of such canal. The study shall include, but may not be
limited to, the following:
(i) Costs of completion of a canal and adjoining reservoirs as outlined in
the South Platte River Compact;
(ii) A timeline for completion of a canal and adjoining reservoirs as
outlined in the South Platte River Compact;
(iii) A cost-effectiveness study examining alternatives, including
alternatives that may reduce environmental or financial impacts; and
(iv) The impacts of the canal on drinking water supplies for the cities of
Lincoln and Omaha.
(b) The department shall provide the findings of such study electronically
to the Clerk of the Legislature and present the findings at a public hearing
held by the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature on or before December
31, 2022.
Sec. 348. Section 61-401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-401 Sections 61-401 to 61-405 61-404 shall be known and may be cited as
the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Act and may also be referred to as
the JEDI Act.
Sec. 349. Section 61-403, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-403 (1) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources is granted all power necessary to carry out the purposes of the Jobs
and Economic Development Initiative Act, including, but not limited to, the
power to:
(a) Purchase, sell, or lease land;
(b) Enter into contracts, including, but not limited to, contracts
relating to the provision of construction services, management services, legal
services, auditor services, and other consulting services or advice as the
department may require in the performance of its duties; and
(c) Enter into agreements with natural resources districts to accomplish
the purposes of the act. In any such agreement, a natural resources district
may use the full powers granted to it by law.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department engage private
parties and entities to construct and develop the lake and enter into contracts
or public-private partnerships that the department deems advantageous to the
construction and development of the lake, and land adjacent thereto, and to
advance the purposes of the act.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall give
preference to:
(a) Contract proposals relating to the development or management of the
lake from a Nebraska nonprofit corporation whose board of directors include at
least four directors who are appointed by the Governor with the approval of a
majority of the Legislature, one representative of the Game and Parks
Commission who is a nonvoting, ex officio member of such board of directors,
and one member of the Legislature who is appointed by the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council and who is a nonvoting, ex officio member of such board
of directors. All such directors must agree to be bound by the conflict-of-
interest provisions in sections 49-1493 to 49-14,104. Any such nonprofit
-127-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
corporation shall be bound by the Open Meetings Act and sections 84-712 to
84-712.09 and shall publicly let contracts valued in excess of twenty-five
thousand dollars; and
(b) Contract proposals which provide for a public-private partnership with
the state in constructing, developing, or managing the lake.
(4) The department is granted authority to select the land upon which the
lake will be built. In making such selection, the following shall apply:
(a) The land shall be located in or near a county having a population of
at least one hundred thousand but not more than three hundred thousand
inhabitants and within the flood plain or floodway of the Platte River;
(b) Preference shall be given to locations that were materially underwater
when the Platte River flooded in 2019;
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the lake be at least three
thousand six hundred surface acres in size;
(d) No dam shall be constructed on the main channel of the Platte River in
order to construct the lake; and
(e) No city or village, or any part thereof, shall be flooded in order to
construct the lake.
(5) The department is granted authority to designate the land selected for
the lake under subsection (4) of this section, and land near or adjacent
thereto, as the Lake Development District.
(6) The department may, in the performance of its duties, seek input and
advice from any natural resources district that encompasses any of the area
included in the Lake Development District.
(7) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department engage local
stakeholders as the department carries out its duties under this section.
(8) The land selected for the lake shall be owned by the state, and the
department shall ensure that the general public has complete access to the
lake. No private entity involved in the constructing, developing, or managing
of the lake shall designate any portion of the lake for exclusively private
use. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude reasonable limitations on the
number of people using the lake, a marina, or any other access point so long as
such limitation does not restrict access to a designated class of private
parties.
(9) Neither the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources nor any employee of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources shall have a financial interest, either personally or through
an immediate family member, in any purchase, sale, or lease of real property
relating to the construction or development of the lake or in any contract
entered into by the department relating to the construction, development, or
management of the lake. For purposes of this subsection, immediate family
member means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, or grandchild.
Sec. 350. Section 61-404, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-404 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no land within the Lake
Development District, as designated by the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources pursuant to section 61-403, shall be annexed.
Sec. 351. Section 61-405, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-405 (1) The Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund is created.
The fund shall be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources. The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund any
money transferred to the fund by the Legislature and such donations, gifts,
bequests, or other money received from any federal or state agency or public or
private source. The fund shall be used for water and recreational projects
pursuant to the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Act. Transfers may be
made from the fund to the Cash Reserve Fund or the Roads Operations Cash Fund
at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Jobs and Economic
Development Initiative Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Prior to October 1, 2024, any investment
earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in
the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) An amount, not to exceed twenty million dollars, shall be available
for site selection costs, feasibility and public water supply studies, and
flood mitigation costs of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources related to any projects pursuant to the Jobs and Economic
Development Initiative Act. The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources shall, in cooperation with impacted communities, including,
but not limited to, any city of the primary class and metropolitan utilities
district, contract with an independent consultant to conduct a study on the
consequences of any lake located in the Lower Platte River Basin to the public
water supply of such communities. Such study shall consider all aspects of
water quality, water quantity, and water infrastructure, and any other issues
necessary to protect the public water supply, including the impact to future
water supply opportunities to the impacted communities.
(3) No funds shall be expended for any project, other than those
enumerated in subsection (2) of this section, from the Jobs and Economic
Development Initiative Fund unless the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources certifies to the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services that the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources has conducted
-128-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
any environmental, hydrological, or other feasibility studies the director
deems necessary to establish the feasibility of any projects pursuant to the
Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Act and that, based on the results of
such studies, the director has deemed the projects feasible.
Sec. 352. Section 61-502, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-502 For purposes of the Public Water and Natural Resources Project
Contracting Act:
(1) Alternative technical concept means changes suggested by a qualified,
eligible, short-listed design-builder to the department's basic configurations,
project scope, design, or construction criteria;
(2) Best value-based selection process means a process of selecting a
design-builder using price, schedule, and qualifications for evaluation
factors;
(3) Construction manager means the legal entity which proposes to enter
into a construction manager-general contractor contract pursuant to the act;
(4) Construction manager-general contractor contract means a contract
which is subject to a qualification-based selection process between the
department and a construction manager to furnish preconstruction services
during the design development phase of the project and, if an agreement can be
reached which is satisfactory to the department, construction services for the
construction phase of the project;
(5) Construction services means activities associated with building the
project;
(6) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources;
(7) Design-build contract means a contract between the department and a
design-builder which is subject to a best value-based selection process to
furnish (a) architectural, engineering, and related design services and (b)
labor, materials, supplies, equipment, and construction services;
(8) Design-builder means the legal entity which proposes to enter into a
design-build contract;
(9) Preconstruction services means all nonconstruction-related services
that a construction manager performs in relation to the design of the project
before execution of a contract for construction services. Preconstruction
services includes, but is not limited to, cost estimating, value engineering
studies, constructability reviews, delivery schedule assessments, and life-
cycle analysis;
(10) Private partner means any entity that is a partner in a public-
private partnership other than the State of Nebraska, any agency of the State
of Nebraska, the federal government, any agency of the federal government, any
other state government, or any agency of any government at any level;
(11) Progressive design-build means a project-delivery process in which
both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single entity
that is selected through a qualification-based selection process at the
earliest feasible stage of the project;
(12) Project performance criteria means the performance requirements of
the project suitable to allow the design-builder to make a proposal.
Performance requirements shall include, but are not limited to, the following,
if required by the project: Capacity, durability, standards, ingress and egress
requirements, description of the site, surveys, soil and environmental
information concerning the site, material quality standards, design and
milestone dates, site development requirements, compliance with applicable law,
and other criteria for the intended use of the project;
(13) Proposal means an offer in response to a request for proposals (a) by
a design-builder to enter into a design-build contract or (b) by a construction
manager to enter into a construction manager-general contractor contract;
(14) Public-private partnership means a project delivery method for
construction or financing of capital projects or procurement of services under
a written public-private partnership agreement entered into pursuant to section
61-520 between at least one private partner and the State of Nebraska or any
agency of the state;
(15) Qualification-based selection process means a process of selecting a
construction manager or progressive design-builder based on qualifications;
(16) Request for proposals means the documentation by which the department
solicits proposals; and
(17) Request for qualifications means the documentation or publication by
which the department solicits qualifications.
Sec. 353. Section 61-520, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
61-520 (1) A public-private partnership delivery method may be used for
projects under the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act
as provided in this section and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to this section only to the extent allowed under the Constitution of
Nebraska. State contracts using this method shall be awarded by competitive
negotiation.
(2) The department utilizing a public-private partnership shall continue
to be responsible for oversight of any function that is delegated to or
otherwise performed by a private partner.
(3) On or before July 1, 2024, the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Natural Resources shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
setting forth criteria to be used in determining when a public-private
partnership is to be used for a particular project. The rules and regulations
-129-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
shall reflect the intent of the Legislature to promote and encourage the use of
public-private partnerships in the State of Nebraska. The Director of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources shall consult with design-builders,
progressive design-builders, construction managers, other contractors and
design professionals, including engineers and architects, and other appropriate
professionals during the development of the rules and regulations.
(4) A request for proposals for a project utilizing a public-private
partnership shall include at a minimum:
(a) The parameters of the proposed public-private partnership agreement;
(b) The duties and responsibilities to be performed by the private partner
or private partners;
(c) The methods of oversight to be employed by the department;
(d) The duties and responsibilities that are to be performed by the
department and any other parties to the contract;
(e) The evaluation factors and the relative weight of each factor to be
used in the scoring of awards;
(f) Plans for financing and operating the project and the revenue, service
payments, bond financings, and appropriations of public funds needed for the
qualifying project;
(g) Comprehensive documentation of the experience, capabilities,
capitalization and financial condition, and other relevant qualifications of
the private entity submitting the proposal;
(h) The ability of a private partner or private partners to quickly
respond to the needs presented in the request for proposals and the importance
of economic development opportunities represented by the project. In evaluating
proposals, preference shall be given to a plan that includes the involvement of
small businesses as subcontractors, to the extent that small businesses can
provide services in a competitive manner, unless any preference interferes with
the qualification for federal or other funds; and
(i) Other information required by the department to evaluate the proposals
submitted and the overall proposed public-private partnership.
(5) A private entity desiring to be a private partner shall demonstrate to
the satisfaction of the department that it is capable of performing any duty,
responsibility, or function it may be authorized or directed to perform as a
term or condition of the public-private partnership agreement.
(6) A request for proposals may be canceled, or all proposals may be
rejected, if it is determined in writing that such action is taken in the best
interest of the State of Nebraska and approved by the purchasing officer.
(7) Upon execution of a public-private partnership agreement, the
department shall ensure that the contract clearly identifies that a public-
private partnership is being utilized.
(8) The department shall:
(a) Adhere to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under this
section when utilizing a public-private partnership for financing capital
projects; and
(b) Electronically report annually to the Natural Resources Committee of
the Legislature regarding private-public partnerships which have been
considered or are approved pursuant to this section.
Sec. 354. Section 66-203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
66-203 (1) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy shall offer a rebate for qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel
property.
(2)(a) The rebate for qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property
as defined in subdivisions (4)(a) and (b) of section 66-202 is the lesser of
fifty percent of the cost of the qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel
property or four thousand five hundred dollars for each motor vehicle.
(b) A qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property is not eligible
for a rebate under this section if the person or entity applying for the rebate
has claimed another rebate or grant for the same motor vehicle under any other
state rebate or grant program.
(3) The rebate for qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property as
defined in subdivision (4)(c) of section 66-202 is the lesser of fifty percent
of the cost of the qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property or two
thousand five hundred dollars for each qualified clean-burning motor vehicle
fuel property.
(4) No qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property shall qualify
for more than one rebate under this section.
Sec. 355. Section 66-204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
66-204 (1) The Clean-burning Motor Fuel Development Fund is created. The
fund shall consist of grants, private contributions, and all other sources.
(2) The fund shall be used by the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy to provide rebates under the Nebraska Clean-
burning Motor Fuel Development Act up to the amount transferred under
subsection (3) of this section. No more than thirty-five percent of the money
in the fund annually shall be used as rebates for flex-fuel dispensers. The
department may use the fund for necessary costs in the administration of the
act up to an amount not exceeding ten percent of the fund annually.
(3) Within five days after August 30, 2015, the State Treasurer shall
transfer five hundred thousand dollars from the General Fund to the Clean-
burning Motor Fuel Development Fund to carry out the Nebraska Clean-burning
Motor Fuel Development Act.
-130-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred thousand dollars from
the Clean-burning Motor Fuel Development Fund to the General Fund on or before
June 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 356. Section 66-301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
66-301 For purposes of sections 66-301 to 66-304:
(1) Covered electric generating unit means a fossil fuel-fired electric
generating unit existing within the state prior to August 30, 2015, that is
subject to regulation under the federal emission guidelines;
(2) Federal emission guidelines means any final rules, regulations,
guidelines, or other requirements that the United States Environmental
Protection Agency may adopt for regulating carbon dioxide emissions from
covered electric generating units under section 111(d) of the federal Clean Air
Act, 42 U.S.C. 7411(d);
(3) State means the State of Nebraska; and
(4) State plan means any plan to establish and enforce carbon dioxide
emission control measures that the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy may adopt to implement the obligations of the state
under the federal emission guidelines.
Sec. 357. Section 66-302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
66-302 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy shall not submit a state plan for regulating carbon dioxide emissions
from covered electric generating units to the United States Environmental
Protection Agency until the department has prepared a report as required in
section 66-303. Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from
complying with federally prescribed deadlines.
Sec. 358. Section 66-303, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
66-303 (1) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy shall also prepare a report that assesses the effects of the state
plan for regulating carbon dioxide emissions from covered electric generating
units on:
(a) The electric power sector, including:
(i) The type and amount of electric generating capacity within the state
that is likely to retire or switch to another fuel;
(ii) The stranded investment in electric generating capacity and other
infrastructure;
(iii) The amount of investment necessary to offset retirements of electric
generating capacity and maintain generation reserve margins;
(iv) Potential risks to electric reliability, including resource adequacy
risks and transmission constraints; and
(v) The amount by which retail electricity prices within the state are
forecast to increase or decrease; and
(b) Employment within the state, including direct and indirect employment
effects within affected sectors of the state's economy.
(2) The department shall complete the report required under this section
at least thirty days prior to submitting the state plan prepared pursuant to
section 66-302 and shall electronically submit to the Legislature a copy of
such report.
(3) If the Legislature is in session when it receives the report, the
Legislature may vote on a nonbinding legislative resolution endorsing or
disapproving the state plan based on the findings of the report.
Sec. 359. Section 66-304, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
66-304 Upon submitting a state plan to the United States Environmental
Protection Agency, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy shall electronically submit to the Legislature a copy of the state
plan.
Sec. 360. Section 66-489.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-489.02 (1) For tax periods beginning on and after July 1, 2009, at the
time of filing the return required by section 66-488, the producer, supplier,
distributor, wholesaler, or importer shall, in addition to the other taxes
provided for by law, pay a tax at the rate of five percent of the average
wholesale price of gasoline for the gallons of the motor fuels as shown by the
return, except that there shall be no tax on the motor fuels reported if they
are otherwise exempted by sections 66-482 to 66-4,149.
(2) The department shall calculate the average wholesale price of gasoline
on April 1, 2009, and on each April 1 and October 1 thereafter. The average
wholesale price on April 1 shall apply to returns for the tax periods beginning
on and after July 1, and the average wholesale price on October 1 shall apply
to returns for the tax periods beginning on and after January 1. The average
wholesale price shall be determined using data available from the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy and shall be an average
wholesale price per gallon of gasoline sold in the state over the previous six-
month period, excluding any state or federal excise tax or environmental fees.
The change in the average wholesale price between two six-month periods shall
-131-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
be adjusted so that the increase or decrease in the tax provided for in this
section or section 66-6,109.02 does not exceed one cent per gallon.
(3) All sums of money received under this section shall be credited to the
Highway Trust Fund. Credits and refunds of such tax allowed to producers,
suppliers, distributors, wholesalers, or importers shall be paid from the
Highway Trust Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and
refunds, shall be allocated as follows:
(a) Sixty-six percent to the Highway Cash Fund for the Department of
Transportation;
(b) Seventeen percent to the Highway Allocation Fund for allocation to the
various counties for road purposes; and
(c) Seventeen percent to the Highway Allocation Fund for allocation to the
various municipalities for street purposes.
Sec. 361. Section 66-1004, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-1004 Energy conservation measure shall mean installing or using any:
(1) Caulking or weatherstripping of doors or windows;
(2) Furnace efficiency modifications involving electric service;
(3) Clock thermostats;
(4) Water heater insulation or modification;
(5) Ceiling, attic, wall, or floor insulation;
(6) Storm windows or doors, multiglazed windows or doors, or heat
absorbing or reflective glazed window and door material;
(7) Devices which control demand of appliances and aid load management;
(8) Devices to utilize solar energy, biomass, or wind power for any energy
conservation purpose, including heating of water and space heating or cooling,
which have been identified by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy as an energy conservation measure for the purposes of
sections 66-1001 to 66-1011;
(9) High-efficiency lighting and motors;
(10) Devices which are designed to increase energy efficiency, the
utilization of renewable resources, or both; and
(11) Such other conservation measures as the department shall identify.
Sec. 362. Section 66-1009, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-1009 (1) A customer borrowing from a utility under a plan adopted
pursuant to sections 66-1001 to 66-1011 shall be allowed to contract with the
utility for a repayment plan and shall be offered a repayment period of not
less than three years and not more than twenty years.
(2) Upon default on a loan by a customer, after expending reasonable
efforts to collect, a utility may treat the entire unpaid contract amount as
due, but services to a residential, agricultural, or commercial customer may
not be terminated as a result of such default. Default occurs when any amount
due a utility under a plan adopted pursuant to sections 66-1001 to 66-1011,
70-625, 70-704, 81-1606 to 81-1626, and 84-162 to 84-167 is not paid within
sixty days of the due date.
(3) Any customer obtaining a loan pursuant to section 66-1007 shall only
use the funds to accomplish the purposes agreed upon at the time of the loan.
If the borrower of any funds obtained pursuant to sections 66-1001 to 66-1011
uses such funds in a manner or for a purpose not authorized by this section,
the total amount of the loan shall immediately become due and payable.
(4) Any amount due a utility on a loan pursuant to sections 66-1001 to
66-1011 which is not paid in full within sixty days of the due date shall
become a lien as provided in this section on the real property concerned as to
the full unpaid balance. No lien under this section shall be valid unless (a)
the loan was signed by the party or parties shown on the indexes of the
register of deeds to be the owners of record of such real property on the date
of the loan and (b) the lien is filed not more than four months after the date
of default, in the same office and in the same manner as mortgages in the
county in which the real property is located. Such lien shall take effect and
be in force from and after the time of delivering the same to the register of
deeds for recording, and not before, as to all creditors and subsequent
purchasers in good faith without notice, and such lien shall be adjudged void
as to all such creditors and subsequent purchasers without notice whose deeds,
mortgages, or other instruments shall be first recorded, except that such lien
shall be valid between the parties. A publicly owned utility shall not maintain
possession of any property which it may acquire pursuant to a lien authorized
by this section for a period of time longer than is reasonably necessary to
dispose of such property.
(5) Any loan made under a plan adopted pursuant to sections 66-1001 to
66-1011 shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars, subject to any existing
limitations under federal law. Any loan to be made by a utility which exceeds
ten thousand dollars shall only be made in participation with a bank pursuant
to a contract. The utility and the participating bank shall determine the terms
and conditions of the contract.
(6) The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 66-1001 to
66-1011.
Sec. 363. Section 66-1105, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-1105 Any person who desires to withdraw ground water within the State
of Nebraska for geothermal resource development shall, prior to commencing
construction of any wells, obtain from the Director of Water, Energy, and
-132-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Environment Natural Resources a permit to authorize the withdrawal, transfer,
and further use or reinjection of such ground water. The Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations governing the issuance of such permits, consistent with sections
66-1101 to 66-1106 and with Chapter 46, article 6. Such rules and regulations
shall provide for consultation with the Department of Environment and Energy
pursuant to the issuance of such permits and shall be compatible with rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the department Department of Environment
and Energy under the Environmental Protection Act. Any geothermal fluids
produced incident to the development and production of geothermal resources
shall be reinjected into the same geologic formation from which they were
extracted in substantially the same volume and substantially the same or higher
quality as when extracted unless the permit issued in accordance with this
section authorizes further uses or processing other than those incident to
reinjection.
Sec. 364. Section 66-1344, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-1344 (1) Beginning June 1, 2000, during such period as funds remain in
the Ethanol Production Incentive Cash Fund, any ethanol facility shall receive
a credit of seven and one-half cents per gallon of ethanol, before denaturing,
for new production for a period not to exceed thirty-six consecutive months.
For purposes of this subsection, new production means production which results
from the expansion of an existing facility's capacity by at least two million
gallons first placed into service after June 1, 1999, as certified by the
facility's design engineer to the Department of Revenue. For expansion of an
existing facility's capacity, new production means production in excess of the
average of the highest three months of ethanol production at an ethanol
facility during the twenty-four-month period immediately preceding
certification of the facility by the design engineer. No credits shall be
allowed under this subsection for expansion of an existing facility's capacity
until production is in excess of twelve times the three-month average amount
determined under this subsection during any twelve-consecutive-month period
beginning no sooner than June 1, 2000. New production shall be approved by the
Department of Revenue based on such ethanol production records as may be
necessary to reasonably determine new production. This credit must be earned on
or before December 31, 2003.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2002, any new ethanol facility which is in
production at the minimum rate of one hundred thousand gallons annually for the
production of ethanol, before denaturing, and which has provided to the
Department of Revenue written evidence substantiating that the ethanol facility
has received the requisite authority from the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy and from the United States Department of
Justice, Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, on or before June
30, 2004, shall receive a credit of eighteen cents per gallon of ethanol
produced for ninety-six consecutive months beginning with the first calendar
month for which it is eligible to receive such credit and ending not later than
June 30, 2012, if the facility is defined by subdivision (b)(i) of this
subsection, and for forty-eight consecutive months beginning with the first
calendar month for which it is eligible to receive such credit and ending not
later than June 30, 2008, if the facility is defined by subdivision (b)(ii) of
this subsection. The new ethanol facility shall provide an analysis to the
Department of Revenue of samples of the product collected according to
procedures specified by the department no later than July 30, 2004, and at
least annually thereafter. The analysis shall be prepared by an independent
laboratory meeting the International Organization for Standardization standard
ISO/IEC 17025:1999. Prior to collecting the samples, the new ethanol facility
shall notify the department which may observe the sampling procedures utilized
by the new ethanol facility to obtain the samples to be submitted for
independent analysis. The minimum rate shall be established for a period of at
least thirty days. In this regard, the new ethanol facility must produce at
least eight thousand two hundred nineteen gallons of ethanol within a thirty-
day period. The ethanol must be finished product which is ready for sale to
customers.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, new ethanol facility means a facility
for the conversion of grain or other raw feedstock into ethanol and other
byproducts of ethanol production which (i) is not in production on or before
September 1, 2001, or (ii) has not received credits prior to June 1, 1999. A
new ethanol facility does not mean an expansion of an existing ethanol plant
that does not result in the physical construction of an entire ethanol
processing facility or which shares or uses in a significant manner any
existing plant's systems or processes and does not include the expansion of
production capacity constructed after June 30, 2004, of a plant qualifying for
credits under this subsection. This definition applies to contracts entered
into after April 16, 2004.
(c) Not more than fifteen million six hundred twenty-five thousand gallons
of ethanol produced annually at an ethanol facility shall be eligible for
credits under this subsection. Not more than one hundred twenty-five million
gallons of ethanol produced at an ethanol facility by the end of the ninety-
six-consecutive-month period or forty-eight-consecutive-month period set forth
in this subsection shall be eligible for credits under this subsection.
(3) The credits described in this section shall be given only for ethanol
produced at a plant in Nebraska at which all fermentation, distillation, and
dehydration takes place. No credit shall be given on ethanol produced for or
-133-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
sold for use in the production of beverage alcohol. Not more than ten million
gallons of ethanol produced during any twelve-consecutive-month period at an
ethanol facility shall be eligible for the credit described in subsection (1)
of this section. The credits described in this section shall be in the form of
a nonrefundable, transferable motor vehicle fuel tax credit certificate. No
transfer of credits will be allowed between the ethanol producer and motor
vehicle fuel licensees who are related parties.
(4) Ethanol production eligible for credits under this section shall be
measured by a device approved by the Division of Weights and Measures of the
Department of Agriculture. Confirmation of approval by the division shall be
provided by the ethanol facility at the time the initial claim for credits
provided under this section is submitted to the Department of Revenue and
annually thereafter. Claims submitted by the ethanol producer shall be based on
the total number of gallons of ethanol produced, before denaturing, during the
reporting period measured in gross gallons.
(5) The Department of Revenue shall prescribe an application form and
procedures for claiming credits under this section. In order for a claim for
credits to be accepted, it must be filed by the ethanol producer within three
years of the date the ethanol was produced or by September 30, 2012, whichever
occurs first.
(6) Every producer of ethanol shall maintain records similar to those
required by section 66-487. The ethanol producer must maintain invoices, meter
readings, load-out sheets or documents, inventory records, including work-in-
progress, finished goods, and denaturant, and other memoranda requested by the
Department of Revenue relevant to the production of ethanol. On an annual
basis, the ethanol producer shall also be required to furnish the department
with copies of the reports filed with the United States Department of Justice,
Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. The maintenance of all of
this information in a provable computer format or on microfilm is acceptable in
lieu of retention of the original documents. The records must be retained for a
period of not less than three years after the claim for ethanol credits is
filed.
(7) For purposes of ascertaining the correctness of any application for
claiming a credit provided in this section, the Tax Commissioner (a) may
examine or cause to have examined, by any agent or representative designated by
him or her for that purpose, any books, papers, records, or memoranda bearing
upon such matters, (b) may by summons require the attendance of the person
responsible for rendering the application or other document or any officer or
employee of such person or the attendance of any other person having knowledge
in the premises, and (c) may take testimony and require proof material for his
or her information, with power to administer oaths or affirmations to such
person or persons. The time and place of examination pursuant to this
subsection shall be such time and place as may be fixed by the Tax Commissioner
and as are reasonable under the circumstances. In the case of a summons, the
date fixed for appearance before the Tax Commissioner shall not be less than
twenty days from the time of service of the summons. No taxpayer shall be
subjected to unreasonable or unnecessary examinations or investigations. All
records obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the
confidentiality requirements and exceptions thereto as provided in section
77-27,119.
(8) To qualify for credits under this section, an ethanol producer shall
provide public notice for bids before entering into any contract for the
construction of a new ethanol facility. Preference shall be given to a bidder
residing in Nebraska when awarding any contract for construction of a new
ethanol facility if comparable bids are submitted. For purposes of this
subsection, bidder residing in Nebraska means any person, partnership, foreign
or domestic limited liability company, association, or corporation authorized
to engage in business in the state with employees permanently located in
Nebraska. If an ethanol producer enters into a contract for the construction of
a new ethanol facility with a bidder who is not a bidder residing in Nebraska,
such producer shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Department of
Revenue in its application for credits that no comparable bid was submitted by
a responsible bidder residing in Nebraska. The department shall deny an
application for credits if it is determined that the contract was denied to a
responsible bidder residing in Nebraska without cause.
(9) The pertinent provisions of Chapter 66, article 7, relating to the
administration and imposition of motor fuel taxes shall apply to the
administration and imposition of assessments made by the Department of Revenue
relating to excess credits claimed by ethanol producers under the Ethanol
Development Act. These provisions include, but are not limited to, issuance of
a deficiency following an examination of records, an assessment becoming final
after sixty days absent a written protest, presumptions regarding the burden of
proof, issuance of deficiency within three years of original filing, issuance
of notice by registered or certified mail, issuance of penalties and waiver
thereof, issuance of interest and waiver thereof, and issuance of corporate
officer or employee or limited liability company manager or member assessments.
For purposes of determining interest and penalties, the due date will be
considered to be the date on which the credits were used by the licensees to
whom the credits were transferred.
(10) If a written protest is filed by the ethanol producer with the
department within the sixty-day period in subsection (9) of this section, the
protest shall: (a) Identify the ethanol producer; (b) identify the proposed
assessment which is being protested; (c) set forth each ground under which a
-134-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
redetermination of the department's position is requested together with facts
sufficient to acquaint the department with the exact basis thereof; (d) demand
the relief to which the ethanol producer considers itself entitled; and (e)
request that an evidentiary hearing be held to determine any issues raised by
the protest if the ethanol producer desires such a hearing.
(11) For applications received after April 16, 2004, an ethanol facility
receiving benefits under the Ethanol Development Act shall not be eligible for
benefits under the Employment and Investment Growth Act, the Invest Nebraska
Act, the Nebraska Advantage Act, or the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.
Sec. 365. Section 66-1504, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-1504 Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy.
Sec. 366. Section 66-1518, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-1518 (1) The Environmental Quality Council shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations governing reimbursements authorized under the Petroleum
Release Remedial Action Act. Such rules and regulations shall include:
(a) Procedures regarding the form and procedure for application for
payment or reimbursement from the fund, including the requirement for timely
filing of applications;
(b) Procedures for the requirement of submitting cost estimates for phases
or stages of remedial actions, procurement requirements to be followed by
responsible persons, and requirements for reuse of fixtures and tangible
personal property by responsible persons during a remedial action;
(c) Procedures for investigation of claims for payment or reimbursement;
(d) Procedures for determining the amount and type of costs that are
eligible for payment or reimbursement from the fund;
(e) Procedures for auditing persons who have received payments from the
fund;
(f) Procedures for reducing reimbursements made for a remedial action for
failure by the responsible person to comply with applicable statutory or
regulatory requirements. Reimbursement may be reduced as much as one hundred
percent; and
(g) Other procedures necessary to carry out the act.
(2) The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy
shall (a) estimate the cost to complete remedial action at each petroleum
contaminated site where the responsible party has been ordered by the
department to begin remedial action, and, based on such estimates, determine
the total cost that would be incurred in completing all remedial actions
ordered; (b) determine the total estimated cost of all approved remedial
actions; (c) determine the total dollar amount of all pending claims for
payment or reimbursement; (d) determine the total of all funds available for
reimbursement of pending claims; and (e) include the determinations made
pursuant to this subsection in the department's annual report to the
Legislature.
(3) The department Department of Environment and Energy shall make
available to the public a current schedule of reasonable rates for equipment,
services, material, and personnel commonly used for remedial action. The
department shall consider the schedule of reasonable rates in reviewing all
costs for the remedial action which are submitted in a plan. The rates shall be
used to determine the amount of reimbursement for the eligible and reasonable
costs of the remedial action, except that (a) the reimbursement for the costs
of the remedial action shall not exceed the actual eligible and reasonable
costs incurred by the responsible person or his or her designated
representative and (b) reimbursement may be made for costs which exceed or are
not included on the schedule of reasonable rates if the application for such
reimbursement is accompanied by sufficient evidence for the department to
determine and the department does determine that such costs are reasonable.
Sec. 367. Section 66-1529.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
66-1529.02 (1) The department may undertake remedial actions in response
to a release first reported after July 17, 1983, and on or before June 30,
2028, with money available in the fund if:
(a) The responsible person cannot be identified or located;
(b) An identified responsible person cannot or will not comply with the
remedial action requirements; or
(c) Immediate remedial action is necessary, as determined by the Director
of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy, to protect human
health or the environment.
(2) The department may pay the costs of a third-party claim meeting the
requirements of subdivision (2)(f) of section 66-1525 with money available in
the fund if the responsible person cannot or will not pay the third-party
claim.
(3) Reimbursement for any damages caused by the department or a person
acting at the department's direction while investigating or inspecting or
during remedial action on property other than property on which a release or
suspected release has occurred shall be considered as part of the cost of
remedial action involving the site where the release or suspected release
occurred. The costs shall be reimbursed from money available in the fund. If
such reimbursement is deemed inadequate by the party claiming the damages, the
party's claim for damages caused by the department shall be filed as provided
in section 76-705.
-135-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(4) All expenses paid from the fund under this section, court costs, and
attorney's fees may be recovered in a civil action in the district court of
Lancaster County. The action may be brought by the county attorney or Attorney
General at the request of the director against the responsible person. All
recovered expenses shall be deposited into the fund.
Sec. 368. Section 66-2001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-2001 (1) The Natural Gas Fuel Board is hereby established to advise the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy regarding
the promotion of natural gas as a motor vehicle fuel in Nebraska. The board
shall provide recommendations relating to:
(a) Distribution, infrastructure, and workforce development for natural
gas to be used as a motor vehicle fuel;
(b) Loans, grants, and tax incentives to encourage the use of natural gas
as a motor vehicle fuel for individuals and public and private fleets; and
(c) Such other matters as it deems appropriate.
(2) The board shall consist of eight members appointed by the Governor.
The Governor shall make the initial appointments by October 1, 2012. The board
shall include:
(a) One member representing a jurisdictional utility as defined in section
66-1802;
(b) One member representing a metropolitan utilities district;
(c) One member representing the interests of the transportation industry
in the state;
(d) One member representing the interests of the business community in the
state, specifically fueling station owners or operators;
(e) One member representing natural gas marketers or pipelines in the
state;
(f) One member representing automobile dealerships or repair businesses in
the state;
(g) One member representing labor interests in the state; and
(h) One member representing environmental interests in the state,
specifically air quality.
(3) All appointments shall be subject to the approval of a majority of the
members of the Legislature if the Legislature is in session, and if the
Legislature is not in session, any appointment to fill a vacancy shall be
temporary until the next session of the Legislature, at which time a majority
of the members of the Legislature may approve or disapprove such appointment.
(4) Members shall be appointed for terms of four years, except that of the
initial appointees the terms of the members representing a jurisdictional
utility and a metropolitan utilities district shall expire on September 30,
2015, the terms of the members representing the transportation industry, the
business community, natural gas marketers or pipelines, and automobile
dealerships or repair businesses shall expire on September 30, 2014, and the
terms of the members representing labor and environmental interests shall
expire on September 30, 2013. Members may be reappointed. A member shall serve
until a successor is appointed and qualified.
(5) A vacancy on the board shall exist in the event of death, disability,
resignation, or removal for cause of a member. Any vacancy on the board arising
other than from the expiration of a term shall be filled by appointment for the
unexpired portion of the term. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be made
by the Governor with the approval of a majority of the Legislature, and any
person so appointed shall have the same qualifications as the person whom he or
she succeeds.
(6) The board shall meet at least once annually.
(7) The members shall not be reimbursed for expenses associated with
carrying out their duties as members.
(8) The department shall provide administrative support to the board as
necessary so that the board may carry out its duties.
Sec. 369. Section 66-2201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-2201 For purposes of sections 66-2201 to 66-2207:
(1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(2) E-15 means a blend of ethanol and gasoline in which ethanol comprises
fifteen percent of the blend by volume;
(3) E-85 means a blend of ethanol and gasoline in which ethanol comprises
seventy percent or more of the blend by volume;
(4) Motor fuel pump means a meter or similar commercial weighing and
measuring device used to measure and dispense motor fuel originating from a
motor fuel storage tank;
(5) Program means the Renewable Fuel Infrastructure Program created in
section 66-2202;
(6) Retail dealer means a person engaged in the business of storing and
dispensing motor fuel from a motor fuel pump for sale on a retail basis; and
(7) Retail motor fuel site means a geographic location in this state where
a retail dealer sells and dispenses motor fuel from a motor fuel pump on a
retail basis.
Sec. 370. Section 66-2216, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
66-2216 Beginning in 2025, the Department of Revenue and the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy shall annually issue a
joint report that identifies the statewide ethanol blend rate. The statewide
-136-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
ethanol blend rate shall be equal to the average percentage of ethanol
contained in each gallon of motor fuel sold in this state. Retail dealers shall
provide a quarterly report of the number of gallons of each type of motor fuel
sold and the percentage of ethanol in each gallon to the Department of Revenue.
Reports to the Department of Revenue shall be submitted on a form and in the
manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue.
Sec. 371. Section 69-2011, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
69-2011 On and after October 1, 1993, a person shall not sell or offer for
sale at retail any disposable diaper which is constructed of a material which
is not biodegradable or photodegradable if the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy determines that biodegradable or
photodegradable disposable diapers are readily available at a comparable price
and quality. The determination of quality shall include a study of the
environmental impact and fate of such disposable diapers. The director shall
issue his or her determination to the Legislature on or before October 1, 1992.
For purposes of this section (1) readily available shall mean available for
purchase in sufficient quantities to meet demand through usual retail channels
throughout the state and (2) comparable price and quality shall mean at a cost
not in excess of five percent above the average price for products of
comparable quality which are not biodegradable or photodegradable.
Sec. 372. Section 69-2502, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
69-2502 For purposes of the Plastic Container Coding Act:
(1) Code shall mean a molded, imprinted, or raised symbol on or near the
bottom of a plastic bottle or rigid plastic container;
(2) Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(3) Plastic shall mean any material made of polymeric organic compounds
and additives that can be shaped by flow;
(4) Plastic bottle shall mean a plastic container intended for a single
use that:
(a) Has a neck smaller than the body of the container;
(b) Is designed for a screw-top, snap cap, or other closure; and
(c) Has a capacity of not less than sixteen fluid ounces or more than five
gallons; and
(5) Rigid plastic container shall mean any formed or molded container
intended for a single use, composed predominately of plastic resin, that has a
relatively inflexible finite shape or form with a capacity of not less than
eight ounces or more than five gallons. Rigid plastic container shall not
include a plastic bottle.
Sec. 373. Section 70-669, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
70-669 No inferior right to the use of the waters of this state shall be
acquired by a superior right without just compensation therefor to the inferior
user. The just compensation paid to those using water for power purposes shall
not be greater than the cost of replacing the power which would be generated in
the plant or plants of the power user by the water so acquired. The just
compensation to be paid to a holder of an instream-basin-management
appropriation that has been changed from a manufacturing of hydropower
appropriation pursuant to section 46-290 shall be the cost per acre-foot of
water subordinated for the hydropower appropriation at the time of approval of
the change. The amount of compensation may be adjusted annually, except that
any increase shall not exceed the annual change in the Consumer Price Index
from the time of approval of the change. If publication of such index is
discontinued, a comparable index selected by the Chief Water Officer of the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Director of Natural Resources
shall be used.
Sec. 374. Section 70-1003, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
70-1003 (1)(a) There is hereby established an independent board to be
known as the Nebraska Power Review Board. The board shall consist of five
members, including at least one engineer, at least one attorney, and three
additional persons. No more than one person who is or who has within four years
preceding such person's appointment been either a director, an officer, or an
employee of any electric utility or an elective state officer shall serve on
the board at the same time. Any board member who previously was either a
director, an officer, or an employee of any electric utility within four years
preceding such board member's appointment shall refrain from taking any action
or making any decision in any proceeding before the board that involves such
electric utility for a period of four years after the date such board member
ceased being a director, an officer, or an employee of such electric utility.
(b) Members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor subject to the
approval of the Legislature. Upon expiration of the terms of the members first
appointed, the successors shall be appointed for terms of four years. No member
of the board shall serve more than three consecutive terms. Any vacancy on the
board arising other than from the expiration of a term shall be filled by
appointment for the unexpired portion of the term, and any person appointed to
fill a vacancy on the board shall be eligible for reappointment for two more
consecutive terms. No more than three members of the board shall be registered
members of that political party represented by the Governor.
(2) Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars per day for
each day actually and necessarily engaged in the performance of his or her
-137-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
duties, but not to exceed seven thousand dollars in any one year, except for
the member designated to represent the board on the Southwest Power Pool
Regional State Committee or its equivalent successor, who shall receive two
hundred fifty dollars for each day actually and necessarily engaged in the
performance of his or her duties, not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars in
any one year. If the member designated to represent the board on the Southwest
Power Pool Regional State Committee should for any reason no longer serve in
that capacity during a year, the pay received while serving in such capacity
shall not be used for purposes of calculating the seven-thousand-dollar
limitation for board members not serving in that capacity. When another board
member acts as the proxy for the designated Southwest Power Pool Regional State
Committee member, he or she shall receive the same pay as the designated member
would have for that activity. Pay received while serving as proxy for such
designated member shall not be used for purposes of determining whether the
seven-thousand-dollar limitation has been met for board members not serving as
such designated member. Total pay to board members for activities related to
the Southwest Power Pool shall not exceed an aggregate total of forty thousand
dollars in any one year. Each member shall be reimbursed for expenses while so
engaged as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The board shall have
jurisdiction as provided in Chapter 70, article 10.
(3) The board shall elect from their members a chairperson and a vice-
chairperson. Decisions of the board shall require the approval of a majority of
the members of the board.
(4) The board shall employ an executive director and may employ such other
staff necessary to carry out the duties pursuant to Chapter 70, article 10. The
executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board and shall be solely
responsible to the board. The executive director shall be responsible for the
administrative operations of the board and shall perform such other duties as
may be delegated or assigned to him or her by the board. The board may obtain
the services of experts and consultants necessary to carry out the board's
duties pursuant to Chapter 70, article 10.
(5) The board shall publish and submit a biennial report with annual data
to the Governor, with copies to be filed with the Clerk of the Legislature and
with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy.
The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. The department shall consider the information in the Nebraska
Power Review Board's report when the department prepares its own reports
pursuant to sections 81-1606 and 81-1607. The report of the board shall
include:
(a) The assessments for the fiscal year imposed pursuant to section
70-1020;
(b) The gross income totals for each category of the industry and the
industry total;
(c) The number of suppliers against whom the assessment is levied, by
category and in total;
(d) The projected dollar costs of generation, transmission, and microwave
applications, approved and denied;
(e) The actual dollar costs of approved applications upon completion, and
a summary of an informational hearing concerning any significant divergence
between the projected and actual costs;
(f) A description of Nebraska's current electric system and information on
additions to and retirements from the system during the fiscal year, including
microwave facilities;
(g) A statistical summary of board activities and an expenditure summary;
(h) A roster of power suppliers in Nebraska and the assessment each paid;
and
(i) Appropriately detailed historical and projected electric supply and
demand statistics, including information on the total generating capacity owned
by Nebraska suppliers and the total peak load demand of the previous year,
along with an indication of how the industry will respond to the projected
situation.
(6) The board may, in its discretion, hold public hearings concerning the
conditions that may indicate that retail competition in the electric industry
would benefit Nebraska's citizens and what steps, if any, should be taken to
prepare for retail competition in Nebraska's electricity market. In determining
whether to hold such hearings, the board shall consider the sufficiency of
public interest.
(7) The board may, at any time deemed beneficial by the board, submit a
report to the Governor with copies to be filed with the Clerk of the
Legislature and the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature. The report
filed with the Clerk of the Legislature and the committee shall be filed
electronically. The report may include:
(a) Whether or not a viable regional transmission organization and
adequate transmission exist in Nebraska or in a region which includes Nebraska;
(b) Whether or not a viable wholesale electricity market exists in a
region which includes Nebraska;
(c) To what extent retail rates have been unbundled in Nebraska;
(d) A comparison of Nebraska's wholesale electricity prices to the prices
in the region; and
(e) Any other information the board believes to be beneficial to the
Governor, the Legislature, and Nebraska's citizens when considering whether
retail electric competition would be beneficial, such as, but not limited to,
an update on deregulation activities in other states and an update on federal
-138-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
deregulation legislation.
(8) The board may establish working groups of interested parties to assist
the board in carrying out the powers set forth in subsections (6) and (7) of
this section.
Sec. 375. Section 71-2433, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-2433 A property owner with knowledge of a clandestine drug lab on his
or her property shall report such knowledge and location as soon as practicable
to the local law enforcement agency or to the Nebraska State Patrol. A law
enforcement agency that discovers a clandestine drug lab in the State of
Nebraska shall report the location of such lab to the Nebraska State Patrol
within thirty days after making such discovery. Such report shall include the
date of discovery of such lab, the county where the property containing such
lab is located, and a legal description of the property or other description or
address of such property sufficient to clearly establish its location. As soon
as practicable after such discovery, the appropriate law enforcement agency
shall provide the Nebraska State Patrol with a complete list of the chemicals,
including methamphetamine, its precursors, solvents, and related reagents,
found at or removed from the location of such lab. Upon receipt, the Nebraska
State Patrol shall promptly forward a copy of such report and list to the
department, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy, the municipality or county where the lab is located, the director of
the local public health department serving such municipality or county, and the
property owner or owners.
Sec. 376. Section 71-3503, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-3503 For purposes of the Radiation Control Act, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Radiation means ionizing radiation and nonionizing radiation as
follows:
(a) Ionizing radiation means gamma rays, X-rays, alpha and beta particles,
high-speed electrons, neutrons, protons, and other atomic or nuclear particles
or rays but does not include sound or radio waves or visible, infrared, or
ultraviolet light; and
(b) Nonionizing radiation means (i) any electromagnetic radiation which
can be generated during the operations of electronic products to such energy
density levels as to present a biological hazard to occupational and public
health and safety and the environment, other than ionizing electromagnetic
radiation, and (ii) any sonic, ultrasonic, or infrasonic waves which are
emitted from an electronic product as a result of the operation of an
electronic circuit in such product and to such energy density levels as to
present a biological hazard to occupational and public health and safety and
the environment;
(2) Radioactive material means any material, whether solid, liquid, or
gas, which emits ionizing radiation spontaneously. Radioactive material
includes, but is not limited to, accelerator-produced material, byproduct
material, naturally occurring material, source material, and special nuclear
material;
(3) Radiation-generating equipment means any manufactured product or
device, component part of such a product or device, or machine or system which
during operation can generate or emit radiation except devices which emit
radiation only from radioactive material;
(4) Sources of radiation means any radioactive material, any radiation-
generating equipment, or any device or equipment emitting or capable of
emitting radiation or radioactive material;
(5) Undesirable radiation means radiation in such quantity and under such
circumstances as determined from time to time by rules and regulations adopted
and promulgated by the department;
(6) Person means any individual, corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, firm, association, trust, estate, public or private
institution, group, agency, political subdivision of this state, any other
state or political subdivision or agency thereof, and any legal successor,
representative, agent, or agency of the foregoing;
(7) Registration means registration with the department pursuant to the
Radiation Control Act;
(8) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(9) Administrator means the administrator of radiation control designated
pursuant to section 71-3504;
(10) Electronic product means any manufactured product, device, assembly,
or assemblies of such products or devices which, during operation in an
electronic circuit, can generate or emit a physical field of radiation;
(11) License means:
(a) A general license issued pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the department without the filing of an application with the
department or the issuance of licensing documents to particular persons to
transfer, acquire, own, possess, or use quantities of or devices or equipment
utilizing radioactive materials;
(b) A specific license, issued to a named person upon application filed
with the department pursuant to the Radiation Control Act and rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, to use, manufacture,
produce, transfer, receive, acquire, own, or possess quantities of or devices
or equipment utilizing radioactive materials; or
(c) A license issued to a radon measurement specialist, radon mitigation
-139-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
specialist, radon measurement business, or radon mitigation business;
(12) Byproduct material means:
(a) Any radioactive material, except special nuclear material, yielded in
or made radioactive by exposure to the radiation incident to the process of
producing or utilizing special nuclear material;
(b) The tailings or wastes produced by the extraction or concentration of
uranium or thorium from any ore processed primarily for its source material
content, including discrete surface wastes resulting from uranium or thorium
solution extraction processes. Underground ore bodies depleted by such solution
extraction operations do not constitute byproduct material;
(c)(i) Any discrete source of radium-226 that is produced, extracted, or
converted after extraction for use for a commercial, medical, or research
activity; or
(ii) Any material that (A) has been made radioactive by use of a particle
accelerator and (B) is produced, extracted, or converted after extraction for
use for a commercial, medical, or research activity; and
(d) Any discrete source of naturally occurring radioactive material, other
than source material, that:
(i) The United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, in consultation with
the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the
United States Secretary of Energy, the United States Secretary of Homeland
Security, and the head of any other appropriate federal agency, determines
would pose a threat similar to the threat posed by a discrete source of
radium-226 to the public health and safety or the common defense and security;
and
(ii) Is extracted or converted after extraction for use in a commercial,
medical, or research activity;
(13) Source material means:
(a) Uranium or thorium or any combination thereof in any physical or
chemical form; or
(b) Ores which contain by weight one-twentieth of one percent or more of
uranium, thorium, or any combination thereof. Source material does not include
special nuclear material;
(14) Special nuclear material means:
(a) Plutonium, uranium 233, or uranium enriched in the isotope 233 or in
the isotope 235 and any other material that the United States Nuclear
Regulatory Commission pursuant to the provisions of section 51 of the federal
Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, determines to be special nuclear
material but does not include source material; or
(b) Any material artificially enriched by any material listed in
subdivision (14)(a) of this section but does not include source material;
(15) Users of sources of radiation means:
(a) Physicians using radioactive material or radiation-generating
equipment for human use;
(b) Natural persons using radioactive material or radiation-generating
equipment for education, research, or development purposes;
(c) Natural persons using radioactive material or radiation-generating
equipment for manufacture or distribution purposes;
(d) Natural persons using radioactive material or radiation-generating
equipment for industrial purposes; and
(e) Natural persons using radioactive material or radiation-generating
equipment for any other similar purpose;
(16) Civil penalty means any monetary penalty levied on a licensee or
registrant because of violations of statutes, rules, regulations, licenses, or
registration certificates but does not include criminal penalties;
(17) Closure means all activities performed at a waste handling,
processing, management, or disposal site, such as stabilization and contouring,
to assure that the site is in a stable condition so that only minor custodial
care, surveillance, and monitoring are necessary at the site following
termination of licensed operation;
(18) Decommissioning means final operational activities at a facility to
dismantle site structures, to decontaminate site surfaces and remaining
structures, to stabilize and contain residual radioactive material, and to
carry out any other activities to prepare the site for postoperational care;
(19) Disposal means the permanent isolation of low-level radioactive waste
pursuant to the Radiation Control Act and rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated pursuant to such act;
(20) Generate means to produce low-level radioactive waste when used in
relation to low-level radioactive waste;
(21) High-level radioactive waste means:
(a) Irradiated reactor fuel;
(b) Liquid wastes resulting from the operation of the first cycle solvent
extraction system or equivalent and the concentrated wastes from subsequent
extraction cycles or the equivalent in a facility for reprocessing irradiated
reactor fuel; and
(c) Solids into which such liquid wastes have been converted;
(22) Low-level radioactive waste means radioactive waste not defined as
high-level radioactive waste, spent nuclear fuel, or byproduct material as
defined in subdivision (12)(b) of this section;
(23) Management of low-level radioactive waste means the handling,
processing, storage, reduction in volume, disposal, or isolation of such waste
from the biosphere in any manner;
(24) Source material mill tailings or mill tailings means the tailings or
-140-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
wastes produced by the extraction or concentration of uranium or thorium from
any ore processed primarily for its source material content, including discrete
surface wastes resulting from underground solution extraction processes, but
not including underground ore bodies depleted by such solution extraction
processes;
(25) Source material milling means any processing of ore, including
underground solution extraction of unmined ore, primarily for the purpose of
extracting or concentrating uranium or thorium therefrom and which results in
the production of source material and source material mill tailings;
(26) Spent nuclear fuel means irradiated nuclear fuel that has undergone
at least one year of decay since being used as a source of energy in a power
reactor. Spent nuclear fuel includes the special nuclear material, byproduct
material, source material, and other radioactive material associated with fuel
assemblies;
(27) Transuranic waste means radioactive waste material containing alpha-
emitting radioactive elements, with radioactive half-lives greater than five
years, having an atomic number greater than 92 in concentrations in excess of
one hundred nanocuries per gram;
(28) Licensed practitioner means a person licensed to practice medicine,
dentistry, podiatry, chiropractic, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or as an
osteopathic physician;
(29) X-ray system means an assemblage of components for the controlled
production of X-rays, including, but not limited to, an X-ray high-voltage
generator, an X-ray control, a tube housing assembly, a beam-limiting device,
and the necessary supporting structures. Additional components which function
with the system are considered integral parts of the system; and
(30) Licensed facility operator means any person or entity who has
obtained a license under the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act to
operate a facility, including any person or entity to whom an assignment of a
license is approved by the Department of Environment and Energy; and
(30) (31) Deliberate misconduct means an intentional act or omission by a
person that (a) would intentionally cause a licensee, registrant, or applicant
for a license or registration to be in violation of any rule, regulation, or
order of or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration
issued by the department under the Radiation Control Act or (b) constitutes an
intentional violation of a requirement, procedure, instruction, contract,
purchase order, or policy under the Radiation Control Act by a licensee, a
registrant, an applicant for a license or registration, or a contractor or
subcontractor of a licensee, registrant, or applicant for a license or
registration.
Sec. 377. Section 71-3508.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-3508.04 (1) For licensed activities involving source material milling,
source material mill tailings, and management of low-level radioactive waste,
the department shall, and for other classes of licensed activities the
department may, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which establish
standards and procedures to ensure that the licensee will provide an adequate
surety or other financial arrangement to permit the completion of all
requirements established by the department for the licensure, regulation,
decontamination, closure, decommissioning, and reclamation of sites,
structures, and equipment used in conjunction with such licensed activity in
case the licensee should default for any reason in performing such
requirements. All sureties required which are forfeited shall be paid to the
department and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and
Human Services Cash Fund. Money in such fund remitted pursuant to this
subsection shall be expended by the department as necessary to complete the
closure and reclamation requirements and shall not be used for normal operating
expenses of the department.
(2) For licensed activities involving the disposal of source material mill
tailings and management of low-level radioactive waste, the department shall,
and for other classes of licensed activities when radioactive material which
will require surveillance or care is likely to remain at the site after the
licensed activities cease the department may, adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations which establish standards and procedures to ensure that the
licensee, before termination of the license, will make available such funding
arrangements as may be necessary to provide for long-term site surveillance and
care. All such funds collected from licensees shall be paid to the department
and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. All funds accrued
as interest on money credited to the fund pursuant to this subsection may be
expended by the department for the continuing long-term surveillance,
maintenance, and other care of facilities from which such funds are collected
as necessary for protection of the occupational and public health and safety
and the environment. If title to and custody of any radioactive material and
its disposal site are transferred to the United States upon termination of any
license for which funds have been collected for such long-term care, the
collected funds and interest accrued thereon shall be transferred to the United
States.
(3) The sureties or other financial arrangements and funds required by
this section shall be established in amounts sufficient to ensure compliance
with standards, if any, established by the department pertaining to licensure,
regulation, closure, decommissioning, reclamation, and long-term site
surveillance and care of such facilities and sites.
(4) To provide for the proper care and surveillance of sites subject to
-141-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
subsection (2) of this section which are not subject to section 71-3508.01 or
71-3508.02, the state may acquire by gift or transfer from another governmental
agency or private person any land and appurtenances necessary to fulfill the
purposes of this section. Any such gift or transfer shall be subject to
approval and acceptance by the Legislature.
(5) The department may by contract, agreement, lease, or license with any
person, including another state agency, provide for the decontamination,
closure, decommissioning, reclamation, surveillance, or other care of a site
subject to this section as needed to carry out the purposes of this section.
(6) If a person licensed by any governmental agency other than the
department desires to transfer a site to the state for the purpose of
administering or providing long-term care, a lump-sum deposit shall be made to
the department and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and
Human Services Cash Fund. The amount of such deposit shall be determined by the
department taking into account the factors stated in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section.
Sec. 378. Section 71-3524, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-3524 For purposes of sections 71-3523 to 71-3528:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) High-level radioactive waste means (a) irradiated reactor fuel, (b)
liquid wastes resulting from the operation of the first cycle solvent
extraction system or equivalent and the concentrated wastes from subsequent
extraction cycles or equivalent in a facility for reprocessing irradiated
reactor fuel, (c) solids into which such liquid wastes have been converted, and
(d) other highly radioactive waste material as defined by the United States
Nuclear Regulatory Commission High-level radioactive waste has the definition
found in section 81-1589; and
(3) Transuranic waste means radioactive waste material containing alpha-
emitting radioactive elements, with radioactive half-lives greater than five
years, having an atomic number greater than 92 in concentrations in excess of
one hundred nanocuries per gram.
Sec. 379. Section 71-5301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-5301 For purposes of the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Council means the Advisory Council on Public Water Supply;
(2) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(3) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy or his or her authorized representative;
(4) Designated agent means any political subdivision or corporate entity
having the demonstrated capability and authority to carry out in whole or in
part the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act and with which the director has
consummated a legal and binding contract covering specifically delegated
responsibilities;
(5) Major construction, extension, or alteration means those structural
changes that affect the source of supply, treatment processes, or transmission
of water to service areas but does not include the extension of service mains
within established service areas;
(6) Operator means the individual or individuals responsible for the
continued performance of the water supply system or any part of such system
during assigned duty hours;
(7) Owner means any person owning or operating a public water system;
(8) Person means any individual, corporation, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, association, company, trust, estate, public or private
institution, group, agency, political subdivision, or other entity or any legal
successor, representative, agent, or agency of any of such entities;
(9) Water supply system means all sources of water and their surroundings
under the control of one owner and includes all structures, conduits, and
appurtenances by means of which such water is collected, treated, stored, or
delivered except service pipes between street mains and buildings and the
plumbing within or in connection with the buildings served;
(10)(a) Public water system means a system for providing the public with
water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances, if
such system has at least fifteen service connections or regularly serves an
average of at least twenty-five individuals daily at least sixty days per year.
Public water system includes (i) any collection, treatment, storage, and
distribution facilities under control of the operator of such system and used
primarily in connection with such system and (ii) any collection or
pretreatment storage facilities not under such control which are used primarily
in connection with such system. Public water system does not include a special
irrigation district. A public water system is either a community water system
or a noncommunity water system.
(b) Service connection does not include a connection to a system that
delivers water by a constructed conveyance other than a pipe if (i) the water
is used exclusively for purposes other than residential uses, consisting of
drinking, bathing, cooking, and other similar uses, (ii) the department
determines that alternative water to achieve the equivalent level of public
health protection provided by the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act and rules
and regulations under the act is provided for residential or similar uses for
drinking and cooking, or (iii) the department determines that the water
provided for residential or similar uses for drinking, cooking, and bathing is
-142-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
centrally treated or treated at the point of entry by the provider, a pass-
through entity, or the user to achieve the equivalent level of protection
provided by the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act and the rules and regulations
under the act.
(c) Special irrigation district means an irrigation district in existence
prior to May 18, 1994, that provides primarily agricultural service through a
piped water system with only incidental residential or similar use if the
system or the residential or similar users of the system comply with exclusion
provisions of subdivision (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subdivision;
(11) Drinking water standards means rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated pursuant to section 71-5302 which (a) establish maximum levels for
harmful materials which, in the judgment of the director, may have an adverse
effect on the health of persons and (b) apply only to public water systems;
(12) Lead free means (a) not containing more than two-tenths percent lead
when used with respect to solder and flux and (b) not containing more than a
weighted average of twenty-five hundredths percent lead when used with respect
to the wetted surfaces of pipes, pipe fittings, plumbing fittings, and
fixtures;
(13) Community water system means a public water system that (a) serves at
least fifteen service connections used by year-round residents of the area
served by the system or (b) regularly serves at least twenty-five year-round
residents;
(14) Noncommunity water system means a public water system that is not a
community water system;
(15) Nontransient noncommunity water system means a public water system
that is not a community water system and that regularly serves at least twenty-
five of the same individuals over six months per year; and
(16) Federal Safe Drinking Water Act means the federal Safe Drinking Water
Act, 42 U.S.C. 300f et seq., as the act existed on January 1, 2021.
Sec. 380. Section 71-5316, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-5316 For purposes of the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Act,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Safe Drinking Water Act means the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as
the act existed on October 23, 2018;
(2) Construction means any of the following: Preliminary planning to
determine the feasibility of a safe drinking water project for a public water
system; engineering, architectural, legal, fiscal, or economic investigations
or studies; surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications,
procedures, or other necessary preliminary actions; erection, building,
acquisition, alteration, remodeling, improvement, or extension of public water
systems; or the inspection or supervision of any of such items;
(3) Council means the Environmental Quality Council;
(4) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(5) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(6) Operate and maintain means all necessary activities, including the
normal replacement of equipment or appurtenances, to assure the dependable and
economical function of a public water system in accordance with its intended
purpose;
(7) Owner means any person owning or operating a public water system;
(8) Public water system has the definition found in section 71-5301; and
(9) Safe drinking water project means the structures, equipment,
surroundings, and processes required to establish and operate a public water
system.
Sec. 381. Section 71-5328, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-5328 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(b) Metropolitan utilities district means a district created pursuant to
section 14-2101; and
(c) Qualified labor training organization means any job training service
provider headquartered in the State of Nebraska with a demonstrated history of
providing workforce training relevant to the skilled labor necessary for the
removal and replacement of lead service lines.
(2) The Lead Service Line Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the department. The fund shall consist of funds transferred by
the Legislature. The fund shall be used for grants under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3) The department shall utilize not more than twenty percent of the money
in the Lead Service Line Cash Fund for the purpose of providing grants to
qualified labor training organizations for the following:
(a) Infrastructure expenditures necessary to establish a lead service line
training facility or for any expenditures necessary to establish a lead service
line training program; or
(b) Labor training or any educational programming expenditures necessary
to provide the proper trade skills necessary for laborers and plumbers to
replace lead service lines.
(4) The department shall utilize all remaining money in the Lead Service
-143-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Line Cash Fund for the purpose of providing grants to metropolitan utilities
districts for the following:
(a) Removing and replacing lead service lines;
(b) Repaying debt incurred for any loan received by the metropolitan
utilities district for the purpose of replacing lead service lines, including
any loan or loans under the federal Drinking Water State Revolving Fund or any
other loan incurred specifically for the purpose of removing lead service
lines;
(c) Providing information to residents on the benefits of removing lead
service lines;
(d) Performing necessary construction, assessment, mapping, or any other
labor, management, or contracted services required for and associated with
removing and replacing lead service lines; or
(e) Acquiring any equipment, materials, or supplies necessary to replace
lead service lines.
(5) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out this section.
Sec. 382. Section 71-6406, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-6406 (1)(a) Any county, city, or village may enact, administer, or
enforce a local building or construction code if or as long as such county,
city, or village:
(i) Adopts the state building code; or
(ii) Adopts a building or construction code that conforms generally with
the state building code.
(b) If a county, city, or village does not adopt a code as authorized
under subdivision (a) of this subsection within two years after an update to
the state building code, the state building code shall apply in the county,
city, or village, except that such code shall not apply to construction on a
farm or for farm purposes.
(2) A local building or construction code shall be deemed to conform
generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Adopts a special or differing building standard by amending,
modifying, or deleting any portion of the state building code in order to
reduce unnecessary costs of construction, increase safety, durability, or
efficiency, establish best building or construction practices within the
county, city, or village, or address special local conditions within the
county, city, or village;
(b) Adopts any supplement, new edition, appendix, or component or
combination of components of the state building code;
(c) Adopts any of the following:
(i) Section 305 or 310 of the 2018 edition of the International Building
Code without the exceptions described in subdivision (1)(a) of section 71-6403;
(ii) Section 101.4.3 or any portion of chapter 29 of the 2018 edition of
the International Building Code;
(iii) Section R313 or any portion of chapters 25 through 33 of the 2018
edition of the International Residential Code; or
(iv) Section 809 of the 2018 edition of the International Existing
Building Code;
(d) Adopts a plumbing code, an electrical code, a fire prevention code, or
any other standard code as authorized under section 14-419, 15-905, 18-132, or
23-172;
(e) Adopts a local energy code as authorized under section 81-1618; or
(f) Adopts minimum standards for radon resistant new construction which
meet the minimum standards adopted under section 76-3504.
(3) A local building or construction code shall not be deemed to conform
generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Includes a prior edition of any component or combination of components
of the state building code; or
(b) Does not include minimum standards for radon resistant new
construction that meet the minimum standards adopted under section 76-3504.
(4) A county, city, or village shall notify the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy if it amends or modifies its
local building or construction code in such a way as to delete any portion of
(a) chapter 13 of the 2018 edition of the International Building Code or (b)
chapter 11 of the 2018 edition of the International Residential Code. The
notification shall be made within thirty days after the adoption of such
amendment or modification.
(5) A county, city, or village shall not adopt or enforce a local building
or construction code other than as provided by this section.
(6) A county, city, or village which adopts or enforces a local building
or construction code under this section shall regularly update its code. For
purposes of this section, a code shall be deemed to be regularly updated if the
most recently enacted state building code or a code that conforms generally
with the state building code is adopted by the county, city, or village within
two years after an update to the state building code.
(7) A county, city, or village may adopt amendments for the proper
administration and enforcement of its local building or construction code
including organization of enforcement, qualifications of staff members,
examination of plans, inspections, appeals, permits, and fees. Any amendment
adopted pursuant to this section shall be published separately from the local
building or construction code. Any local building or construction code adopted
under subdivision (1)(a) of this section or the state building code if
-144-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
applicable under subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall be the legally
applicable code regardless of whether the county, city, or village has provided
for the administration or enforcement of its local building or construction
code under this subsection.
(8) A county, city, or village which adopts one or more standard codes as
part of its local building or construction code under this section shall keep
at least one copy of each adopted code, or portion thereof, for use and
examination by the public in the office of the clerk of the county, city, or
village prior to the adoption of the code and as long as such code is in
effect.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Building Construction Act, a
public building of any political subdivision shall be built in accordance with
the applicable local building or construction code. Fees, if any, for services
which monitor a builder's application of codes shall be negotiable between the
political subdivisions involved, but such fees shall not exceed the actual
expenses incurred by the county, city, or village doing the monitoring.
Sec. 383. Section 72-804, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
72-804 (1) Any new state building shall meet or exceed the requirements of
the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code published by the International
Code Council.
(2) Any new lighting, heating, cooling, ventilating, or water heating
equipment or controls in a state-owned building and any new building envelope
components installed in a state-owned building shall meet or exceed the
requirements of the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code.
(3) The State Building Administrator of the Department of Administrative
Services, in consultation with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy, may specify:
(a) A more recent edition of the International Energy Conservation Code;
(b) Additional energy efficiency or renewable energy requirements for
buildings; and
(c) Waivers of specific requirements which are demonstrated through life-
cycle cost analysis to not be in the state's best interest. The agency
receiving the funding shall be required to provide a life-cycle cost analysis
to the State Building Administrator.
Sec. 384. Section 72-805, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
72-805 The 2018 International Energy Conservation Code, published by the
International Code Council, applies to all new buildings constructed in whole
or in part with state funds after July 1, 2020. The Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy shall review building plans and
specifications necessary to determine whether a building will meet the
requirements of this section. The department shall provide a copy of its review
to the agency receiving funding. The agency receiving the funding shall verify
that the building as constructed meets or exceeds the code. The verification
shall be provided to the department. The Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy may, in consultation with the State Building
Administrator of the Department of Administrative Services, adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 385. Section 76-2,124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-2,124 (1) Any person transferring ownership of real property not inside
the corporate limits of a municipality shall complete and provide to the
transferee, at or before the closing of the transfer, a water resources update
notice acknowledging (a) whether any surface water rights issued pursuant to
Chapter 46, article 2, and in the name of any party other than an irrigation
district, public power and irrigation district, or mutual irrigation company
are attached to the real property, ownership of which is being transferred, and
(b) whether there are any water wells, except water wells used solely for
domestic purposes and constructed prior to September 9, 1993, on the real
property, ownership of which is being transferred. If the water resources
update notice discloses the existence of such surface water rights or such
water wells, the transferee shall complete the water resources update notice
and shall file it with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural
Resources within sixty days after recording the deed or other instrument by
which the transfer of ownership of real property is made. The department shall
use such notice to update ownership of surface water rights and water well
registrations as required by sections 46-230 and 46-602.
(2) The department shall prescribe the form and content of the water
resources update notice and shall make such forms available to title insurance
companies and other persons as deemed appropriate by the department. The
requirement that a water resources update notice be filed with the department
or the failure to file such a notice does not affect the recording, legality,
or sufficiency of a deed or other instrument evidencing the transfer of
ownership of real property.
(3) The department shall not collect a fee for the filing of the water
resources update notices.
Sec. 386. Section 76-2602, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
76-2602 In the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act:
(1) Activity and use limitations means restrictions or obligations created
under the act with respect to real property.
(2) Agency means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
-145-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Environment and Energy or any other Nebraska or federal agency that determines
or approves the environmental response project pursuant to which the
environmental covenant is created.
(3) Common interest community means a condominium, cooperative, or other
real property with respect to which a person, by virtue of the person's
ownership of a parcel of real property, is obligated to pay property taxes or
insurance premiums, or for maintenance, or improvement of other real property
described in a recorded covenant that creates the common interest community.
(4) Environmental covenant means a servitude arising under an
environmental response project that imposes activity and use limitations.
(5) Environmental response project means a plan or work performed for
environmental remediation of real property and conducted:
(A) Under a federal or state program governing environmental remediation
of real property, including the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act;
(B) Incident to closure of a solid or hazardous waste management unit, if
the closure is conducted with approval of an agency; or
(C) Under a state voluntary cleanup program authorized by the Remedial
Action Plan Monitoring Act.
(6) Holder means the grantee of an environmental covenant as specified in
subsection (a) of section 76-2603.
(7) Person means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture,
public corporation, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(8) Record, used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a
tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(9) State means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular
possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
Sec. 387. Section 76-2608, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
76-2608 (a) An environmental covenant, any amendment or termination of the
covenant under section 76-2609 or 76-2610, and any subordination agreement must
be recorded in every county in which any portion of the real property subject
to the covenant is located. For purposes of indexing, a holder shall be treated
as a grantee.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of section 76-2609, an
environmental covenant is subject to the laws of this state governing recording
and priority of interests in real property.
(c) A copy of a document recorded under subsection (a) of this section
shall also be provided to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy if the department has not signed the covenant.
(d) The department shall make available to the public a listing of all
documents under subsection (a) of this section or documents under subsection
(c) of this section which have been provided to the department.
Sec. 388. Section 77-3,112, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-3,112 (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law, the Tax Commissioner
shall not approve or grant to any person or taxpayer any tax credit or
exemption for the construction of a facility or the employment of people for
the disposal in Nebraska of low-level radioactive waste for which a license is
required pursuant to the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law, the Tax Commissioner shall not
approve or grant to any person any tax credit, exemption, or refund for the
employment of any person who has been removed from the United States pursuant
to proceedings initiated by the United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement, or other competent authority, or who has been convicted in a
criminal court proceeding for offenses related to illegal immigration. Any
benefits that were received prior to the removal or conviction will be
recaptured to the extent the benefits were received based on the employment of
such persons.
Sec. 389. Section 77-27,150, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,150 (1) An application for a refund of Nebraska sales and use taxes
paid for any air or water pollution control facility may be filed with the Tax
Commissioner by the owner of such facility in such manner and in such form as
may be prescribed by the commissioner. The application for a refund shall
contain: (a) Plans and specifications of such facility including all materials
incorporated therein; (b) a descriptive list of all equipment acquired by the
applicant for the purpose of industrial or agricultural waste pollution
control; (c) the proposed operating procedure for the facility; (d) the
acquisition cost of the facility for which a refund is claimed; and (e) a copy
of the final findings of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy issued pursuant to section 77-27,151.
(2) The Tax Commissioner shall offer an applicant a hearing upon request
of such applicant. The hearing shall not affect the authority of the Department
of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy to determine whether
or not industrial or agricultural waste pollution control exists within the
meaning of the Air and Water Pollution Control Tax Refund Act.
(3) A claim for refund received without a copy of the final findings of
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy issued
pursuant to section 77-27,151 shall not be considered a valid claim and shall
-146-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
be returned to the applicant.
(4) Notice of the Tax Commissioner's refusal to issue a refund shall be
mailed to the applicant.
Sec. 390. Section 77-27,151, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,151 If the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy finds that a facility or multiple facilities at a single location
are designed and operated primarily for control, capture, abatement, or removal
of industrial or agricultural waste from air or water and are suitable, are
reasonably adequate, and meet the intent and purposes of the Environmental
Protection Act, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy shall so notify the owner of the facility in writing of its findings
that the facility, multiple facilities, or the specified portions of any
facility are approved. The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy shall also notify the Tax Commissioner of its findings
and the extent of commercial or productive value derived from any materials
captured or recovered by the facility.
Sec. 391. Section 77-27,152, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,152 (1) The Tax Commissioner, after giving notice by mail to the
applicant and giving an opportunity for a hearing, shall modify or revoke the
refund whenever the following appears: (a) The refund was obtained by fraud or
misrepresentation regarding the payment of tax on materials incorporated into
the facility or facilities; or (b) the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy has modified its findings regarding the
facility covered by the refund.
(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy may modify its findings when it determines any of the following: (a) The
refund was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation regarding the facility or
planned operation of the facility; (b) the applicant has failed substantially
to operate the facility for the purpose and degree of control specified in the
application or an amended application; or (c) the facility covered by the
refund is no longer used for the primary purpose of pollution control.
(3) On the mailing to the refund applicant of notice of the action of the
Tax Commissioner modifying or revoking the refund, the refund shall cease to be
in force or shall remain in force only as modified. When a refund is revoked
because a refund was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation, all taxes which
would have been payable if no certificate had been issued shall be immediately
due and payable with the maximum interest and penalties prescribed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. No statute of limitations shall operate in the
event of fraud or misrepresentation.
Sec. 392. Section 77-27,153, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,153 (1) A party aggrieved by the issuance, refusal to issue,
revocation, or modification of a pollution control tax refund may appeal from
the finding and order of the Tax Commissioner. The finding and order shall not
affect the authority of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy to determine whether or not industrial or agricultural
waste pollution control exists within the meaning of the Air and Water
Pollution Control Tax Refund Act. The appeal shall be in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy shall make its findings for the Air and Water Pollution Control Tax
Refund Act in accordance with its normal administrative procedures. Nothing in
the act is intended to affect the department's authority to make findings and
to determine whether or not industrial or agricultural waste pollution control
exists within the meaning of the act.
Sec. 393. Section 77-27,154, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,154 The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations that are necessary for the administration of the Air and Water
Pollution Control Tax Refund Act. Such rules and regulations shall not abridge
the authority of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy to determine whether or not industrial or agricultural waste
pollution control exists within the meaning of the act.
Sec. 394. Section 77-27,187.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-27,187.01 For purposes of the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Any term has the same meaning as used in the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967;
(2) Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by
dividing the total hours paid in a year to employees by the product of forty
times the number of weeks in a year;
(3) Livestock means all animals, including cattle, horses, sheep, goats,
hogs, dairy animals, chickens, turkeys, and other species of game birds and
animals raised and produced subject to permit and regulation by the Game and
Parks Commission or the Department of Agriculture;
(4) Livestock modernization or expansion means the construction,
improvement, or acquisition of buildings, facilities, or equipment for
livestock housing, confinement, feeding, production, and waste management.
Livestock modernization or expansion does not include any improvements made to
correct a violation of the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid
-147-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Waste Management Act, the Livestock Waste Management Act, a rule or regulation
adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts, or any order of the Department
of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy undertaken within five
years after a complaint issued from the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy under section 81-1507;
(5) Livestock production means the active use, management, and operation
of real and personal property (a) for the commercial production of livestock,
(b) for the commercial breeding, training, showing, or racing of horses or for
the use of horses in a recreational or tourism enterprise, and (c) for the
commercial production of dairy and eggs. The activity will be considered
commercial if the gross income derived from an activity for two or more of the
taxable years in the period of seven consecutive taxable years which ends with
the taxable year exceeds the deductions attributable to such activity or, if
the operation has been in existence for less than seven years, if the activity
is engaged in for the purpose of generating a profit;
(6) Qualified employee leasing company means a company which places all
employees of a client-lessee on its payroll and leases such employees to the
client-lessee on an ongoing basis for a fee and, by written agreement between
the employee leasing company and a client-lessee, grants to the client-lessee
input into the hiring and firing of the employees leased to the client-lessee;
(7) Related taxpayers includes any corporations that are part of a unitary
business under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 but are not part of the same
corporate taxpayer, any business entities that are not corporations but which
would be a part of the unitary business if they were corporations, and any
business entities if at least fifty percent of such entities are owned by the
same persons or related taxpayers and family members as defined in the
ownership attribution rules of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(8) Taxpayer means a corporate taxpayer or other person subject to either
an income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or a franchise tax
under Chapter 77, article 38, or a partnership, limited liability company,
subchapter S corporation, cooperative, including a cooperative exempt under
section 521 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, limited
cooperative association, or joint venture that is or would otherwise be a
member of the same unitary group if incorporated, which is, or whose partners,
members, or owners representing an ownership interest of at least ninety
percent of the control of such entity are, subject to or exempt from such
taxes, and any other partnership, limited liability company, subchapter S
corporation, cooperative, including a cooperative exempt under section 521 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, limited cooperative association,
or joint venture when the partners, members, or owners representing an
ownership interest of at least ninety percent of the control of such entity are
subject to or exempt from such taxes; and
(9) Year means the taxable year of the taxpayer.
Sec. 395. Section 77-27,236, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,236 (1) A taxpayer who makes an investment after January 1, 2008,
and prior to January 1, 2015, in a biodiesel facility shall receive a
nonrefundable income tax credit as provided in this section.
(2) The credit provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be equal
to thirty percent of the amount invested by the taxpayer in a biodiesel
facility. The credit shall be taken over at least four taxable years subject to
the following conditions:
(a) No more than ten percent of the credit provided for in subsection (1)
of this section shall be taken in each of the first two taxable years the
biodiesel facility produces B100 and no more than fifty percent of the credit
provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall be taken in the third
taxable year the biodiesel facility produces B100. The credit allowed under
subsection (1) of this section shall not exceed fifty percent of the taxpayer's
liability in any tax year;
(b) Any amount of credit not allowed because of the limitations in this
section may be carried forward for up to fifteen taxable years after the
taxable year in which the investment was made. The aggregate maximum income tax
credit a taxpayer may obtain is two hundred fifty thousand dollars;
(c) The investment shall be at risk in the biodiesel facility. The
investment shall be in the form of a purchase of an ownership interest or the
right to receive payment of dividends from the biodiesel facility and shall
remain in the business for at least three years. The Tax Commissioner may
recapture any credits used if the investment does not remain invested for the
three-year period. An investment placed in escrow does not qualify under this
subdivision;
(d) The entire amount of the investment shall be expended by the biodiesel
facility for plant, equipment, research and development, marketing and sales
activity, or working capital;
(e) A partnership, a subchapter S corporation, a limited liability company
that for tax purposes is treated like a partnership, a cooperative, including a
cooperative exempt under section 521 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, or any other pass-through entity that invests in a biodiesel facility
shall be considered to be the taxpayer for purposes of the credit limitations.
Except for the limitation under subdivision (2)(a) of this section, the amount
of the credit allowed to a pass-through entity shall be determined at the
partnership, corporate, cooperative, or other organizational level. The amount
of the credit determined at the partnership, corporate, cooperative, or other
organizational level shall be allowed to the partners, members, or other owners
-148-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
in proportion to their respective ownership interests in the pass-through
entity;
(f) The credit shall be taken only if (i) the biodiesel facility produces
B100, (ii) the biodiesel facility in which the investment was made produces at
a rate of at least seventy percent of its rated capacity continuously for at
least one week during the first taxable year the credit is taken and produces
at a rate of at least seventy percent of its rated capacity over a six-month
period during each of the next two taxable years the credit is taken, (iii) all
processing takes place at the biodiesel facility in which the investment was
made and which is located in Nebraska, and (iv) at least fifty-one percent of
the ownership interest of the biodiesel facility is held by Nebraska resident
individuals or Nebraska entities; and
(g) The biodiesel facility shall provide the Department of Revenue written
evidence substantiating that the biodiesel facility has received the requisite
authority from the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy and from the United States Department of Justice, Bureau of Alcohol,
Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. The biodiesel facility shall annually provide
an analysis to the Department of Revenue of samples of the product collected
according to procedures specified by the department. The analysis shall be
prepared by an independent laboratory meeting standards of the International
Organization for Standardization. Prior to collecting the samples, the
biodiesel facility shall notify the department which may observe the sampling
procedures utilized by the biodiesel facility to obtain the samples to be
submitted for independent analysis.
(3) Any biodiesel facility for which credits are granted shall, whenever
possible, employ workers who are residents of the State of Nebraska.
(4) Trade secrets, academic and scientific research work, and other
proprietary or commercial information which may be filed with the Tax
Commissioner shall not be considered to be public records as defined in section
84-712.01 if the release of such trade secrets, work, or information would give
advantage to business competitors and serve no public purpose. Any person
seeking release of the trade secrets, work, or information as a public record
shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the release would
not violate this section.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) Biodiesel facility means a plant or facility related to the
processing, marketing, or distribution of biodiesel; and
(b) B100 means pure biodiesel containing mono-alkyl esters of long chain
fatty acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats, designated as B100, and
meeting the American Society for Testing and Materials standard, ASTM D6751.
Sec. 396. Section 77-3442, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-3442 (1) Property tax levies for the support of local governments for
fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 1998, shall be limited to the
amounts set forth in this section except as provided in section 77-3444.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (2)(b) and (2)(e) of this
section, school districts and multiple-district school systems may levy a
maximum levy of one dollar and five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable
valuation of property subject to the levy.
(b) For each fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, learning
communities may levy a maximum levy for the general fund budgets of member
school districts of ninety-five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable
valuation of property subject to the levy. The proceeds from the levy pursuant
to this subdivision shall be distributed pursuant to section 79-1073.
(c) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(e) of this section, for each
fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, school districts that are members of
learning communities may levy for purposes of such districts' general fund
budget and special building funds a maximum combined levy of the difference of
one dollar and five cents on each one hundred dollars of taxable property
subject to the levy minus the learning community levy pursuant to subdivision
(2)(b) of this section for such learning community.
(d) Excluded from the limitations in subdivisions (2)(a) and (2)(c) of
this section are (i) amounts levied to pay for current and future sums agreed
to be paid by a school district to certificated employees in exchange for a
voluntary termination of employment occurring prior to September 1, 2017, (ii)
amounts levied by a school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to
subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay for current and future qualified
voluntary termination incentives for certificated teachers pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 79-8,142 that are not otherwise included in an
exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (iii) amounts levied
by a school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)
(a) of this section to pay for seventy-five percent of the current and future
sums agreed to be paid to certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary
termination of employment occurring between September 1, 2017, and August 31,
2018, as a result of a collective-bargaining agreement in force and effect on
September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to
subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (iv) amounts levied by a school district
otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to
pay for fifty percent of the current and future sums agreed to be paid to
certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of employment
occurring between September 1, 2018, and August 31, 2019, as a result of a
collective-bargaining agreement in force and effect on September 1, 2017, that
are not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of
-149-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
this section, (v) amounts levied by a school district otherwise at the maximum
levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay for twenty-five
percent of the current and future sums agreed to be paid to certificated
employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring
between September 1, 2019, and August 31, 2020, as a result of a collective-
bargaining agreement in force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are not
otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this
section, (vi) amounts levied in compliance with sections 79-10,110 and
79-10,110.02, and (vii) amounts levied to pay for special building funds and
sinking funds established for projects commenced prior to April 1, 1996, for
construction, expansion, or alteration of school district buildings. For
purposes of this subsection, commenced means any action taken by the school
board on the record which commits the board to expend district funds in
planning, constructing, or carrying out the project.
(e) Federal aid school districts may exceed the maximum levy prescribed by
subdivision (2)(a) or (2)(c) of this section only to the extent necessary to
qualify to receive federal aid pursuant to Title VIII of Public Law 103-382, as
such title existed on September 1, 2001. For purposes of this subdivision,
federal aid school district means any school district which receives ten
percent or more of the revenue for its general fund budget from federal
government sources pursuant to Title VIII of Public Law 103-382, as such title
existed on September 1, 2001.
(f) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum levy of
one-half cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable property subject to the
levy for elementary learning center facility leases, for remodeling of leased
elementary learning center facilities, and for up to fifty percent of the
estimated cost for focus school or program capital projects approved by the
learning community coordinating council pursuant to section 79-2111.
(g) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum levy of
one and one-half cents on each one hundred dollars of taxable property subject
to the levy for early childhood education programs for children in poverty, for
elementary learning center employees, for contracts with other entities or
individuals who are not employees of the learning community for elementary
learning center programs and services, and for pilot projects, except that no
more than ten percent of such levy may be used for elementary learning center
employees.
(3) For each fiscal year through fiscal year 2023-24, community college
areas may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)(a) through (c) of
section 85-1517, in accordance with the provisions of such subdivisions. For
fiscal year 2024-25 and each fiscal year thereafter, community college areas
may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of section 85-1517,
in accordance with the provisions of such subdivisions. A community college
area may exceed the levy provided in subdivision (2)(a) of section 85-1517 by
the amount necessary to generate sufficient revenue as described in section
85-1543 or 85-2238. A community college area may exceed the levy provided in
subdivision (2)(b) of section 85-1517 by the amount necessary to retire general
obligation bonds assumed by the community college area or issued pursuant to
section 85-1515 according to the terms of such bonds or for any obligation
pursuant to section 85-1535 entered into prior to January 1, 1997.
(4)(a) Natural resources districts may levy a maximum levy of four and
one-half cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject
to the levy.
(b) Natural resources districts shall also have the power and authority to
levy a tax equal to the dollar amount by which their restricted funds budgeted
to administer and implement ground water management activities and integrated
management activities under the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection
Act exceed their restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground
water management activities and integrated management activities for FY2003-04,
not to exceed one cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation
annually on all of the taxable property within the district.
(c) In addition, natural resources districts located in a river basin,
subbasin, or reach that has been determined to be fully appropriated pursuant
to section 46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713
by the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources shall also have the power and authority to levy a tax equal
to the dollar amount by which their restricted funds budgeted to administer and
implement ground water management activities and integrated management
activities under the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act exceed
their restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities for FY2005-06, not
to exceed three cents on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation on all
of the taxable property within the district for fiscal year 2006-07 and each
fiscal year thereafter through fiscal year 2017-18.
(5) Any educational service unit authorized to levy a property tax
pursuant to section 79-1225 may levy a maximum levy of one and one-half cents
per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy.
(6)(a) Incorporated cities and villages which are not within the
boundaries of a municipal county may levy a maximum levy of forty-five cents
per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy
plus an additional five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation to
provide financing for the municipality's share of revenue required under an
agreement or agreements executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or
the Joint Public Agency Act. The maximum levy shall include amounts levied to
-150-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
pay for sums to support a library pursuant to section 51-201, museum pursuant
to section 51-501, visiting community nurse, home health nurse, or home health
agency pursuant to section 71-1637, or statue, memorial, or monument pursuant
to section 80-202.
(b) Incorporated cities and villages which are within the boundaries of a
municipal county may levy a maximum levy of ninety cents per one hundred
dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The maximum levy
shall include amounts paid to a municipal county for county services, amounts
levied to pay for sums to support a library pursuant to section 51-201, a
museum pursuant to section 51-501, a visiting community nurse, home health
nurse, or home health agency pursuant to section 71-1637, or a statue,
memorial, or monument pursuant to section 80-202.
(7) Sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence for
more than five years may levy a maximum levy of forty cents per one hundred
dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy, and sanitary and
improvement districts which have been in existence for five years or less shall
not have a maximum levy. Unconsolidated sanitary and improvement districts
which have been in existence for more than five years and are located in a
municipal county may levy a maximum of eighty-five cents per hundred dollars of
taxable valuation of property subject to the levy.
(8) Counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of fifty cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy, except
that five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property
subject to the levy may only be levied to provide financing for the county's
share of revenue required under an agreement or agreements executed pursuant to
the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act. The maximum levy
shall include amounts levied to pay for sums to support a library pursuant to
section 51-201 or museum pursuant to section 51-501. The county may allocate up
to fifteen cents of its authority to other political subdivisions subject to
allocation of property tax authority under subsection (1) of section 77-3443
and not specifically covered in this section to levy taxes as authorized by law
which do not collectively exceed fifteen cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation on any parcel or item of taxable property. The county may
allocate to one or more other political subdivisions subject to allocation of
property tax authority by the county under subsection (1) of section 77-3443
some or all of the county's five cents per one hundred dollars of valuation
authorized for support of an agreement or agreements to be levied by the
political subdivision for the purpose of supporting that political
subdivision's share of revenue required under an agreement or agreements
executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency
Act. If an allocation by a county would cause another county to exceed its levy
authority under this section, the second county may exceed the levy authority
in order to levy the amount allocated.
(9) Municipal counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of one dollar
per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy.
The municipal county may allocate levy authority to any political subdivision
or entity subject to allocation under section 77-3443.
(10) Beginning July 1, 2016, rural and suburban fire protection districts
may levy a maximum levy of ten and one-half cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation of property subject to the levy if (a) such district is
located in a county that had a levy pursuant to subsection (8) of this section
in the previous year of at least forty cents per one hundred dollars of taxable
valuation of property subject to the levy or (b) such district had a levy
request pursuant to section 77-3443 in any of the three previous years and the
county board of the county in which the greatest portion of the valuation of
such district is located did not authorize any levy authority to such district
in such year.
(11) A regional metropolitan transit authority may levy a maximum levy of
ten cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy for each fiscal year that commences on the January 1 that follows the
effective date of the conversion of the transit authority established under the
Transit Authority Law into the regional metropolitan transit authority.
(12) Property tax levies (a) for judgments, except judgments or orders
from the Commission of Industrial Relations, obtained against a political
subdivision which require or obligate a political subdivision to pay such
judgment, to the extent such judgment is not paid by liability insurance
coverage of a political subdivision, (b) for preexisting lease-purchase
contracts approved prior to July 1, 1998, (c) for bonds as defined in section
10-134 approved according to law and secured by a levy on property except as
provided in section 44-4317 for bonded indebtedness issued by educational
service units and school districts, (d) for payments by a public airport to
retire interest-free loans from the Division of Aeronautics of the Department
of Transportation in lieu of bonded indebtedness at a lower cost to the public
airport, and (e) to pay for cancer benefits provided on or after January 1,
2022, pursuant to the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act are not included in the
levy limits established by this section.
(13) The limitations on tax levies provided in this section are to include
all other general or special levies provided by law. Notwithstanding other
provisions of law, the only exceptions to the limits in this section are those
provided by or authorized by sections 77-3442 to 77-3444.
(14) Tax levies in excess of the limitations in this section shall be
considered unauthorized levies under section 77-1606 unless approved under
section 77-3444.
-151-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(15) For purposes of sections 77-3442 to 77-3444, political subdivision
means a political subdivision of this state and a county agricultural society.
(16) For school districts that file a binding resolution on or before May
9, 2008, with the county assessors, county clerks, and county treasurers for
all counties in which the school district has territory pursuant to subsection
(7) of section 79-458, if the combined levies, except levies for bonded
indebtedness approved by the voters of the school district and levies for the
refinancing of such bonded indebtedness, are in excess of the greater of (a)
one dollar and twenty cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy or (b) the maximum levy authorized by a vote
pursuant to section 77-3444, all school district levies, except levies for
bonded indebtedness approved by the voters of the school district and levies
for the refinancing of such bonded indebtedness, shall be considered
unauthorized levies under section 77-1606.
Sec. 397. Section 81-101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-101 The civil administration of the laws of the state is vested in the
Governor. For the purpose of aiding the Governor in the execution and
administration of the laws, the executive and administrative work shall be
divided into the following agencies: (1) Department of Agriculture; (2)
Department of Labor; (3) Department of Transportation; (4) Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources; (5) Department of Banking and
Finance; (6) Department of Insurance; (7) Department of Motor Vehicles; (8)
Department of Administrative Services; (9) Department of Economic Development;
(10) Department of Correctional Services; (11) Nebraska State Patrol; and (12)
Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 398. Section 81-102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-102 The Governor shall appoint heads for the various agencies listed in
section 81-101, subject to confirmation by a majority vote of the members
elected to the Legislature. Such appointments shall be submitted to the
Legislature within sixty calendar days following the first Thursday after the
first Tuesday in each odd-numbered year. The officers shall be designated as
follows: (1) The Director of Agriculture for the Department of Agriculture; (2)
the Commissioner of Labor for the Department of Labor; (3) the Director-State
Engineer for the Department of Transportation; (4) the Director of Water,
Energy, and Environment for the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Natural Resources for the Department of Natural Resources; (5) the Director of
Banking and Finance for the Department of Banking and Finance; (6) the Director
of Insurance for the Department of Insurance; (7) the Director of Motor
Vehicles for the Department of Motor Vehicles; (8) the Director of
Administrative Services for the Department of Administrative Services; (9) the
Director of Correctional Services for the Department of Correctional Services;
(10) the Director of Economic Development for the Department of Economic
Development; (11) the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety for
the Nebraska State Patrol; (12) the Property Tax Administrator as the chief
administrative officer of the property assessment division of the Department of
Revenue; and (13) the chief executive officer for the Department of Health and
Human Services. Whoever shall be so nominated by the Governor and shall fail to
receive the number of votes requisite for confirmation, shall not be subject to
nomination or appointment for this or any other appointive state office
requiring confirmation by the Legislature during the period for which his or
her appointment was sought. In case of a vacancy in any of such offices during
the recess of the Legislature, the Governor shall make a temporary appointment
until the next meeting of the Legislature, when he or she shall nominate some
person to fill such office. Any person so nominated who is confirmed by the
Legislature, shall hold his or her office during the remainder of the term if a
specific term has been provided by law, otherwise during the pleasure of the
Governor subject to the provisions of this section; except any such officers
may be removed by the Governor pursuant to Article IV of the Constitution of
Nebraska.
Sec. 399. Section 81-2,294, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2,294 (1) The Director of Agriculture shall appoint a committee of
experts, not to exceed ten persons, to advise the Department of Agriculture on
the development of the assessment matrix described in subsection (2) of this
section. Experts shall include representation from county board members, county
zoning administrators, livestock production agriculture, the University of
Nebraska, and other experts as may be determined by the director. The committee
shall review the matrix annually and recommend to the department changes as
needed.
(2) The Department of Agriculture shall, in consultation with the
committee created under subsection (1) of this section, develop an assessment
matrix which may be used by county officials to determine whether to approve or
disapprove a conditional use permit or special exception application. The
matrix shall be developed within one year after August 30, 2015. In the
development of the assessment matrix, the department shall:
(a) Consider matrices already developed by the counties and other states;
(b) Design the matrix to produce quantifiable results based on the scoring
of objective criteria according to an established value scale. Each criterion
shall be assigned points corresponding to the value scale. The matrix shall
consider risks and factors mitigating risks if the livestock operation were
constructed according to the application;
-152-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(c) Assure the matrix is a practical tool for use by persons when
completing permit applications and by county officials when scoring conditional
use permit or special exception applications. To every extent feasible, the
matrix shall include criteria that may be readily scored according to
ascertainable data and upon which reasonable persons familiar with the location
of a proposed construction site would not ordinarily disagree; and
(d) Provide for definite point selections for all criteria included in the
matrix and provide for a minimum threshold total score required to receive
approval by county officials.
(3) The Department of Agriculture may develop criteria in the matrix which
include factors referencing the following:
(a) Size of operation;
(b) Type of operation;
(c) Whether the operation has received or is in the process of applying
for a permit from the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy, if required by law;
(d) Environmental practices adopted by the operation operator which may
exceed those required by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(e) Odor control practices;
(f) Consideration of proximity of a livestock operation to neighboring
residences, public use areas, and critical public areas;
(g) Community support and communication with neighbors and other community
members;
(h) Manure storage and land application sites and practices;
(i) Traffic;
(j) Economic impact to the community; and
(k) Landscape and aesthetic appearance.
(4) In developing the matrix, the Department of Agriculture shall consider
whether the proposed criteria are:
(a) Protective of public health or safety;
(b) Practical and workable;
(c) Cost effective;
(d) Objective;
(e) Based on available scientific information that has been subjected to
peer review;
(f) Designed to promote the growth and viability of animal agriculture in
this state;
(g) Designed to balance the economic viability of farm operations with
protecting natural resources and other community interests; and
(h) Usable by county officials.
Sec. 400. Section 81-502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-502 (1) It shall be the duty of the State Fire Marshal, under authority
of the Governor:
(a) To enforce all laws of the state relating to the suppression of arson
and investigation of the cause, origin, and circumstances of fires;
(b) To promote safety and reduce loss by fire; and
(c) To make an investigation for fire safety of the premises and
facilities of:
(i) Liquor establishments for which a license or renewal of a license is
sought, upon request of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, pursuant to
section 53-119.01;
(ii) Licensed foster care facilities or applicants for licenses for foster
care facilities, upon request by the Department of Health and Human Services,
pursuant to section 71-1903;
(iii) Upon request of the Department of Health and Human Services,
licensed providers of programs or applicants for licenses to provide such
programs pursuant to section 71-1913 and licensed residential child-caring
agencies or applicants for such licensure pursuant to section 71-1934. The
State Fire Marshal shall report the results of the investigation to the
department within thirty days after receipt of the request from the department;
(iv) Licensed hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, intermediate care
facilities, or other health care facilities which are licensed under the Health
Care Facility Licensure Act or applicants for licenses for such facilities or
institutions, upon request by the Department of Health and Human Services,
pursuant to section 71-441; and
(v) Mobile home parks for which a license or renewal of a license is
sought, upon request of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy, pursuant to section 81-15,291.
(2) The State Fire Marshal may enter into contracts with private
individuals or other agencies, boards, commissions, or governmental bodies for
the purpose of carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to
the Arson Reporting Immunity Act, the Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act
of 1969, and sections 81-502 to 81-538, 81-5,132 to 81-5,146, and 81-5,151 to
81-5,157.
(3) The State Fire Marshal may delegate the authority set forth in this
section and section 81-503.01 to qualified local fire prevention personnel. The
State Fire Marshal may overrule a decision, act, or policy of the local fire
prevention personnel. Such delegation of authority may be revoked by the State
Fire Marshal for cause upon thirty days' notice after a hearing.
(4) The State Fire Marshal, first assistant fire marshal, and deputies
shall have such other powers and perform such other duties as are set forth in
-153-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
sections 81-501.01 to 81-531 and 81-5,151 to 81-5,157 and as may be conferred
and imposed by law.
Sec. 401. Section 81-829.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-829.05 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Chemical facility has the same meaning as in 6 C.F.R. 27.105;
(b) Federal agency means the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security
Agency of the United States Department of Homeland Security;
(c) Federal standards means the federal Chemical Facility Anti-Terrorism
Standards under 6 C.F.R. part 27, as such standards existed on July 1, 2023;
and
(d) Program means the voluntary and publicly available chemical security
program provided by the federal agency as an alternative to the federal
standards.
(2) The Legislature finds that:
(a) The federal standards were created after the September 11, 2001,
terrorist attacks to identify and regulate high-risk chemical facilities to
ensure security measures are in place to reduce the risk of certain dangerous
chemicals being weaponized by terrorists;
(b) The United States Congress allowed the statutory authority for
continuing regulation of the federal standards to expire on July 27, 2023;
(c) With the expiration of such statutory authority and without
reauthorization by Congress, the federal agency can no longer enforce
compliance with the federal standards;
(d) The lack of enforcement means that chemical facilities will no longer
be required to report their chemicals of interest, submit to inspections,
provide compliance assistance, or implement any security plan or program; and
(e) The federal agency has encouraged chemical facilities to maintain
security measures and offers a voluntary and publicly available alternative
chemical security program that provides facilities that possess dangerous
chemicals no-cost services and tools to identify risks and improve chemical
security.
(3) Beginning on July 19, 2024, a chemical facility shall utilize the
federal agency's program if such chemical facility was required on or before
July 27, 2023, to have a chemical facility security program pursuant to 6
C.F.R. 27.200 et seq., as such regulations existed on such date.
(4) The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency and the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy shall publish the requirements
of this section and post a link to the program on their agency websites.
(5) This section is preempted when the federal standards are in effect if
Congress reauthorizes such federal standards.
Sec. 402. Section 81-1108.55, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1108.55 All purchases, leases, or contracts which by law are required
to be based on competitive bids pursuant to section 81-1108.16 shall be made to
the lowest responsible bidder, taking into consideration the best interests of
the state, the quality or performance of the property proposed to be supplied,
its conformity with specifications, the purposes for which required, and the
times of delivery. In determining the lowest responsible bidder, in addition to
price, the following elements shall be given consideration:
(1) The ability, capacity, and skill of the bidder to perform the contract
required;
(2) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and
efficiency of the bidder;
(3) Whether the bidder can perform the contract within the time specified;
(4) The quality of performance of previous contracts;
(5) The previous and existing compliance by the bidder with laws relating
to the contract;
(6) The life-cost of the property in relation to the purchase price and
specific use of the item;
(7) The performance of the property, taking into consideration any
commonly accepted tests and standards of product usability and user
requirements;
(8) Energy efficiency ratio as stated by the bidder for alternative
choices of appliances or equipment;
(9) The information furnished by each bidder, when deemed applicable by
the State Building Administrator, concerning life-cycle costs between
alternatives for all classes of equipment, evidence of expected life, repair
and maintenance costs, and energy consumption on a per-year basis; and
(10) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on the
decision to award the contract.
Reports regarding procurements made pursuant to this section shall be
provided to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy. Such reports shall be in the form and contain such information as the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy may
require.
All political subdivisions may follow the procurement principles set forth
in this section if they are deemed applicable by the official authorized to
make purchases for such political subdivision.
Sec. 403. Section 81-1316, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1316 (1) All agencies and personnel of state government shall be
covered by sections 81-1301 to 81-1319 and shall be considered subject to the
-154-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
State Personnel System, except the following:
(a) All personnel of the office of the Governor;
(b) All personnel of the office of the Lieutenant Governor;
(c) All personnel of the office of the Secretary of State;
(d) All personnel of the office of the State Treasurer;
(e) All personnel of the office of the Attorney General;
(f) All personnel of the office of the Auditor of Public Accounts;
(g) All personnel of the Legislature;
(h) All personnel of the court systems;
(i) All personnel of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds;
(j) All personnel of the Public Service Commission;
(k) All personnel of the Nebraska Brand Committee;
(l) All personnel of the Commission of Industrial Relations;
(m) All personnel of the State Department of Education;
(n) All personnel of the Nebraska state colleges and the Board of Trustees
of the Nebraska State Colleges;
(o) All personnel of the University of Nebraska;
(p) All personnel of the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education;
(q) All personnel of the Governor's Policy Research Office;
(r) All personnel of the Commission on Public Advocacy;
(s) All agency heads;
(t)(i) The Director of Behavioral Health of the Division of Behavioral
Health; (ii) the Director of Children and Family Services of the Division of
Children and Family Services; (iii) the Director of Developmental Disabilities
of the Division of Developmental Disabilities; (iv) the Director of Medicaid
and Long-Term Care of the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care; and (v) the
Director of Public Health of the Division of Public Health;
(u) The chief medical officer established under section 81-3115, the
Administrator of the Office of Juvenile Services, and the chief executive
officers of the Beatrice State Developmental Center, Lincoln Regional Center,
Norfolk Regional Center, Hastings Regional Center, Central Nebraska Veterans'
Home, Norfolk Veterans' Home, Eastern Nebraska Veterans' Home, Western Nebraska
Veterans' Home, and each youth rehabilitation and treatment center;
(v) The chief executive officers of all facilities operated by the
Department of Correctional Services and the medical director for the department
appointed pursuant to section 83-4,156;
(w) All personnel employed as pharmacists, physicians, psychiatrists, or
psychologists by the Department of Correctional Services;
(x) All personnel employed as pharmacists, physicians, psychiatrists,
psychologists, service area administrators, or facility operating officers of
the Department of Health and Human Services or the Department of Veterans'
Affairs;
(y) Deputies and examiners of the Department of Banking and Finance and
the Department of Insurance as set forth in sections 8-105 and 44-119, except
for those deputies and examiners who remain in the State Personnel System;
(z) All personnel of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission;
(aa) The associate director of the Conservation Division of the Nebraska
State Historical Society and all personnel employed as a Conservator I or
Conservator II of the Conservation Division of the Nebraska State Historical
Society; and
(bb) Assistant directors and deputies of the Nebraska Public Employees
Retirement Systems; and .
(cc) The Chief Water Officer, assistant directors, and deputies of the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.
(2) At each agency head's discretion, up to the following number of
additional positions may be exempted from the State Personnel System, based on
the following agency size categories:
Number of Agency Number of Noncovered
Employees Positions
less than 25 0
25 to 100 1
101 to 250 2
251 to 500 3
501 to 1000 4
1001 to 2000 5
2001 to 3000 8
3001 to 4000 11
4001 to 5000 40
over 5000 50
-155-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
The purpose of having such noncovered positions shall be to allow agency
heads the opportunity to recruit, hire, and supervise critical, confidential,
or policymaking personnel without restrictions from selection procedures,
compensation rules, career protections, and grievance privileges. Persons
holding the noncovered positions shall serve at the pleasure of the agency head
and shall be paid salaries set by the agency head. An agency with over five
thousand employees shall provide notice in writing to the Health and Human
Services Committee of the Legislature when forty noncovered positions have been
filled by the agency head pursuant to this subsection.
(3) No changes to this section or to the number of noncovered positions
within an agency shall affect the status of personnel employed on the date the
changes become operative without their prior written agreement. A state
employee's career protections or coverage by personnel rules and regulations
shall not be revoked by redesignation of the employee's position as a
noncovered position without the prior written agreement of such employee.
Sec. 404. Section 81-1502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1502 For purposes of the Environmental Protection Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Air contaminant or air contamination shall mean the presence in the
outdoor atmosphere of any dust, fume, mist, smoke, vapor, gas, other gaseous
fluid, or particulate substance differing in composition from or exceeding in
concentration the natural components of the atmosphere;
(2) Air pollution shall mean the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one
or more air contaminants or combinations thereof in such quantities and of such
duration as are or may tend to be injurious to human, plant, or animal life,
property, or the conduct of business;
(3) Chairperson shall mean the chairperson of the Environmental Quality
Council and council shall mean the Environmental Quality Council;
(4) Complaint shall mean any charge, however informal, to or by the
council, that any person or agency, private or public, is polluting the air,
land, or water or is violating the Environmental Protection Act or any rule or
regulation of the department in respect thereof;
(5) Control and controlling shall include prohibition and prohibiting as
related to air, land, or water pollution;
(6) Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy, which department is hereby created;
(7) Director shall mean the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy, which position is hereby established;
(8) Disposal system shall mean a system for disposing of wastes, including
hazardous wastes, either by surface or underground methods, and includes
sewerage systems and treatment works, disposal wells and fields, and other
systems;
(9) Emissions shall mean releases or discharges into the outdoor
atmosphere of any air contaminant or combination thereof;
(10) Person shall mean any: Individual; partnership; limited liability
company; association; public or private corporation; trustee; receiver;
assignee; agent; municipality or other governmental subdivision; public agency;
other legal entity; or any officer or governing or managing body of any public
or private corporation, municipality, governmental subdivision, public agency,
or other legal entity;
(11) Rule or regulation shall mean any rule or regulation of the
department;
(12) Sewerage system shall mean pipelines, conduits, pumping stations,
force mains, and all other constructions, devices, appurtenances, and
facilities used for collecting or conducting wastes to an ultimate point for
treatment or disposal;
(13) Treatment works shall mean any plant or other works used for the
purpose of treating, stabilizing, or holding wastes;
(14) Wastes shall mean sewage, industrial waste, and all other liquid,
gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substances which may pollute or tend to
pollute any air, land, or waters of the state;
(15) Refuse shall mean putrescible and nonputrescible solid wastes, except
body wastes, and includes garbage, rubbish, ashes, incinerator ash, incinerator
residue, street cleanings, and solid market and industrial wastes;
(16) Garbage shall mean rejected food wastes, including waste accumulation
of animal, fruit, or vegetable matter used or intended for food or that attend
the preparation, use, cooking, dealing in, or storing of meat, fish, fowl,
fruit, or vegetables, and dead animals rejected by rendering plants;
(17) Rubbish shall mean nonputrescible solid wastes, excluding ashes,
consisting of both combustible and noncombustible wastes, such as paper,
cardboard, tin cans, yard clippings, wood, glass, bedding, crockery, or litter
of any kind that will be a detriment to the public health and safety;
(18) Junk shall mean old scrap, copper, brass, iron, steel, rope, rags,
batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, dismantled or wrecked
automobiles, or parts thereof, and other old or scrap ferrous or nonferrous
material;
(19) Land pollution shall mean the presence upon or within the land
resources of the state of one or more contaminants or combinations of
contaminants, including, but not limited to, refuse, garbage, rubbish, or junk,
in such quantities and of such quality as will or are likely to (a) create a
nuisance, (b) be harmful, detrimental, or injurious to public health, safety,
or welfare, (c) be injurious to plant and animal life and property, or (d) be
-156-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
detrimental to the economic and social development, the scenic beauty, or the
enjoyment of the natural attractions of the state;
(20) Water pollution shall mean the manmade or man-induced alteration of
the chemical, physical, biological, or radiological integrity of water;
(21) Waters of the state shall mean all waters within the jurisdiction of
this state, including all streams, lakes, ponds, impounding reservoirs,
marshes, wetlands, watercourses, waterways, wells, springs, irrigation systems,
drainage systems, and all other bodies or accumulations of water, surface or
underground, natural or artificial, public or private, situated wholly or
partly within or bordering upon the state;
(22) Point source shall mean any discernible confined and discrete
conveyance, including, but not limited to, any pipe, ditch, channel, tunnel,
conduit, well, discrete fissure, container, rolling stock, or vessel or other
floating craft from which pollutants are or may be discharged;
(23) Effluent limitation shall mean any restriction, including a schedule
of compliance, established by the council on quantities, rates, and
concentrations of chemical, physical, biological, and other constituents which
are discharged from point sources into waters of the state;
(24) Schedule of compliance shall mean a schedule of remedial measures
including an enforceable sequence of actions or operations leading to
compliance with an effluent limitation, other limitation, prohibition, or
standard;
(25) Hazardous waste shall mean a solid waste, or combination of solid
wastes, which because of its quantity, concentration, or physical, chemical, or
infectious characteristics may (a) cause or significantly contribute to an
increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible, or incapacitating
reversible, illness or (b) pose a substantial present or potential hazard to
human or animal health or the environment when improperly treated, stored,
transported, disposed of, or otherwise managed;
(26) Solid waste shall mean any garbage, refuse, or sludge from a waste
treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control
facility and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or
contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, and mining
operations and from community activities. Solid waste shall not include slag, a
product that is a result of the steel manufacturing process and is managed as
an item of value in a controlled manner and not as a discarded material; solid
or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges
which are point sources subject to permits under section 402 of the Clean Water
Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.; or source, special nuclear, or
byproduct material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, 42
U.S.C. 2011 et seq.;
(27) Storage, when used in connection with hazardous waste, shall mean the
containment of hazardous waste, either on a temporary basis or for a period of
years, in such manner as not to constitute disposal of such hazardous waste;
(28) Manifest shall mean the form used for identifying the quantity,
composition, origin, routing, and destination of hazardous waste during its
transportation from the point of generation to the point of disposal,
treatment, or storage;
(29) Processing shall mean to treat, detoxify, neutralize, incinerate,
biodegrade, or otherwise process a hazardous waste to remove such waste's
harmful properties or characteristics for disposal in accordance with
regulations established by the council;
(30) Well shall mean a bored, drilled, or driven shaft or a dug hole, the
depth of which is greater than the largest surface dimension of such shaft or
hole;
(31) Injection well shall mean a well into which fluids are injected;
(32) Fluid shall mean a material or substance which flows or moves whether
in a semisolid, liquid, sludge, gas, or other form or state;
(33) Mineral production well shall mean a well drilled to promote
extraction of mineral resources or energy, including, but not limited to, a
well designed for (a) mining of sulfur by the Frasch process, (b) solution
mining of sodium chloride, potash, phosphate, copper, uranium, or any other
mineral which can be mined by this process, (c) in situ combustion of coal, tar
sands, oil shale, or any other fossil fuel, or (d) recovery of geothermal
energy for the production of electric power. Mineral production well shall not
include any well designed for conventional oil or gas production, for use of
fluids to promote enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas, or for injection of
hydrocarbons for storage purposes;
(34) Mineral exploration hole shall mean a hole bored, drilled, driven, or
dug in the act of exploring for a mineral other than oil and gas;
(35) Solution mining shall mean the use of an injection well and fluids to
promote the extraction of mineral resources;
(36) Uranium shall mean tri-uranium oct-oxide;
(37) Solid waste management facility shall mean a facility as defined in
section 13-2010; and
(38) Livestock waste control facility shall have the same meaning as in
section 54-2417.
Sec. 405. Section 81-1503, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1503 (1) The Environmental Quality Council is hereby created. The
council shall consist of seventeen members to be appointed by the Governor with
the advice and consent of the Legislature as follows:
(a) One representative of the food products manufacturing industry;
-157-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(b) One representative of conservation;
(c) One representative of the agricultural processing industry;
(d) One representative of the automotive or petroleum industry;
(e) One representative of the chemical industry;
(f) One representative of heavy industry;
(g) One representative of the power generating industry;
(h) One representative of agriculture actively engaged in crop production;
(i) One representative of labor;
(j) One professional engineer experienced in control of air and water
pollution and solid wastes;
(k) One physician knowledgeable in the health aspects of air, water, and
land pollution;
(l) One representative from county government;
(m) Two representatives from municipal government, one of whom shall
represent cities other than those of the primary or metropolitan class;
(n) One representative of the livestock industry;
(o) One representative of minority populations; and
(p) One biologist.
(2) Members shall serve for terms of four years. All appointments shall be
subject to confirmation by the Legislature when initially made. As the term of
an appointee to the council expires, the succeeding appointee shall be a
representative of the same segment of the public as the previous appointee. In
the case of appointees to vacancies occurring from unexpired terms, each
successor shall serve out the term of his or her predecessor. Members whose
terms have expired shall continue to serve until their successors have been
appointed. All members shall be citizens and residents of the State of
Nebraska.
(3) Members may be removed by the Governor for inefficiency, neglect of
duty, or misconduct in office but only after delivering to the member a copy of
the charges and affording him or her an opportunity to be publicly heard in
person or by counsel, in his or her own defense, upon not less than ten days'
notice. Such hearing shall be held before the Governor. When a member is
removed, the Governor shall file, in the office of the Secretary of State, a
complete statement of all charges made against such member and the findings
thereon, together with a complete record of the proceedings.
(4) The council shall elect from its members a chairperson and a vice-
chairperson, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the council. The vice-
chairperson shall serve as chairperson in case of the absence or disability of
the chairperson. The director shall serve as secretary of the council and shall
keep all records of meetings of and actions taken by the council. He or she
shall be promptly advised as to such actions by the chairperson.
(5) The members of the council, while engaged in the performance of their
official duties, shall receive a per diem of forty dollars while so serving,
including travel time. In addition, members of the council shall receive
reimbursement for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(6) The council shall hold at least two regular meetings each year, at a
time and place fixed by the council and shall keep a record of its proceedings
which shall be open to the public for inspection. Special meetings may be
called by the chairperson. Such special meetings must be called by him or her
upon receipt of a written request signed by two or more members of the council.
Written notice of the time and place of all meetings shall be mailed in advance
to the office of each member of the council by the secretary. A majority of the
members of the council shall constitute a quorum.
(7) The council shall submit to the Governor a list of names from which he
or she shall appoint the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy who shall be experienced in air, water, and land pollution control
and who may be otherwise an employee of state government. The director shall be
responsible for administration of the department and all standards, rules, and
regulations adopted pursuant to Chapter 81, article 15, the Integrated Solid
Waste Management Act, and the Livestock Waste Management Act. All such
standards, rules, and regulations shall be adopted by the council after
consideration of the recommendations of the director. All grants to political
subdivisions under the control of the department shall be made by the director
in accordance with priorities established by the council, unless otherwise
directed by statute. A majority of the members of the council shall constitute
a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of
all members of the council shall be necessary for the adoption of standards,
rules, and regulations.
(8) Before the director enters upon the duties of his or her office, he or
she shall take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and shall, in
addition thereto, swear and affirm that he or she holds no other public office
nor any position under any political committee or party, that he or she has not
during the two years immediately prior to his or her appointment received a
significant portion of his or her income directly or indirectly from
permitholders or applicants for a permit under the Environmental Protection
Act, and that he or she will not receive such income during his or her term as
director, except that such requirements regarding income prior to the term of
office shall not apply to employees of any agency of the State of Nebraska or
any political subdivision which may be a permitholder under the Environmental
Protection Act. Such oath and affirmation shall be filed with the Secretary of
State.
Sec. 406. Section 81-1537, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-158-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
81-1537 Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy.
Sec. 407. Section 81-1540, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1540 Director shall mean the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy.
Sec. 408. Section 81-1561, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1561 (1) The Tax Commissioner shall deduct and withhold from the litter
fee collected a fee sufficient to reimburse himself or herself for the cost of
collecting and administering the litter fee and shall deposit such collection
fee in the Litter Fee Collection Fund which is hereby created. The Litter Fee
Collection Fund shall be appropriated to the Department of Revenue. Any money
in the Litter Fee Collection Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The Tax Commissioner shall remit the balance of the litter fee
collections to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy. The department shall allocate and distribute funds from the Nebraska
Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund in percentage amounts to be determined by
the council on an annual basis, after a public hearing on a date to be
determined by the council, for the following activities:
(a) Programs of public education, motivation, and participation aimed at
creating an ethic conducive to the reduction of litter, establishing an
attitude against littering and a desire for a clean environment, and securing
greater awareness of and compliance with antilitter laws. Such programs shall
include:
(i) The distribution of informative materials to elementary and secondary
schools;
(ii) The purchase and erection of roadside signs;
(iii) The organization and operation of cleanup drives conducted by local
agencies and organizations using volunteer help;
(iv) Grants to state and local government units and agencies and private
organizations for developing and conducting antilitter programs; and
(v) Any other public information method selected by the department,
including the use of media;
(b) Cleanup of public highways, waterways, recreation lands, urban areas,
and public places within the state, including, but not limited to:
(i) Grants to cities and counties for payment of personnel employed in the
pickup of litter;
(ii) Grants for programs aimed at increasing the use of youth and
unemployed persons in seasonal and part-time litter pickup programs and to
establish work release and other programs to carry out the purposes of the
Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act;
(iii) Grants to public and private agencies and persons to conduct surveys
of amounts and composition of litter and rates of littering; and
(iv) Grants to public and private agencies and persons for research and
development in the fields of litter reduction, removal, and disposal, including
the evaluation of behavioral science techniques in litter control and the
development of new equipment, and to implement such research and development
when appropriate; and
(c) New or improved community recycling and source separation programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Expansion of existing and creation of new community recycling centers;
(ii) Expansion of existing and creation of new source separation programs;
(iii) Research and evaluation of markets for the materials and products
recovered in source separation and recycling programs; and
(iv) Providing advice and assistance on matters relating to recycling and
source separation, including information and consultation on available
technology, operating procedures, organizational arrangements, markets for
materials and products recovered in recycling and source separation,
transportation alternatives, and publicity techniques.
Sec. 409. Section 81-15,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,118 The Legislature finds that the number of leaking underground
storage tanks throughout the state is increasing and that there exists a
serious threat to the health and safety of citizens because substances
contained in leaking storage tanks are often potential ground water
contaminants and major fire and explosive hazards.
For the reasons stated in this section, the Legislature deems it necessary
to provide a program of storage tank registration and inspection as a
preventative measure and a comprehensive leak cleanup program as a responsive
measure. Primary responsibility for the Petroleum Products and Hazardous
Substances Storage and Handling Act shall be with the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy. However, preventative measures
described in such act shall also be carried out by the State Fire Marshal. The
State Fire Marshal's actions shall be pursuant to an interagency agreement with
the department.
Sec. 410. Section 81-15,120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,120 Any farm or residential tank or tank used for storing heating
oil as defined in subdivisions (10)(a) and (b) of section 81-15,119 shall be
registered with the State Fire Marshal. The registration shall be accompanied
-159-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
by a one-time fee of five dollars and shall be valid until the State Fire
Marshal is notified that a tank so registered has been permanently closed. Such
registration shall specify the ownership of, location of, and substance stored
in the tank to be registered. The State Fire Marshal shall remit the fee to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances
Storage and Handling Fund which is hereby created as a cash fund. The fund
shall also consist of any money appropriated to the fund by the state. The fund
shall be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy to carry out the purposes of the Petroleum Products and
Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act, including the provision of
matching funds required by Public Law 99-499 for actions otherwise authorized
by the act. Any money in such fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 411. Section 81-15,124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,124 Any reported or suspected release of a regulated substance from
any tank shall be investigated consistent with principles of risk-based
corrective action by the State Fire Marshal and the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy. In the event that the State
Fire Marshal or the department finds an adverse effect caused by a release of a
regulated substance from a tank:
(1) The State Fire Marshal shall (a) determine the immediate danger
presented by the release, (b) take all steps necessary to assure immediate
public safety, and (c) assist the department in determining the source of the
release and taking all steps necessary to ensure that the release is halted;
(2) By order of the department, the owner or operator of the tank causing
the release shall, after securing the source of the release, develop a plan for
remedial action to be approved by the department. The department shall inform
the owner or operator of its approval or disapproval of a plan for remedial
action within one hundred twenty days after receipt of a remedial action plan
which contains all required information. If after one hundred twenty days the
department fails to either deny, approve, or amend the remedial action plan
submitted, the proposed plan shall be deemed approved; and
(3) The approved remedial action plan shall then be carried out by the
owner or operator of the tank causing the release. All expenses incurred during
the remedial action shall be paid by the owner or operator subject to
reimbursement pursuant to the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act.
If it is determined that the source of the release is unknown or that the
owner or operator of the facility causing the release is unknown or
unavailable, a remedial action plan shall be developed by or under the
direction of the department. Such remedial action plan shall be developed and
carried out by the department with money from the Petroleum Products and
Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Fund if funds are available. If at a
later date the owner or operator of the facility which caused the release is
determined, he or she shall be responsible for remedial action costs incurred
on his or her behalf subject to reimbursement pursuant to the Petroleum Release
Remedial Action Act. Any money received from such person shall be deposited in
the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Fund.
Sec. 412. Section 81-15,124.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,124.04 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy shall provide briefing on the use by the department of risk-based
corrective action. The briefing shall be directed toward comprehension and
knowledge of the use by the department of risk-based corrective action, and a
fee may be charged for attending the briefing which shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Cash Fund.
The department may contract for providing such briefing and shall maintain and
make available to the public a list of attendees.
Sec. 413. Section 81-15,124.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,124.05 (1) If a remedial action plan submitted by a responsible
person as defined in section 66-1514 is approved or deemed to be approved by
the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy
pursuant to subdivision (2) of section 81-15,124 and has been carried out, the
department may issue to the responsible person a certificate of completion
stating that no further remedial action needs to be taken at the site relating
to any contamination for which remedial action has already been taken in
accordance with the approved remedial action plan. The department shall
condition the certificate of completion upon compliance with any monitoring,
institutional, or technological controls that may be necessary and which were
relied upon by the responsible person to demonstrate compliance with the
remedial action plan. Any certificate of completion issued pursuant to this
section shall be in a form which can be filed for record in the real estate
records of the county in which the remedial action took place. The responsible
person shall file the certificate of completion and notify the department
within ten days after issuance as to the date and location of the real estate
filing. If the department issues a certificate of completion to a responsible
person under this section, a covenant not to sue shall arise by operation of
law subject to subsection (2) of this section. The covenant not to sue releases
the responsible person from liability to the state and from liability to
perform additional environmental assessment, remedial activity, or response
action with regard to the release of a petroleum product for which the
-160-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
responsible person has complied with the requirements of this subsection. The
covenant not to sue shall be voided if the responsible person fails to conduct
additional remedial action as required under subsection (2) of this section, if
a certificate of completion is revoked by the department under subsection (3)
of this section, or if the responsible person fails to comply with the
monitoring, institutional, or technological controls, if any, upon which the
certificate of completion is conditioned.
(2) A certificate of completion issued by the department under subsection
(1) of this section shall require the responsible person to conduct additional
remedial action in the event that any monitoring conducted at or near the real
property or other circumstances indicate that (a) contamination is reoccurring,
(b) additional contamination is present for which remedial action was not taken
according to the remedial action plan, or (c) contamination from the site
presents a threat to human health or the environment and was not addressed in
the remedial action plan.
(3) A certificate of completion shall be revoked if the department
demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that any approval provided
under this section was obtained by fraud or material misrepresentation, knowing
failure to disclose material information, or false certification to the
department. The department shall file a copy of the notice of revocation of any
certificate of completion in the real estate records of the county in which the
remedial action took place within ten days after such revocation.
(4) If a responsible person transfers property to an affiliate in order
for that affiliate to obtain a benefit to which the transferor would not
otherwise be eligible under this section or to avoid an obligation under this
section, the affiliate shall be subject to the same obligations and obtain the
same level of benefits as those available to the transferor under this section.
(5)(a) A covenant not to sue arising under subsection (1) of this section,
unless voided pursuant to such subsection, shall bar suit against any person
who acquires title to property to which a certificate of completion applies for
all claims of the state or any other person in connection with petroleum
products which were the subject of an approved remedial action plan and (b) a
person who purchased a site before May 31, 2001, is released, upon the issuance
of a certificate of completion under this section or upon the issuance of a no
further action letter on or after May 31, 2001, pursuant to section 81-15,186,
from all liability to the state for cleanup of contamination that was released
at the site covered by the certificate of completion or the no further action
letter before the purchase date, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, for releases or consequences that the person contributed to or caused,
for failure by such person to comply with the monitoring, institutional, or
technological controls, if any, upon which the certificate of completion is
conditioned, or in the event the certificate of completion is revoked by the
department under subsection (3) of this section.
(6) Any person entitled to the protections of the covenant not to sue or
eligible to be released from liability pursuant to the issuance of a
certificate of completion or a no further action letter under subsection (5) of
this section who is ordered by the department to take remedial action shall be
eligible for reimbursement as a responsible person pursuant to section 66-1525
and shall not be required to pay the first cost or percent of the remaining
cost as provided in subsection (1) of section 66-1523 unless such person
contributed to or caused the release or failed to comply with the monitoring,
institutional, or technological controls, if any, imposed under subsection (1)
of this section.
Sec. 414. Section 81-15,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,125 Any person violating the Petroleum Products and Hazardous
Substances Storage and Handling Act or the rules, regulations, or orders of the
State Fire Marshal or the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy adopted and promulgated or issued pursuant to such act
shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than five thousand dollars for
each offense and, in the case of a continuing violation, each day of violation
shall constitute a separate offense. In assessing the amount of the fine, the
court shall consider the size of the operation and the degree and extent of the
pollution.
Sec. 415. Section 81-15,126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,126 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy or the State Fire Marshal may apply to the district court of the county
where the violation is occurring or about to occur for a restraining order, a
temporary or permanent injunction, or a mandatory injunction against any person
violating or threatening to violate the Petroleum Products and Hazardous
Substances Storage and Handling Act or the rules, regulations, or orders
adopted and promulgated under the act. The court shall have jurisdiction to
grant relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the
existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.
Sec. 416. Section 81-15,127, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,127 (1) Any person who deposits regulated substances in a tank shall
reasonably notify the owner or operator of such tank of the owner's or
operator's registration requirements pursuant to the Petroleum Products and
Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act.
(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy shall design and make available a printed notice of registration for
-161-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
owners of tanks to any person who deposits regulated substances in a tank.
Sec. 417. Section 81-15,129, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,129 As used in the Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Act,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Certificate shall mean a certificate of competency issued by the
director or his or her duly authorized representative certifying that the
operator has met the requirements for the specified operator classification of
the certification program;
(2) Council shall mean the Environmental Quality Council;
(3) Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(4) Director shall mean the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(5) Nationally recognized association of certification authorities shall
mean an organization or organizations selected by the director which (a) serve
as an information center for certification activities, (b) recommend minimum
standards and guidelines for classification of wastewater treatment facilities
and certification of operators, (c) facilitate reciprocity between state
programs, (d) assist authorities in establishing new certification programs and
updating existing ones, and (e) provide testing services;
(6) Operator shall mean any person who regularly makes recommendations or
is responsible for process control decisions at a wastewater treatment
facility. Operator shall not include a person whose duties are limited solely
to laboratory testing or maintenance or who exercises general or indirect
supervision only;
(7) Voluntarily certified operator shall mean an operator who holds a
certificate of competency described in section 81-15,133; and
(8) Wastewater treatment facility shall mean the structures, equipment,
and processes required to collect, transport, and treat domestic or industrial
wastes and to dispose of the effluent and sludge.
Sec. 418. Section 81-15,149, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,149 As used in the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction
Assistance Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Clean Water Act means the federal Clean Water Act, as amended, 33
U.S.C. 1251 et seq.;
(2) Construction means any of the following: Preliminary planning to
determine the feasibility of wastewater treatment works or nonpoint source
control systems; engineering, architectural, legal, fiscal, or economic
investigations or studies; surveys, designs, plans, working drawings,
specifications, procedures, or other necessary preliminary actions; erection,
building, acquisition, alteration, remodeling, improvement, or extension of
wastewater treatment works or nonpoint source control systems; or the
inspection or supervision of any of the foregoing items;
(3) Council means the Environmental Quality Council;
(4) County means any county authorized to construct a sewerage disposal
system and plant or plants pursuant to the County Industrial Sewer Construction
Act;
(5) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(6) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(7) Eligible financial institution means a bank that agrees to participate
in the linked deposit program and which is chartered to conduct banking in this
state pursuant to the Nebraska Banking Act, is chartered to conduct banking by
another state and authorized to do business in this state, or is a national
bank authorized to do business in this state;
(8) Fund means the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan Fund;
(9) Linked deposit program means the Wastewater Treatment Facilities
Construction Assistance Act Linked Deposit Program established in accordance
with section 81-15,151.03;
(10) Municipality means any city, town, village, district, association, or
other public body created by or pursuant to state law and having jurisdiction
over disposal of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes;
(11) Nonpoint source control systems means projects which establish the
use of methods, measures, or practices to control the pollution of surface
waters and ground water that occurs as pollutants are transported by water from
diffuse or scattered sources. Such projects include, but are not limited to,
structural and nonstructural controls and operation and maintenance procedures
applied before, during, and after pollution-producing activities. Sources of
nonpoint source pollution may include, but are not limited to, agricultural,
forestry, and urban lands, transportation corridors, stream channels, mining
and construction activities, animal feeding operations, septic tank systems,
underground storage tanks, landfills, and atmospheric deposition;
(12) Operate and maintain means all necessary activities including the
normal replacement of equipment or appurtenances to assure the dependable and
economical function of a wastewater treatment works or nonpoint source control
systems in accordance with its intended purpose; and
(13) Wastewater treatment works means the structures, equipment,
processes, and land required to collect, transport, and treat domestic or
industrial wastes and to dispose of the effluent and sludges.
Sec. 419. Section 81-15,159, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-162-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
amended to read:
81-15,159 (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) Some landfills operating with or without a permit in Nebraska exhibit
numerous operational and management practices which are inconsistent with
proper landfill management and permit requirements, and the owners and
operators of such landfills should be encouraged to cooperate and work with the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy to ensure
that the air, land, and water of this state are not polluted;
(b) Some landfills in Nebraska are reaching capacity and the siting of a
new location can be a financially expensive and socially disruptive process,
and because of this situation all Nebraska citizens and businesses are
encouraged to implement waste reduction measures that will result in a
reduction of waste entering landfills by at least twenty-five percent;
(c) Recycling and waste reduction are necessary components of any well-
managed waste management system and can extend the lifespan of a landfill and
provide alternative waste management options; and
(d) The state can encourage recycling by the example of its own purchase
and use of recycled and recyclable materials. The state can also encourage
recycling and waste reduction by the creation of funding grants which support
existing and future waste management systems.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state, as a major
consumer and an example for others, should assist resource recovery by making a
concerted effort to use recyclable and recycled products and encourage other
levels of government and the private sector to follow its example. When
purchasing products, materials, or supplies for use by the State of Nebraska,
the Department of Administrative Services, the University of Nebraska, and any
other state agency making such purchases shall give preference to and purchase
products, materials, and supplies which are manufactured or produced from
recycled material or which can be readily reused or recycled after their normal
use. Preference shall also be given to the purchase of corn-based biodegradable
plastics and road deicers, depending on the availability and suitability of
such products. Such preference shall not operate when it would result in the
purchase of products, materials, or supplies which are of inadequate quality or
substantially higher cost.
Sec. 420. Section 81-15,159.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,159.01 (1) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy shall conduct a study to examine the status of solid
waste management programs operated by the department and make recommendations
to modernize and revise such programs. The study shall include, but not be
limited to: (a) Whether existing state programs regarding litter and waste
reduction and recycling should be amended or merged; (b) a needs assessment of
the recycling and composting programs in the state, including the need for
infrastructure development operating standards, market development, coordinated
public education resulting in behavior change, and incentives to increase
recycling and composting; (c) methods to partner with political subdivisions,
private industry, and private, nonprofit organizations to most successfully
address waste management issues in the state; (d) recommendations regarding
existing funding sources and possible new revenue sources at the state and
local level to address existing and emerging solid waste management issues; and
(e) revisions to existing grant programs to address solid waste management
issues in a proactive manner.
(2) The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy
shall establish an advisory committee to advise the department regarding the
study described in this section. The members of the advisory committee shall be
appointed by the director and shall include no more than nine members. The
director shall designate a chairperson of the advisory committee. The members
shall receive no compensation for their services.
(3) In addition to the advisory committee, the department may hire
consultants and special experts to assist in the study described in this
section. After completion of the study, the department shall submit a report,
including recommendations, to the Executive Board of the Legislative Council
and the chairpersons of the Natural Resources Committee, the Urban Affairs
Committee, and the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature no later than
December 15, 2017. The report shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 421. Section 81-15,159.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,159.02 For purposes of the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive
Act:
(1) Council means the Environmental Quality Council;
(2) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(3) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(4) Scrap tire or waste tire means a tire that is no longer suitable for
its original intended purpose because of wear, damage, or defect;
(5) Tire means any tire made of rubber or other resilient material and
normally used on any vehicle;
(6) Tire-derived product means the usable product produced from a scrap
tire. Tire-derived product does not include crumb rubber or chipped tires not
intended for a direct end use and does not include baled tires or tire-derived
fuel; and
(7) Tire retailer means a person, business, or other entity which engages
-163-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
in the retail sale of tires in any quantity for any use or purpose by the
purchaser other than for resale.
Sec. 422. Section 81-15,166, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,166 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy, with the advice and consent of the Environmental Quality Council, shall
contract for the preparation of a comprehensive solid waste management plan.
Such plan shall be contracted for and prepared on or before December 15, 1991.
It is the intent of the Legislature that in preparation of the plan the
state consider the following hierarchy of criteria: (1) Volume reduction at the
source; (2) recycling, reuse, and vegetative waste composting; (3) incineration
with energy resource recovery; (4) incineration for volume reduction; and (5)
land disposal.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the plan be used as a guide to
assist political subdivisions in the planning and implementation of their
individual, joint, or regional solid waste management systems. The
comprehensive solid waste management plan shall not supersede or impair plans,
agreements, or contracts initiated by political subdivisions prior to December
15, 1991.
The Environmental Quality Council shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for solid waste management options which comply with Environmental
Protection Agency rules and guidelines, including rules and guidelines
promulgated pursuant to the 1984 Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments to
Subtitle D of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as
amended, 42 U.S.C. 6901 et seq.
Sec. 423. Section 81-15,170, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,170 The Nebraska Environmental Trust Board is hereby created as an
entity of the executive branch. The board shall consist of the Director of
Water, Energy, and Environment, the Chief Water Officer Environment and Energy,
the Director of Natural Resources, the Director of Agriculture, the secretary
of the Game and Parks Commission, the chief executive officer of the Department
of Health and Human Services or his or her designee, and nine citizens
appointed by the Governor with the approval of a majority of the Legislature.
The citizen members shall begin serving immediately following notice of
nomination and prior to approval by the Legislature. The citizen members shall
represent the general public and shall have demonstrated competence,
experience, and interest in the environment of the state. Two of the citizen
appointees shall also have experience with private financing of public-purpose
projects. Three appointees shall be chosen from each of the three congressional
districts. The board shall hire an executive director who shall hire and
supervise other staff members as may be authorized by the board. The executive
director shall serve at the pleasure of the board and be solely responsible to
it. The Game and Parks Commission shall provide administrative support,
including, but not limited to, payroll and accounting functions, to the board.
Sec. 424. Section 81-15,175, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,175 (1) The board may make an annual allocation each fiscal year
from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund to the Nebraska Environmental
Endowment Fund as provided in section 81-15,174.01. The board shall make annual
allocations from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund and may make annual
allocations each fiscal year from the Nebraska Environmental Endowment Fund for
projects which conform to the environmental categories of the board established
pursuant to section 81-15,176 and to the extent the board determines those
projects to have merit. The board shall establish a calendar annually for
receiving and evaluating proposals and awarding grants. To evaluate the
economic, financial, and technical feasibility of proposals, the board may
establish subcommittees, request or contract for assistance, or establish
advisory groups. Private citizens serving on advisory groups shall be
reimbursed for expenses pursuant to sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(2) The board shall establish rating systems for ranking proposals which
meet the board's environmental categories and other criteria. The rating
systems shall include, but not be limited to, the following considerations:
(a) Conformance with categories established pursuant to section 81-15,176;
(b) Amount of funds committed from other funding sources;
(c) Encouragement of public-private partnerships;
(d) Geographic mix of projects over time;
(e) Cost-effectiveness and economic impact;
(f) Direct environmental impact;
(g) Environmental benefit to the general public and the long-term nature
of such public benefit; and
(h) Applications recommended by the Director of Natural Resources and
submitted by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Natural Resources
pursuant to subsection (7) of section 61-218 shall be awarded fifty priority
points in the ranking process for the 2011 grant application if the Legislature
has authorized annual transfers of three million three hundred thousand dollars
to the Water Resources Cash Fund for each of fiscal years 2011-12 and 2012-13
and has stated its intent to transfer three million three hundred thousand
dollars to the Water Resources Cash Fund in fiscal year 2013-14. Priority
points shall be awarded if the proposed programs set forth in the grant
application are consistent with the purposes of reducing consumptive uses of
water, enhancing streamflows, recharging ground water, or supporting wildlife
habitat in any river basin determined to be fully appropriated pursuant to
-164-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
section 46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713.
(3) A grant awarded under this section pursuant to an application made
under subsection (7) of section 61-218 shall be paid out in the following
manner:
(a) The initial three million three hundred thousand dollar installment
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Water Resources Cash
Fund no later than fifteen business days after the date that the grant is
approved by the board;
(b) The second three million three hundred thousand dollar installment
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Water Resources Cash
Fund no later than May 15, 2013; and
(c) The third three million three hundred thousand dollar installment
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Water Resources Cash
Fund no later than May 15, 2014, if the Legislature has authorized a transfer
of three million three hundred thousand dollars from the General Fund to the
Water Resources Cash Fund for fiscal year 2013-14.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources apply for an additional three-year
grant from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund that would begin in fiscal
year 2014-15, a three-year grant that would begin in fiscal year 2017-18, and a
three-year grant that would begin in fiscal year 2020-21 and such application
shall be awarded fifty priority points in the ranking process as set forth in
subdivision (2)(h) of this section if the following criteria are met:
(a) The Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature has examined
options for water funding and has submitted a report electronically to the
Clerk of the Legislature and the Governor by December 1, 2012, setting forth:
(i) An outline and priority listing of water management and funding needs
in Nebraska, including instream flows, residential, agricultural, recreational,
and municipal needs, interstate obligations, water quality issues, and natural
habitats preservation;
(ii) An outline of statewide funding options which create a dedicated,
sustainable funding source to meet the needs set forth in the report; and
(iii) Recommendations for legislation;
(b) The projects and activities funded by the department through grants
from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund under this section have resulted in
enhanced streamflows, reduced consumptive uses of water, recharged ground
water, supported wildlife habitat, or otherwise contributed towards conserving,
enhancing, and restoring Nebraska's ground water and surface water resources.
On or before July 1, 2014, the department shall submit electronically a report
to the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature providing demonstrable
evidence of the benefits accrued from such projects and activities; and
(c) In addition to the grant reporting requirements of the trust, on or
before July 1, 2014, the department provides to the board a report which
includes documentation that:
(i) Expenditures from the Water Resources Cash Fund made to natural
resources districts have met the matching fund requirements provided in
subdivision (5)(a) of section 61-218;
(ii) Ten percent or less of the matching fund requirements has been
provided by in-kind contributions for expenses incurred for projects enumerated
in the grant application. In-kind contributions shall not include land or land
rights; and
(iii) All other projects and activities funded by the department through
grants from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund under this section were
matched not less than forty percent of the project or activity cost by other
funding sources.
(5) The board may establish a subcommittee to rate grant applications. If
the board uses a subcommittee, the meetings of such subcommittee shall be
subject to the Open Meetings Act. The subcommittee shall (a) use the rating
systems established by the board under subsection (2) of this section, (b)
assign a numeric value to each rating criterion, combine these values into a
total score for each application, and rank the applications by the total
scores, (c) recommend an amount of funding for each application, which amount
may be more or less than the requested amount, and (d) submit the ranked list
and recommended funding to the board for its approval or disapproval.
(6) The board may commit funds to multiyear projects, subject to available
funds and appropriations. No commitment shall exceed three years without formal
action by the board to renew the grant or contract. Multiyear commitments may
be exempt from the rating process except for the initial application and
requests to renew the commitment.
(7) The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and publish
guidelines governing allocations from the fund. The board shall conduct annual
reviews of existing projects for compliance with project goals and grant
requirements.
(8) Every five years the board may evaluate the long-term effects of the
projects it funds. The evaluation may assess a sample of such projects. The
board may hire an independent consultant to conduct the evaluation and may
report the evaluation findings to the Legislature and the Governor. The report
submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 425. Section 81-15,177, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,177 (1) There is hereby established the Solid Waste Landfill Closure
Assistance Fund which shall be a cash fund administered by the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy. The fund shall be used:
-165-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(a) To provide grants for landfill site closing assessment, closure,
monitoring, and remediation costs related to landfills existing or already
closed on July 15, 1992; and
(b) To provide funds to the department for expenses incurred in carrying
out its duties under sections 81-15,178 and 81-15,179.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The Environmental Quality Council shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations regarding the form and procedure for applications for grants from
the fund, procedures for determining claims for payment or reimbursement,
procedures for determining the amount and type of costs that are eligible for
payment or reimbursement from the fund, procedures for determining priority
among applicants, procedures for auditing persons who have received payments
from the fund, and other provisions necessary to carry out sections 81-15,178
and 81-15,179.
Sec. 426. Section 81-15,178, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,178 In order for an applicant to receive funding from the Solid
Waste Landfill Closure Assistance Fund, the applicant shall:
(1) Agree to use the funds for landfill site closing assessment, closure,
monitoring, or remediation costs relating to landfills existing or already
closed on July 15, 1992;
(2) Provide the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy with documentation regarding the landfill closure site, including,
when appropriate, information indicating that the applicant holds or can
acquire title to all lands or has the necessary easements and rights-of-way for
the project and related lands;
(3) Provide a plan for the proposed project, including appropriate
engineering, economic, and financial feasibility data and other data and
information, including estimated costs, as may be required by the department;
and
(4) Demonstrate the anticipated environmental and ecological benefits
resulting from the proposed project.
Sec. 427. Section 81-15,179, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,179 Upon receipt of an application for funds from the Solid Waste
Landfill Closure Assistance Fund, the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy shall evaluate and investigate all aspects
of the proposed project and the proposed schedule for completion, determine
eligibility and priority of the project for funding, and make appropriate
grants from the fund pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
by the Environmental Quality Council. If the department determines that an
application is unsatisfactory or does not contain adequate information, the
department shall return the application to the applicant and may make
recommendations to the applicant which the department considers necessary to
make the plan or the application satisfactory.
Sec. 428. Section 81-15,180, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,180 The Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund is created. The Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy shall remit grants and
gifts received by the department for purposes of providing cost share for
remediation of superfund sites to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund.
The department shall administer the Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund to pay for
nonfederal costs, including costs for in-kind services, required as cost share
for remediation of superfund sites. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Superfund
Cost Share Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 429. Section 81-15,183, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,183 (1) The Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Fund is created. The
fund shall be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy. Revenue from the following sources shall be credited to
the fund:
(a) Application fees collected under the Remedial Action Plan Monitoring
Act;
(b) Deposits for costs associated with administration of the act,
including review, oversight, and guidance;
(c) Gifts, grants, reimbursements, or appropriations from any source
intended to be used for purposes of the act; and
(d) Investment interest attributable to the fund.
(2) The fund shall be used by the department to:
(a) Review applications and provide technical review, oversight, guidance,
and other activities associated with remedial action plans for land pollution
or water pollution;
(b) Fund activities performed by the department to address immediate or
emergency threats to human health and the environment related to property under
the act; and
(c) Administer and enforce the act.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
-166-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 430. Section 81-15,184, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,184 (1) Any entity which voluntarily chooses to make application for
monitoring of remedial action plans for property where land pollution or water
pollution exists shall:
(a) Submit an application on a form approved by the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy;
(b) Provide the department with a nonrefundable application fee of two
thousand dollars; and
(c) Execute a written agreement to provide reimbursement of all department
direct and indirect costs related to technical review, oversight, guidance, and
other activities associated with the remedial action plan. As part of the
voluntary agreement, the department shall require the applicant to post a
deposit of three thousand dollars to be used by the department to cover all
costs. The department shall not commence technical review, oversight, guidance,
or other activities associated with the remedial action plan until the
voluntary agreement is executed and a complete remedial action plan has been
submitted. If the costs of the department exceed the initial deposit, an
additional amount agreed upon by the department and the applicant may be
required prior to proceeding. After the mutual termination of the voluntary
agreement, any balance of funds paid under this subdivision shall be refunded.
(2) The department shall review and approve or deny all applications and
notify the applicant in writing. If the application is denied, the notification
shall state the reason for the denial. If the department determines that an
application does not contain adequate information, the department shall return
the application to the applicant. The applicant has sixty days to resubmit the
required information or the application will be deemed denied.
(3) Within ninety days of approval of the application and voluntary
agreement, the applicant shall provide a complete remedial action plan for the
proposed project that conforms to all federal and state environmental standards
and substantive requirements, including:
(a) Documentation regarding the investigation of land pollution or water
pollution including, when appropriate, information indicating that the
applicant holds or can acquire title to all lands or has the necessary
easements and rights-of-way for the project and related lands;
(b) A remedial action work plan which describes the remedial action
measures to be taken to address the land or water pollution; and
(c) Project monitoring reports, appropriate engineering, scientific, and
financial feasibility data, and other data and information as may be required
by the department.
Sec. 431. Section 81-15,185, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,185 Upon receipt of a voluntary remedial action plan for land
pollution or water pollution pursuant to section 81-15,184, the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy shall review and approve
or disapprove the plan and notify the applicant in writing. If the plan is
disapproved, the notification shall state the reason for the disapproval and
provide a reasonable opportunity to resubmit the plan.
Sec. 432. Section 81-15,185.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,185.01 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy shall issue public notice of its intent to approve a voluntary
remedial action plan pursuant to section 81-15,185 in a local newspaper of
general circulation in the area affected and make the remedial action plan
available to the public. The public shall have thirty days from the date of
publication during which any person may submit written comments to the
department regarding the proposed remedial action. Such person may also request
or petition the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy, in writing, for a hearing and state the nature of the issues to be
raised. The director shall hold a public hearing if the comments, request, or
petition raise legal, policy, or discretionary questions of general application
and significant public interest exists.
Sec. 433. Section 81-15,185.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,185.02 (1) The applicant may unilaterally terminate a voluntary
remedial action plan approved pursuant to section 81-15,185 prior to completion
of investigative and remedial activities if the applicant leaves the property
in no worse condition, from a human health and environment perspective, than
when the applicant initiated voluntary remedial action and the applicant
reimburses the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy for all outstanding costs.
(2) The department may terminate a voluntary remedial action plan if the
applicant:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the plan or fails to fulfill any
obligations of the plan, including submission of an acceptable remedial action
plan within a reasonable period of time;
(b) Fails to address an immediate and significant risk of harm to public
health and the environment in a timely and effective manner; or
(c) Fails to initiate the plan within six months after approval by the
department or to complete the plan within twenty-four months after approval by
the department, excluding long-term operation, maintenance, and monitoring,
unless the department grants an extension of time.
-167-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(3) The department shall notify the applicant in writing of the intention
to terminate the voluntary remedial action plan and include the reason for the
termination and a summary of any unreimbursed costs of the department that are
due.
Sec. 434. Section 81-15,185.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,185.03 (1) Within sixty days after completion of a voluntary
remedial action plan approved pursuant to section 81-15,185, the applicant
shall provide the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy with a final remedial action report and assurance that the plan has been
fully implemented. Department approval of a voluntary remedial action plan
shall be void upon failure to comply with the approved plan or willful
submission of false, inaccurate, or misleading information by the applicant.
(2) Voluntary remedial action plans approved under section 81-15,185 are
not enforceable unless the department can demonstrate that the applicant has
failed to fully implement the approved plan. The department may require further
action if such action is authorized by other state statutes administered by the
department.
Sec. 435. Section 81-15,186, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,186 If the requirements of the Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Act
are met and the applicant has remitted all applicable fees, the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy may issue to the
applicant a letter stating that no further action need be taken at the site
related to any contamination for which remedial action has been taken in
accordance with the approved remedial action plan. Such letter shall provide
that the department may require the person to conduct additional remedial
action in the event that any monitoring conducted at or near the real property
or other circumstances indicate that (1) contamination is reoccurring, (2)
additional contamination is present which was not identified pursuant to
section 81-15,184, or (3) additional contamination is present for which
remedial action was not taken according to the remedial action plan. As a
condition of issuance, the department may require payment of ongoing direct and
indirect costs of oversight of any ongoing long-term operation, maintenance,
and monitoring.
Sec. 436. Section 81-15,213, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,213 (1) The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall supervise and
coordinate emergency planning and training under section 305 of Title III and
shall oversee and distribute all funds received under section 305 of Title III
and section 81-15,214.
(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy shall receive emergency notification and facility reports and establish
procedures for receiving and processing requests from the public for
information as required to be provided under the Nebraska Emergency Planning
and Community Right to Know Act. The director or his or her designee shall
serve as commission coordinator for information.
Sec. 437. Section 81-15,229, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,229 (1) Each emergency plan, material safety data sheet, list of
chemicals, inventory form, toxic chemical release form, and followup emergency
notice shall be made available to the general public, consistent with section
322 of Title III, during normal working hours at the location or locations
designated by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy, the commission, or a local emergency planning committee, as
appropriate. Upon request by an owner or operator of a facility subject to the
requirements of section 81-15,224, the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy, the commission, or the appropriate
committee shall withhold from disclosure under this section the location of any
specific chemical required by section 81-15,225 to be contained in an inventory
form as tier II information.
(2) Each local emergency planning committee shall annually publish a
notice in local newspapers that the emergency plan, material safety data
sheets, and inventory forms have been submitted under this section. The notice
shall state that followup emergency notices may subsequently be issued. Such
notice shall announce that members of the public who wish to review any such
plan, sheet, form, or followup notice may do so at the location designated
under subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 438. Section 81-15,235, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,235 The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall as necessary
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out its responsibilities
under the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act. The
Environmental Quality Council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary for the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy to carry out its responsibilities under the act.
Sec. 439. Section 81-15,242, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,242 Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy.
Sec. 440. Section 81-15,243, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,243 Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
-168-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Environment and Energy.
Sec. 441. Section 81-15,260, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,260 The Volkswagen Settlement Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy. All sums of money received from the Volkswagen Settlement shall be
deposited in the fund. The department shall expend the fund in accordance with
the department use plan. Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The balance of any
account established to receive and expend revenue from the Volkswagen
Settlement shall be transferred to the Volkswagen Settlement Cash Fund.
Sec. 442. Section 81-15,262, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,262 The Legislature finds that:
(1) Best practices in environmental safety and protection recognize that
the regulation of water supply and disposal infrastructure are connected;
(2) The proper design, construction, and monitoring of water and
wastewater uses is critical for the safety and sustainability of communities in
the State of Nebraska;
(3) The regulation of mobile homes, recreation camps, and swimming pools
provide fundamental environmental safety for persons who use them; and
(4) Consolidating the administration of state environmental safety
programs and the environmental and water programs of the United States
Environmental Protection Agency delegated to the State of Nebraska into the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy will better
serve the communities in the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 443. Section 81-15,263, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,263 For purposes of the Environmental Safety Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy; and
(2) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy.
Sec. 444. Section 81-15,292, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,292 (1) The department shall collect a fee of not less than sixty
nor more than one hundred dollars, as determined by regulation, for each
inspection of private water supply or private sewage disposal facilities
requested of and made by the department in order for the person requesting the
inspection to qualify for any type of commercial loan, guarantee, or other type
of payment or benefit from any commercial agency or enterprise to the person
applying for or receiving the same or to meet the requirements of any federal
governmental agency, including, but not limited to, the Rural Development
Agency of the United States Department of Agriculture, the Federal Housing
Administration, and the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, that such
an inspection be conducted as a condition of applying for or receiving any type
of grant, loan, guarantee, or other type of payment or benefit from such agency
to the person applying for or receiving the same. All fees collected under this
subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Environmental Safety Cash Fund.
(2) The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations determining the fee required
pursuant to this section.
(3) All rules and regulations adopted and promulgated prior to July 1,
2021, under this section shall continue to be effective to the extent not in
conflict with the changes made by Laws 2021, LB148, until amended or repealed
by the department.
Sec. 445. Section 81-15,299, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,299 There is hereby created the Environmental Safety Cash Fund which
shall be used to pay the expenses of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy related to issuance and renewal of licenses
and permits and annual inspections, including sections 81-15,268, 81-15,272,
81-15,282, and 81-15,292. Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The State Treasurer
shall transfer any money in the Health and Human Services Cash Fund pursuant to
sections 81-15,268, 81-15,272, 81-15,282, and 81-15,292, as such sections
existed prior to July 1, 2021, to the Environmental Safety Cash Fund on July 1,
2021.
Sec. 446. Section 81-15,300, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,300 There is hereby created the Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund
which shall be used to pay the expenses of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy related to engineering reviews of plans and
specifications, including those under subsection (3) of section 81-15,268 and
subsection (2) of section 81-15,282. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The
State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the Health and Human Services Cash
Fund pursuant to subsection (3) of section 81-15,268 and subsection (2) of
section 81-15,282, as such sections existed prior to July 1, 2021, to the
-169-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund on July 1, 2021.
Sec. 447. Section 81-15,302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,302 For purposes of the Nebraska Environmental Response Act:
(1) Cleanup means all actions necessary to contain, collect, secure,
control, identify, prevent, mitigate, analyze, treat, disperse, remove, or
dispose of a pollutant necessary to restore the environment to the extent
practicable and to minimize the harmful effects from the release in conformance
with applicable federal and state environmental standards and substantive
requirements;
(2) Cleanup costs means all costs incurred by the state, a political
subdivision of the state, an agent of the state, or any other person
participating, with the approval of the department, in the prevention,
mitigation, or cleanup of a release of a pollutant, including a proportionate
share of those costs necessary to maintain the services authorized in the act.
Costs include oversight of the cleanup, staff time, and materials and supplies
used to secure and mitigate the release of pollutants;
(3) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(4) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(5) Environmental lien means a lien for cleanup costs;
(6) Person has the same meaning as provided in section 81-1502;
(7) Pollutant means one or more substances or combinations of substances
that alter the natural physical, chemical, or biological properties of any air,
land, or waters of the state in such quantities that are harmful, detrimental,
or injurious to plant or animal life, property, or the public health, safety,
or welfare;
(8) Release means any emission, discharge, spill, leak, pumping, pouring,
escaping, emptying, or dumping of a pollutant into or onto the air, land, or
waters of the state, except when performed in compliance with the conditions of
a federal or state environmental permit; and
(9) Waters of the state has the same meaning as provided in section
81-1502.
Sec. 448. Section 81-15,312, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,312 It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million
dollars for fiscal year 2024-25 from the General Fund to the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy to fund the installation
of real-time nitrate sensors in monitoring wells statewide to prioritize
nitrate management and reduction.
Sec. 449. Section 81-1604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1604 (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Comprehensive planning enables the state to address its energy needs,
challenges, and opportunities and enhances the state's ability to prioritize
energy-related policies, activities, and programs; and
(b) Meeting the state's need for clean, affordable, and reliable energy in
the future will require a diverse energy portfolio and a strategic approach,
requiring engagement of all energy stakeholders in a comprehensive planning
process.
(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy shall develop an integrated and comprehensive strategic state energy
plan and review such plan periodically as the department deems necessary. The
department may organize technical committees of individuals with expertise in
energy development for purposes of developing the plan. If the department forms
an advisory committee pursuant to subdivision (58) of section 81-1504 for
purposes of such plan, the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, the chairperson of the Natural Resources Committee of the
Legislature, and three members of the Legislature selected by the Executive
Board of the Legislative Council shall be nonvoting, ex officio members of such
advisory committee.
(3) The strategic state energy plan shall include short-term and long-term
objectives that will ensure a secure, reliable, and resilient energy system for
the state's residents and businesses; a cost-competitive energy supply and
access to affordable energy; the promotion of sustainable economic growth, job
creation, and economic development; and a means for the state's energy policy
to adapt to changing circumstances.
(4) The strategic state energy plan shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) A comprehensive analysis of the state's energy profile, including all
energy resources, end-use sectors, and supply and demand projections;
(b) An analysis of other state energy plans and regional energy activities
which identifies opportunities for streamlining and partnerships; and
(c) An identification of goals and recommendations related to:
(i) The diversification of the state's energy portfolio in a way that
balances the lowest practicable environmental cost with maximum economic
benefits;
(ii) The encouragement of state and local government coordination and
public-private partnerships for future economic and investment decisions;
(iii) The incorporation of new technologies and opportunities for energy
diversification that will maximize Nebraska resources and support local
economic development;
(iv) The interstate and intrastate promotion and marketing of the state's
-170-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
renewable energy resources;
(v) A consistent method of working with and marketing to energy-related
businesses and developers;
(vi) The advancement of transportation technologies, alternative fuels,
and infrastructure;
(vii) The development and enhancement of oil, natural gas, and electricity
production and distribution;
(viii) The development of a communications process between energy
utilities and the department for responding to and preparing for regulations
having a statewide impact; and
(ix) The development of a mechanism to measure the plan's progress.
Sec. 450. Section 81-1606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1606 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy shall develop and maintain a program of collection, compilation, and
analysis of energy statistics and information. Existing information reporting
requests, maintained at the state and federal levels, shall be utilized
whenever possible in any data collection required regarding state energy policy
pursuant to this section, subdivisions (35) through (58) of section 81-1504, or
section 81-1604 or 81-1607. A central state repository of energy data shall be
developed and coordinated with other governmental data-collection and record-
keeping programs. The department shall, on at least an annual basis, with
monthly compilations, submit to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature a
report identifying state energy consumption by fuel type and by use to the
extent that such information is available. The report submitted to the Clerk of
the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. Nothing in this section
shall be construed as permitting or authorizing the revealing of confidential
information. For purposes of this section confidential information shall mean
any process, formula, pattern, decision, or compilation of information which is
used, directly or indirectly, in the business of the producer, refiner,
distributor, transporter, or vendor, and which gives such producer, refiner,
distributor, transporter, or vendor an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an
advantage over competitors who do not know or use it.
Sec. 451. Section 81-1607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1607 (1) On or before February 15 of each year, the Director of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy shall transmit to the Governor
and the Clerk of the Legislature a comprehensive report designed to identify
emerging trends related to energy supply, demand, and conservation and to
specify the level of statewide energy need within the following sectors:
Agricultural, commercial, residential, industrial, transportation, utilities,
government, and any other sector that the director determines to be useful. The
report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically.
(2) The report shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) An assessment of the state's energy resources, including examination
of the current energy supplies and any feasible alternative sources;
(b) The estimated reduction in annual energy consumption resulting from
various energy conservation measures;
(c) The status of the ongoing studies of the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Environment and Energy pursuant to subdivisions (35) through
(58) of section 81-1504;
(d) Recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature for administrative
and legislative actions to accomplish the purposes of this section and section
81-1606; and
(e) The use of funds disbursed during the previous year under sections
81-1635 to 81-1641. The use of such funds shall be reported each year until the
funds are completely disbursed and all contractual obligations have expired or
otherwise terminated.
Sec. 452. Section 81-1609, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1609 As used in sections 81-1608 to 81-1626, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy;
(2) Contractor means the person or entity responsible for the overall
construction of any building or the installation of any component which affects
the energy efficiency of the building;
(3) Architect or engineer means any person licensed as an architect or
professional engineer under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act;
(4) Building means any new structure, renovated building, or addition
which is used or intended for supporting or sheltering any use or occupancy,
but not including any structure which has a consumption of traditional energy
sources for all purposes not exceeding the energy equivalent of three and four-
tenths British Thermal Units per hour or one watt per square foot;
(5) Residential building means a building three stories or less that is
used primarily as one or more dwelling units;
(6) Renovation means alterations on an existing building which will cost
more than fifty percent of the replacement cost of such building at the time
work is commenced or which was not previously heated or cooled, for which a
heating or cooling system is now proposed, except that the restoration of
historical buildings shall not be included;
(7) Addition means an extension or increase in the height, conditioned
-171-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
floor area, or conditioned volume of a building or structure;
(8) Floor area means the total area of the floor or floors of a building,
expressed in square feet, which is within the exterior faces of the shell of
the structure which is heated or cooled;
(9) Nebraska Energy Code means the 2018 International Energy Conservation
Code published by the International Code Council;
(10) Traditional energy sources means electricity, petroleum-based fuels,
uranium, coal, and all nonrenewable forms of energy; and
(11) Equivalent or equivalent code means standards that meet or exceed the
requirements of the Nebraska Energy Code.
Sec. 453. Section 81-1611, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1611 The Legislature hereby adopts the 2018 International Energy
Conservation Code published by the International Code Council as the Nebraska
Energy Code. The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy may adopt regulations specifying alternative standards for building
systems, techniques, equipment designs, or building materials that shall be
deemed equivalent to the Nebraska Energy Code. Regulations specifying
alternative standards may be deemed equivalent to the Nebraska Energy Code and
may be approved for general or limited use if the use of such alternative
standards would not result in energy consumption greater than would result from
the strict application of the Nebraska Energy Code.
Sec. 454. Section 81-1612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1612 The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for implementation and
administration of sections 81-1608 to 81-1626. Rules, regulations, or
amendments thereto shall be adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure
Act.
Sec. 455. Section 81-1625, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1625 If the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy or the local code authority finds, within two years from the date a
building is first occupied, that the building, at the time of construction, did
not comply with the Nebraska Energy Code or equivalent code adopted by a
county, city, or village in effect at such time, the director or code authority
may order the owner or prime contractor to take those actions necessary to
bring the building into compliance. This section does not limit the right of
the owner to bring civil action against the contractor, architect, or engineer
for the cost of bringing the building into compliance.
Sec. 456. Section 81-1635, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1635 There is hereby established in the state treasury a fund, to be
known as the Nebraska Energy Settlement Fund and referred to in sections
81-1635 to 81-1641 as the fund, to be administered by the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy as the representative of the
Governor. The fund shall consist of (1) money received by the State of Nebraska
after February 15, 1986, from awards or allocations to the State of Nebraska on
behalf of consumers of petroleum products as a result of judgments or
settlements for overcharges to consumers of petroleum products sold during the
period of time in which federal price controls on such products were in effect
and (2) any investment interest earned on the fund. The Department of
Administrative Services may for accounting purposes create subfunds of the fund
to segregate awards or allocations received pursuant to different orders or
settlements. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. No money shall be transferred or
disbursed from the fund except pursuant to sections 81-1635 to 81-1641.
Sec. 457. Section 81-1636, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1636 The Governor or the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
Environment and Energy as representative of the Governor shall develop a plan
for the disbursement of the money credited to the fund for submission to the
United States Department of Energy. The plan shall be in accordance with the
specifications and guidelines of the applicable federal court order and any
applicable federal law or regulations.
Sec. 458. Section 81-1637, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1637 (1) The Governor shall submit electronically a predisbursement
plan to the Legislature if in session or the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council if the Legislature is not in session.
(2) The predisbursement plan shall generally outline the uses and
beneficiaries of proposed disbursements from the fund, as well as the expected
benefits to the state as a whole.
(3) The predisbursement plan shall also include a policy statement which
shall indicate (a) a perception of the current and anticipated trends regarding
energy availability, costs, and needs in the state, (b) assumptions regarding
the impacts on energy needs of the state of current and anticipated state and
federal policies and market forces affecting energy use, and (c) generally, how
the types of projects to be selected will address those trends and assumptions.
(4) The Legislature may hold a public hearing within thirty days after
receipt of the predisbursement plan to solicit testimony on such plan. The
Legislature may, no later than fifteen days following such hearing, make
-172-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
recommendations to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy concerning the plan. No disbursement of or obligation to disburse
any money in the fund shall be made after July 9, 1988, until forty-five days
after the predisbursement plan referring to such disbursement has been
submitted to the Legislature or the Executive Board of the Legislative Council,
as the case may be.
Sec. 459. Section 81-1638, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1638 (1) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment
and Energy shall, as the representative of and under the direction of the
Governor, be the administrative agency for the selection of projects pursuant
to section 81-1636, allocation of funds to the projects, and monitoring of the
uses of the funds so allocated.
(2) The department shall contract with any and all grantees of funds in
and recipients of loans from the fund. The contracts shall include provisions
for reporting on and accounting for the use of the funds by the grantee or loan
recipient to the department, and any contracts or agreements entered into
before appropriations are made by the Legislature shall recite that they are
subject to appropriations of the fund by the Legislature.
(3) Any political subdivision of this state may apply for, and shall be
eligible to receive, a disbursement for a project pursuant to section 81-1636,
including a disbursement of loan proceeds.
Sec. 460. Section 81-1640, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1640 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed uses of the fund in the
manner and to the extent required by specifications and guidelines of the
applicable federal court order and any applicable federal law or regulations.
Sec. 461. Section 81-3449, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3449 The provisions of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act
regulating the practice of architecture do not apply to the following
activities:
(1) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of a detached
single-family through four-family dwelling of less than five thousand square
feet of above grade finished space. Any detached or attached sheds, storage
buildings, and garages incidental to the dwelling are not included in the
tabulation of finished space. Such exemption may be increased by rule and
regulation of the board adopted pursuant to the Negotiated Rulemaking Act but
shall not exceed the Type V, column B, limitations set forth by the allowable
height and building areas table in the state building code adopted in section
71-6403;
(2) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of a one-story
commercial or industrial building or structure of less than five thousand
square feet of above grade finished space which does not exceed thirty feet in
height unless such building or structure, or the remodeling or repairing
thereof, provides for the employment, housing, or assembly of twenty or more
persons. Any detached or attached sheds, storage buildings, and garages
incidental to the building or structure are not included in the tabulation of
finished space. Such exemption may be increased by rule and regulation of the
board adopted pursuant to the Negotiated Rulemaking Act but shall not exceed
the Type V, column B, limitations set forth by the allowable height and
building areas table in the state building code adopted in section 71-6403;
(3) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of farm
buildings, including barns, silos, sheds, or housing for farm equipment and
machinery, livestock, poultry, or storage, if the structures are designed to be
occupied by no more than twenty persons. Such exemption may be increased by
rule and regulation of the board adopted pursuant to the Negotiated Rulemaking
Act but shall not exceed the Type V, column B, limitations set forth by the
allowable height and building areas table in the state building code adopted in
section 71-6403;
(4) Any public works project with contemplated expenditures for a
completed project that do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. The board
shall adjust the dollar amount in this subdivision every fifth year. The first
such adjustment after August 27, 2011, shall be effective on July 1, 2014. The
adjusted amount shall be equal to the then current amount adjusted by the
cumulative percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers published by the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics for the five-year
period preceding the adjustment date. The amount shall be rounded to the next
highest one-thousand-dollar amount;
(5) Any alteration, renovation, or remodeling of a building if the
alteration, renovation, or remodeling does not affect architectural or
engineering safety features of the building;
(6) The teaching, including research and service, of architectural
subjects in a college or university offering a degree in architecture
accredited by the National Architectural Accrediting Board;
(7) The preparation of submissions to architects, building officials, or
other regulating authorities by the manufacturer, supplier, or installer of any
materials, assemblies, components, or equipment that describe or illustrate the
use of such items, the preparation of any details or shop drawings required of
the contractor by the terms of the construction documents, or the management of
construction contracts by persons customarily engaged in contracting work;
(8) The preparation of technical submissions or the administration of
-173-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
construction contracts by employees of a person or organization lawfully
engaged in the practice of architecture if such employees are acting under the
direct supervision of an architect;
(9) A public service provider or an organization who employs a licensee
performing professional services for itself;
(10) A nonresident who holds the certification issued by the National
Council of Architectural Registration Boards offering to render the
professional services involved in the practice of architecture. The nonresident
shall not perform any of the professional services involved in the practice of
architecture until licensed as provided in the Engineers and Architects
Regulation Act. The nonresident shall notify the board in writing that (a) he
or she holds a National Council of Architectural Registration Boards
certificate and is not currently licensed in Nebraska but will be present in
Nebraska for the purpose of offering to render architectural services, (b) he
or she will deliver a copy of the notice to every potential client to whom the
applicant offers to render architectural services, and (c) he or she promises
to apply immediately to the board for licensure if selected as the architect
for the project;
(11) The practice by a qualified member of another legally recognized
profession who is otherwise licensed or certified by this state or any
political subdivision to perform services consistent with the laws of this
state, the training, and the code of ethics of the respective profession, if
such qualified member does not represent himself or herself to be practicing
architecture and does not represent himself or herself to be an architect;
(12) Financial institutions making disbursements of funds in connection
with construction projects;
(13) Earthmoving and related work associated with soil and water
conservation practices performed on farmland or any land owned by a political
subdivision that is not subject to a permit from the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources or for work related to livestock
waste facilities that are not subject to a permit by the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy; and
(14) The work of employees and agents of a political subdivision or a
nonprofit entity organized for the purpose of furnishing electrical service
performing, in accordance with other requirements of law, their customary
duties in the administration and enforcement of codes, permit programs, and
land-use regulations and their customary duties in utility and public works
construction, operation, and maintenance.
Sec. 462. Section 81-3453, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3453 The provisions of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act
regulating the practice of engineering do not apply to the following
activities:
(1) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of a detached
single-family through four-family dwelling of less than five thousand square
feet above grade finished space. Any detached or attached sheds, storage
buildings, and garages incidental to the dwelling are not included in the
tabulation of finished space. Such exemption may be increased by rule and
regulation of the board adopted pursuant to the Negotiated Rulemaking Act but
shall not exceed the Type V, column B, limitations set forth by the allowable
height and building areas table in the state building code adopted in section
71-6403;
(2) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of a one-story
commercial or industrial building or structure of less than five thousand
square feet above grade finished space which does not exceed thirty feet in
height unless such building or structure, or the remodeling or repairing
thereof, provides for the employment, housing, or assembly of twenty or more
persons. Any detached or attached sheds, storage buildings, and garages
incidental to the building or structure are not included in the tabulation of
finished space. Such exemption may be increased by rule and regulation of the
board adopted pursuant to the Negotiated Rulemaking Act but shall not exceed
the Type V, column B, limitations set forth by the allowable height and
building areas table in the state building code adopted in section 71-6403;
(3) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of farm
buildings, including barns, silos, sheds, or housing for farm equipment and
machinery, livestock, poultry, or storage and if the structures are designed to
be occupied by no more than twenty persons. Such exemption may be increased by
rule and regulation of the board adopted pursuant to the Negotiated Rulemaking
Act but shall not exceed the Type V, column B, limitations set forth by the
allowable height and building areas table in the state building code adopted in
section 71-6403;
(4) Any public works project with contemplated expenditures for the
completed project that do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. The board
shall adjust the dollar amount in this subdivision every fifth year. The first
such adjustment after August 27, 2011, shall be effective on July 1, 2014. The
adjusted amount shall be equal to the then current amount adjusted by the
cumulative percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers published by the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics for the five-year
period preceding the adjustment date. The amount shall be rounded to the next
highest one-thousand-dollar amount;
(5) Any alteration, renovation, or remodeling of a building if the
alteration, renovation, or remodeling does not affect architectural or
engineering safety features of the building;
-174-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
(6) The teaching, including research and service, of engineering subjects
in a college or university offering an ABET-accredited engineering curriculum
of four years or more;
(7) A public service provider or an organization who employs a licensee
performing professional services for itself;
(8) The practice by a qualified member of another legally recognized
profession who is otherwise licensed or certified by this state or any
political subdivision to perform services consistent with the laws of this
state, the training, and the code of ethics of such profession, if such
qualified member does not represent himself or herself to be practicing
engineering and does not represent himself or herself to be a professional
engineer;
(9) The work of an employee or a subordinate of a person holding a
certificate of licensure or a temporary permit under the Engineers and
Architects Regulation Act if the work is done under the direct supervision of a
person holding a certificate of licensure or a temporary permit under the act;
(10) Those services ordinarily performed by subordinates under direct
supervision of a professional engineer or those commonly designated as
locomotive, stationary, marine operating engineers, power plant operating
engineers, or manufacturers who supervise the operation of or operate machinery
or equipment or who supervise construction within their own plant;
(11) Financial institutions making disbursements of funds in connection
with construction projects;
(12) Earthmoving and related work associated with soil and water
conservation practices performed on farmland or any land owned by a political
subdivision that is not subject to a permit from the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Natural Resources or for work related to livestock
waste facilities that are not subject to a permit by the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy;
(13) The work of employees and agents of a political subdivision or a
nonprofit entity organized for the purpose of furnishing electrical service
performing, in accordance with other requirements of law, their customary
duties in the administration and enforcement of codes, permit programs, and
land-use regulations and their customary duties in utility and public works
construction, operation, and maintenance;
(14) Work performed exclusively in the exploration for and development of
energy resources and base, precious, and nonprecious minerals, including sand,
gravel, and aggregate, which does not have a substantial impact upon public
health, safety, and welfare, as determined by the board, or require the
submission of reports or documents to public agencies;
(15) The construction of water wells as defined in section 46-1212, the
installation of pumps and pumping equipment into water wells, and the
decommissioning of water wells, unless such construction, installation, or
decommissioning is required by the owner thereof to be designed or supervised
by an engineer or unless legal requirements are imposed upon the owner of a
water well as a part of a public water supply;
(16) Work performed in the exploration, development, and production of oil
and gas or before the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission; and
(17) Siting, layout, construction, and reconstruction of a private onsite
wastewater treatment system with a maximum flow from the facility of one
thousand gallons of domestic wastewater per day if such system meets all of the
conditions required pursuant to the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System
Contractors Certification and System Registration Act unless the siting,
layout, construction, or reconstruction by an engineer is required by the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy, mandated
by law or rules and regulations imposed upon the owner of the system, or
required by the owner.
Sec. 463. Section 84-166, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-166 Pursuant to the proclamation of a vital resource emergency issued
as provided in section 84-164, the Governor by executive order may:
(1) Regulate the operating hours of vital resource consuming
instrumentalities including state government, political subdivisions, private
institutions, and business facilities to the extent that the regulation is not
hazardous or detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of the people of
this state;
(2) Establish a system for the distribution of the supply of energy or
vital resource;
(3) Curtail, regulate, or direct the public and private transportation and
use of the vital resource which is in short supply, to the extent necessary, so
long as such regulation is not hazardous or detrimental to the health, safety,
or welfare of the people of this state;
(4) Delegate any administrative authority vested in him or her to the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and Energy or any
other state agency or its respective director; and
(5) Provide for the temporary transfer of directors, personnel, or
functions of state departments and agencies for the purpose of carrying out any
emergency measures taken pursuant to sections 84-162 to 84-167.
Sec. 464. Section 84-602.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-602.04 (1) The State Treasurer shall develop and maintain a single,
searchable website with information on state receipts, expenditures of state
funds, and contracts which is accessible by the public at no cost to access as
-175-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
provided in this section. The website shall be hosted on a server owned and
operated by the State of Nebraska or approved by the Chief Information Officer.
The naming convention for the website shall identify the website as a state
government website. The website shall not include the treasurer's name, the
treasurer's image, the treasurer's seal, or a welcome message.
(2)(a) The website established, developed, and maintained by the State
Treasurer pursuant to this section shall provide such information as will
document the sources of all state receipts and the expenditure of state funds
by all state entities.
(b) The State Treasurer shall, in appropriate detail, cause to be
published on the website:
(i) The identity, principal location, and amount of state receipts
received or expended by the State of Nebraska and all of its state entities;
(ii) The funding or expending state entity;
(iii) The budget program source;
(iv) The amount, date, purpose, and recipient of all expenditures of state
funds; and
(v) Such other relevant information as will further the intent of
enhancing the transparency of state government financial operations to its
citizens and taxpayers. The website shall include data for fiscal year 2008-09
and each fiscal year thereafter, except that for any state entity that becomes
subject to this section due to the changes made by Laws 2016, LB851, the
website shall include data for such state entity for fiscal year 2016-17 and
each fiscal year thereafter.
(3) The data shall be available on the website no later than thirty days
after the end of the preceding fiscal year.
(4)(a) The website described in this section shall include a link to the
website of the Department of Administrative Services. The department's website
shall contain:
(i) A database that includes a copy of each active contract that is a
basis for an expenditure of state funds, including any amendment to such
contract and any document incorporated by reference in such contract. For
purposes of this subdivision, amendment means an agreement to modify a contract
which has been reduced to writing and signed by each party to the contract, an
agreement to extend the duration of a contract, or an agreement to renew a
contract. The database shall be accessible by the public and searchable by
vendor, by state entity, and by dollar amount. All state entities shall provide
to the Department of Administrative Services, in electronic form, copies of
such contracts for inclusion in the database beginning with contracts that are
active on and after January 1, 2014, except that for any state entity that
becomes subject to this section due to the changes made by Laws 2016, LB851,
such state entity shall provide copies of such contracts for inclusion in the
database beginning with contracts that are active on and after January 1, 2017;
and
(ii) A database that includes copies of all expired contracts which were
previously included in the database described in subdivision (4)(a)(i) of this
section and which have not been disposed of pursuant to policies and procedures
adopted under subdivision (4)(e) of this section. The database required under
this subdivision shall be accessible by the public and searchable by vendor, by
state entity, and by dollar amount.
(b) The following shall be redacted or withheld from any contract before
such contract is included in a database pursuant to subdivision (4)(a) of this
section:
(i) The social security number or federal tax identification number of any
individual or business;
(ii) Protected health information as such term is defined under the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, as such
act existed on January 1, 2013;
(iii) Any information which may be withheld from the public under section
84-712.05; or
(iv) Any information that is confidential under state or federal law,
rule, or regulation.
(c) The following contracts shall be exempt from the requirements of
subdivision (4)(a) of this section:
(i) Contracts entered into by the Department of Health and Human Services
that are letters of agreement for the purpose of providing specific services to
a specifically named individual and his or her family;
(ii) Contracts entered into by the University of Nebraska or any of the
Nebraska state colleges for the purpose of providing specific services or
financial assistance to a specifically named individual and his or her family;
(iii) Contracts entered into by the Department of Veterans' Affairs under
section 80-401 or 80-403 for the purpose of providing aid to a specifically
named veteran and his or her family;
(iv) Contracts entered into by the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy for the purpose of providing financing from
the Dollar and Energy Saving Loan program;
(v) Contracts entered into by the State Department of Education under
sections 79-11,121 to 79-11,132 for the purpose of providing specific goods,
services, or financial assistance on behalf of or to a specifically named
individual;
(vi) Contracts entered into by the Commission for the Blind and Visually
Impaired under the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Act for the
purpose of providing specific goods, services, or financial assistance on
-176-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
behalf of or to a specifically named individual;
(vii) Contracts of employment for employees of any state entity. The
exemption provided in this subdivision shall not apply to contracts entered
into by any state entity to obtain the services of an independent contractor;
and
(viii) Contracts entered into by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority
for the purpose of providing a specific service or financial assistance,
including, but not limited to, a grant or loan, to a specifically named
individual and his or her family.
(d) No state entity shall structure a contract to avoid any of the
requirements of subdivision (4)(a) of this section.
(e) The Department of Administrative Services shall adopt policies and
procedures regarding the creation, maintenance, and disposal of records
pursuant to section 84-1212.02 for the contracts contained in the databases
required under this section and the process by which state entities provide
copies of the contracts required under this section.
(5) All state entities shall provide to the State Treasurer, at such times
and in such form as designated by the State Treasurer, such information as is
necessary to accomplish the purposes of the Taxpayer Transparency Act.
(6) Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of information which
is considered confidential under state or federal law or is not a public record
under section 84-712.05.
Sec. 465. Section 85-162.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-162.03 In carrying out sections 85-162.01 to 85-162.05, the State
Forester shall cooperate with (1) any agency or bureau of the United States,
including, but not limited to, the Forest Service, the Natural Resources
Conservation Service, the Farm Service Agency, the Bureau of Reclamation, the
Corps of Engineers, and the Bureau of Outdoor Recreation, (2) any agency or
bureau of the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions, including, but
not limited to, the Game and Parks Commission, the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Natural Resources, the State Fire Marshal, the Department of
Agriculture, the Adjutant General, the Department of Economic Development, and
the Conservation and Survey Division of the University of Nebraska, and (3) any
incorporated municipality of the state or any political subdivision of the
state, including, but not limited to, rural fire districts, natural resources
districts, and weed control districts.
Sec. 466. Section 86-570, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-570 (1) The Geographic Information Systems Council is hereby created
and shall consist of:
(a) The Chief Information Officer or his or her designee, the chief
executive officer or designee of the Department of Health and Human Services,
and the director or designee of the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Environment and Energy, the Conservation and Survey Division of the
University of Nebraska, the Department of Natural Resources, and the Governor's
Policy Research Office;
(b) The Director-State Engineer or designee;
(c) The State Surveyor or designee;
(d) The Clerk of the Legislature or designee;
(e) The secretary of the Game and Parks Commission or designee;
(f) The Property Tax Administrator or designee;
(g) One representative of federal agencies appointed by the Governor;
(h) One representative of the natural resources districts nominated by the
Nebraska Association of Resources Districts and appointed by the Governor;
(i) One representative of the public power districts appointed by the
Governor;
(j) Two representatives of the counties nominated by the Nebraska
Association of County Officials and appointed by the Governor;
(k) One representative of the municipalities nominated by the League of
Nebraska Municipalities and appointed by the Governor;
(l) Two members at large appointed by the Governor; and
(m) Such other members as nominated by the Nebraska Information Technology
Commission and appointed by the Governor.
(2) The appointed members shall serve terms as determined by the Nebraska
Information Technology Commission.
(3) The members shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections
81-1174 to 81-1177.
Sec. 467. Section 88-550, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
88-550 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Environment and
Energy and the commission shall, during the course of their regular inspections
required by law, inspect warehouses for conditions which are or may be
conducive to grain dust explosions. Such conditions shall include, but not be
limited to, the presence at the warehouse of excessive grain dust, faulty
equipment, or any other condition which could reasonably lead to an explosion
if not corrected. The department and commission shall report any such condition
to the State Fire Marshal as soon as practicable after each inspection.
Sec. 468. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 469. Original sections 2-408, 2-969, 2-1501, 2-1504, 2-1508, 2-1509,
2-1510, 2-1511, 2-1588, 2-1592, 2-1593, 2-1594, 2-1595, 2-2626, 2-3202, 2-3225,
2-3241, 2-3254, 2-3279, 2-3280, 2-4602, 2-4603, 2-4604, 2-4901, 13-1701,
13-2008, 13-2009, 13-2042.01, 16-6,106, 25-1062.01, 25-1064, 25-1920, 25-2159,
-177-

LB317 LB317
2025 2025
25-2160, 31-415, 31-509, 31-515, 31-516, 31-1003, 31-1015, 37-707, 37-708.01,
46-106, 46-122, 46-190, 46-192, 46-193, 46-1,155, 46-1,157, 46-205, 46-226,
46-226.01, 46-226.02, 46-226.03, 46-227, 46-229, 46-229.01, 46-229.02,
46-229.03, 46-229.04, 46-229.05, 46-229.06, 46-230, 46-231, 46-233, 46-233.01,
46-234, 46-235, 46-235.01, 46-235.02, 46-235.03, 46-235.04, 46-236, 46-237,
46-238, 46-240.01, 46-241, 46-242, 46-250, 46-252, 46-254, 46-256, 46-258,
46-261, 46-263.02, 46-273, 46-286, 46-288, 46-289, 46-290, 46-291, 46-292,
46-293, 46-294, 46-294.01, 46-294.02, 46-294.05, 46-297, 46-2,101, 46-2,104,
46-2,105, 46-2,108, 46-2,109, 46-2,110, 46-2,111, 46-2,112, 46-2,113, 46-2,114,
46-2,115, 46-2,116, 46-2,116.01, 46-2,116.02, 46-2,117, 46-2,118, 46-2,119,
46-2,120, 46-2,122, 46-2,123, 46-2,124, 46-2,125, 46-2,128, 46-2,130, 46-2,139,
46-302, 46-303, 46-304, 46-305, 46-312, 46-315, 46-514, 46-515, 46-516, 46-517,
46-518, 46-519, 46-521, 46-522, 46-524, 46-525, 46-526, 46-527, 46-528, 46-529,
46-530, 46-536, 46-541, 46-583, 46-601.01, 46-602, 46-604, 46-606, 46-609,
46-610, 46-613.01, 46-613.02, 46-637, 46-638, 46-639, 46-640, 46-641, 46-642,
46-644, 46-645, 46-648, 46-649, 46-653, 46-654, 46-655.01, 46-676, 46-677,
46-678, 46-679, 46-680, 46-682, 46-683, 46-683.01, 46-684, 46-685, 46-686,
46-686.01, 46-688, 46-691, 46-703, 46-704, 46-705, 46-706, 46-707, 46-709,
46-711, 46-712, 46-713, 46-714, 46-715, 46-716, 46-717, 46-718, 46-719, 46-720,
46-721, 46-722, 46-723, 46-724, 46-725, 46-726, 46-728, 46-729, 46-730, 46-731,
46-732, 46-733, 46-736, 46-737, 46-739, 46-740, 46-742, 46-743, 46-744, 46-745,
46-746, 46-748, 46-749, 46-750, 46-751, 46-753, 46-754, 46-755, 46-801, 46-802,
46-803, 46-804, 46-1001, 46-1004, 46-1005, 46-1011, 46-1023, 46-1102, 46-1108,
46-1109, 46-1204.01, 46-1207, 46-1217, 46-1222, 46-1224, 46-1235, 46-1301,
46-1304, 46-1403, 46-1404, 46-1502, 46-1605, 46-1606, 46-1607, 46-1611,
46-1613, 46-1614, 46-1636, 46-1637, 46-1639, 46-1640, 46-1641, 46-1642,
46-1645, 46-1646, 46-1647, 46-1648, 46-1649, 46-1650, 46-1651, 46-1652,
46-1653, 46-1654, 46-1655, 46-1656, 46-1657, 46-1658, 46-1659, 46-1660,
46-1661, 46-1662, 46-1663, 46-1664, 46-1665, 46-1666, 46-1667, 46-1668,
46-1669, 46-1670, 54-2417, 54-2421, 54-2429, 54-2430, 57-1407, 57-1502,
57-1609, 57-1614, 57-1619, 58-202, 60-6,363, 60-6,364, 60-6,367, 60-6,368,
61-201, 61-202, 61-203, 61-204, 61-205, 61-207, 61-208, 61-209, 61-210, 61-211,
61-215, 61-216, 70-669, 71-3508.04, 71-3524, 76-2,124, 77-3,112, 81-101,
81-102, 81-2,294, 81-502, 81-829.05, 81-1108.55, 81-1316, 81-1502, 81-1503,
81-1537, 81-1540, 81-1561, 81-15,118, 81-15,120, 81-15,124, 81-15,124.04,
81-15,124.05, 81-15,125, 81-15,126, 81-15,127, 81-15,129, 81-15,149, 81-15,159,
81-15,159.01, 81-15,159.02, 81-15,166, 81-15,170, 81-15,175, 81-15,177,
81-15,178, 81-15,179, 81-15,180, 81-15,183, 81-15,184, 81-15,185, 81-15,185.01,
81-15,185.02, 81-15,185.03, 81-15,186, 81-15,213, 81-15,229, 81-15,235,
81-15,242, 81-15,243, 81-15,260, 81-15,262, 81-15,263, 81-15,292, 81-15,299,
81-15,300, 81-15,302, 81-15,312, 81-1604, 81-1606, 81-1607, 81-1609, 81-1611,
81-1612, 81-1625, 81-1635, 81-1636, 81-1637, 81-1638, 81-1640, 81-3449,
81-3453, 84-166, 84-602.04, 85-162.03, 86-570, and 88-550, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 2-414, 2-415, 2-416, 2-1507, 19-1201,
19-1202, 19-1203, 19-1204, 19-5706, 31-508, 37-806, 37-814, 46-1,164, 46-1,165,
46-296, 49-506, 49-617, 54-2940, 58-221, 61-206, 61-218, 61-222, 61-224,
61-226, 61-227, 61-228, 61-303, 61-305, 61-401, 61-403, 61-404, 61-405, 61-502,
61-520, 66-203, 66-204, 66-301, 66-302, 66-303, 66-304, 66-489.02, 66-1004,
66-1009, 66-1105, 66-1344, 66-1504, 66-1518, 66-1529.02, 66-2001, 66-2201,
66-2216, 69-2011, 69-2502, 70-1003, 71-2433, 71-3503, 71-5301, 71-5316,
71-5328, 71-6406, 72-804, 72-805, 76-2602, 76-2608, 77-27,150, 77-27,151,
77-27,152, 77-27,153, 77-27,154, 77-27,187.01, 77-27,236, and 77-3442, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 470. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 2-1596,
2-1597, 2-1598, 2-1599, 2-15,100, 2-15,101, 2-15,103, 2-15,105, 2-15,106,
2-3277, 2-3278, 2-4201, 2-4202, 2-4203, 2-4204, 2-4205, 2-4206, 2-4207, 2-4208,
2-4209, 2-4210, 2-4211, 2-4212, 2-4213, 2-4214, 2-4215, 2-4216, 2-4217, 2-4218,
2-4219, 2-4220, 2-4221, 2-4222, 2-4223, 2-4224, 2-4225, 2-4226, 2-4227, 2-4228,
2-4229, 2-4230, 2-4231, 2-4232, 2-4233, 2-4234, 2-4235, 2-4236, 2-4237, 2-4238,
2-4239, 2-4240, 2-4241, 2-4242, 2-4243, 2-4244, 2-4245, 2-4246, 46-199,
71-3508.02, 81-15,254, 81-15,255, 81-15,256, 81-15,257, 81-15,258, 81-15,259,
81-15,293, 81-15,294, 81-15,295, 81-15,296, 81-15,297, and 81-15,298, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 471. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed
and approved according to law.
-178-